         of an EEPROM block such that the integrity of the data read from EEPROM is ensured
                      even if the characteristics of the EEPROM changed e.g. due to ageing. Therefore,
                      FDP_SDI.2[HW] and FDP_SDI.2[FW] are suitable to meet the security objective.
                      The justification related to the security objective “Post Delivery Configuration of
                      Hardware” (O.CUST_RECONF_PLAIN) is as follows:
                      The security functional requirement “Specification of Management Functions
                      (FMT_SMF.1)” is used for the specification of the management functions to be
                      provided by the P6022y VB as demanded by O.CUST_RECONF_PLAIN. Therefore,
                      FMT_SMF.1[HW] is suitable to meet the security objective.
                      The justification related to the security objective "Sealing/Unsealing user data” (O.PUF) is
                      as follows:
                      The security functional requirement FCS_CKM.1[PUF] requires the generation of
                      cryptographic key from the key derivation function based on the PUF block and the
                      Random Number Generator (RNG). Since the PUF block and the Random Number
                      Generator provide a TOE specific data to the key derivation function, the user data which
                      is encrypted with this cryptographic key can be decrypted with the same TOE that the
                      user data was encrypted on. The security functional requirement FCS_CKM.4[PUF]
                      requires that the cryptographic keys which are derived by the key derivation function are
                      destroyed by the method of flushing of key registers. The SFR FCS_COP.1[PUF_AES]
                      defines the encryption and decryption of the user data using cryptographic algorithm
                      AES. The SFR FCS_COP.1[PUF_MAC] defines the calculation of a MAC as a PUF


P6022y VB                             All information provided in this document is subject to legal disclaimers.     © NXP B.V. 2018. All rights reserved.

Evaluation document                                   Rev. 2.1 — 6 April 2018
PUBLIC                                                                                                                                       72 / 101
NXP Semiconductors
                                                                                                                                   P6022y VB
                                                                                                                                     Security Target Lite


                        authentication value. Therefore these SFRs together provide the functionality of sealing/
                        unsealing user data as required by the objective O.PUF.


               6.3.2 Dependencies of security functional requirements


              6.3.2.1   NXP Secure Smart Card Controller P6022y VB
                        The dependencies listed in the PP [6] are independent of the additional dependencies
                        listed in the table below. The dependencies of the PP [6] are fulfilled within the PP [6] and
                        at least one dependency is considered to be satisfied.
                        The following discussion demonstrates how the dependencies defined by Part 2 of the
                        Common Criteria [2] for the requirements specified in Section 6.1.1.2 and Section 6.1.1.3
                        are satisfied.
                        The dependencies defined in the Common Criteria are listed in the Table 35:

Table 35. Dependencies of security functional requirements
Security Functional Requirement        Dependencies                                                                  Fulfilled by security requirements in
                                                                                                                     this ST
FCS_COP.1[TDES]                        FDP_ITC.1 or FDP_ITC.2, or FCS_                                               See discussion below
                                       CKM.1
                                       FCS_CKM.4
FCS_CKM.4[TDES]                        FDP_ITC.1 or FDP_ITC.2, or FCS_                                               See discussion below
                                       CKM.1
FCS_COP.1[AES]                         FDP_ITC.1 or FDP_ITC.2, or FCS_                                               See discussion below
                                       CKM.1
                                       FCS_CKM.4
FCS_CKM.4[AES]                         FDP_ITC.1 or FDP_ITC.2, or FCS_                                               See discussion below
                                       CKM.1
FDP_ACC.1[MEM]                         FDP_ACF.1                                                                     Yes, by FDP_ACF.1[MEM]
FDP_ACC.1[SFR]                         FDP_ACF.1                                                                     Yes, by FDP_ACF.1[SFR]
FDP_ACF.1[MEM]                         FDP_ACC.1                                                                     Yes, by FDP_ACC.1[MEM]
                                       FMT_MSA.3                                                                     Yes, by FMT_MSA.3[MEM]
FDP_ACF.1[SFR]                         FDP_ACC.1                                                                     Yes, by FDP_ACC.1[SFR]
                                       FMT_MSA.3                                                                     Yes, by FMT_MSA.3[SFR]
FMT_MSA.3[MEM]                         FMT_MSA.1                                                                     Yes, by FMT_MSA.1[MEM]
                                       FMT_SMR.1                                                                     See discussion below
FMT_MSA.3[SFR]                         FMT_MSA.1                                                                     Yes, by FMT_MSA.1[SFR]
                                       FMT_SMR.1                                                                     See discussion below
FMT_MSA.1[MEM]                         FDP_ACC.1 or FDP_IFC.1                                                        Yes, by FDP_ACC.1[MEM]
                                       FMT_SMR.1                                                                     See discussion below
                                       FMT_SMF.1                                                                     Yes, by FMT_SMF.1[HW]
FMT_MSA.1[SFR]                         FDP_ACC.1 or FDP_IFC.1                                                        Yes, by FDP_ACC.1[SFR]
                                       FMT_SMR.1                                                                     See discussion below
                                       FMT_SMF.1                                                                     Yes, by FMT_SMF.1[HW]




P6022y VB                               All information provided in this document is subject to legal disclaimers.                      © NXP B.V. 2018. All rights reserved.

Evaluation document                                     Rev. 2.1 — 6 April 2018
PUBLIC                                                                                                                                                          73 / 101
NXP Semiconductors
                                                                                                                                   P6022y VB
                                                                                                                                     Security Target Lite


Security Functional Requirement        Dependencies                                                                  Fulfilled by security requirements in
                                                                                                                     this ST
FCS_COP.1[PUF_AES]                     FDP_ITC.1, or FDP_ITC.2 or FCS_                                               Yes, by FCS_CKM.1[PUF]
                                       CKM.1                                                                         Yes, by FCS_CKM.4[PUF]
                                       FCS_CKM.4
FCS_COP.1[PUF_MAC]                     FDP_ITC.1, or FDP_ITC.2 or FCS_                                               Yes, by FCS_CKM.1[PUF]
                                       CKM.1                                                                         Yes, by FCS_CKM.4[PUF]
                                       FCS_CKM.4
FCS_CKM.1[PUF]                         FCS_CKM.2 or FCS_COP.1                                                        Yes, by FCS_COP.1[PUF_AES]
                                       FCS_CKM.4                                                                     Yes, by FCS_CKM.4[PUF]
FCS_CKM.4[PUF]                         FDP_ITC.1 or FDP_ITC.2 or FCS_                                                Yes, by FCS_CKM.1[PUF]
                                       CKM.1

                        The developer of the Security IC Embedded Software must ensure that the
                        additional security functional requirements FCS_COP.1[TDES], FCS_CKM.4[TDES],
                        FCS_COP.1[AES] and FCS_CKM.4[AES] are used as specified and that the User Data
                        processed by the related security functionality is protected as defined for the application
                        context.
                        The dependent requirements of FCS_COP.1[TDES], FCS_CKM.4[TDES],
                        FCS_COP.1[AES] and FCS_CKM.4[AES] completely address the appropriate
                        management of cryptographic keys used by the specified cryptographic function and
                        the management of access control rights as specified for the memory access control
                        function. All requirements concerning these management functions shall be fulfilled by
                        the environment (Security IC Embedded Software).
                        The dependency FMT_SMR.1 introduced by the two components FMT_MSA.1 and
                        FMT_MSA.3 must be fulfilled by the Security IC Embedded Software. The definition and
                        maintenance of the roles that act on behalf of the functions provided by the hardware
                        must be subject of the Security IC Embedded Software.


               6.3.3 Rationale for the Security Assurance Requirements


              6.3.3.1   NXP Secure Smart Card Controller P6022y VB
                        The selection of assurance components is based on the underlying PP [6]. The Security
                        Target for the P6022y VB uses the same augmentations as the PP, but chooses a higher
                        assurance level. The level EAL6 is chosen in order to meet assurance expectations of
                        digital signature applications and electronic payment systems.
                        The rationale for the augmentations is the same as in the PP. The assurance level EAL6
                        is an elaborated pre-defined level of the CC, part 3 [3]. The assurance components in an
                        EAL level are chosen in a way that they build a mutually supportive and complete set of
                        components. The requirements chosen for augmentation do not add any dependencies,
                        which are not already fulfilled for the corresponding requirements contained in EAL6,
                        respectively. Therefore, these components add additional assurance to EAL6, but the
                        mutual support of the requirements is still guaranteed.
                        As stated in the Section 6.3.3 of the PP [6], it has to be assumed that attackers with high
                        attack potential try to attack smartcards used for digital signature applications or payment
                        systems. Therefore specifically AVA_VAN.5 was chosen by the PP [6] in order to assure
                        that even these attackers cannot successfully attack the P6022y VB.

P6022y VB                               All information provided in this document is subject to legal disclaimers.                      © NXP B.V. 2018. All rights reserved.

Evaluation document                                     Rev. 2.1 — 6 April 2018
PUBLIC                                                                                                                                                          74 / 101
NXP Semiconductors
                                                                                                                    P6022y VB
                                                                                                                    Security Target Lite



               6.3.4 Security Requirements are Internally Consistent


              6.3.4.1   NXP Secure Smart Card Controller P6022y VB
                        The discussion of security functional requirements and assurance requirements in the
                        preceding sections has shown that mutual support and consistency are given for both
                        groups of requirements. The arguments given for the fact that the assurance components
                        are adequate for the functionality of the P6022y VB also show that the security functional
                        requirements and assurance requirements support each other and that there are no
                        inconsistencies between these groups.
                        The security functional requirements FDP_SDC.1 and FDP_SDI.2 address the
                        protection of user data in the specified memory areas against compromise and
                        manipulation. The security functional requirements required to meet the security
                        objectives O.Leak-Inherent, O.Phys-Probing, O.Malfunction, O.Phys-Manipulation and
                        O.Leak-Forced also protect the cryptographic algorithms, the integrity support of data
                        stored in EEPROM and the memory access/separation control function as well as the
                        access control to Special Function Register implemented according to the security
                        functional requirement FCS_COP.1[TDES], FCS_CKM.4[TDES], FCS_COP.1[AES],
                        FCS_CKM.4[AES], FDP_SDI.2[HW], FDP_SDI.2[FW], FDP_SDI.2[EEPROM],
                        FDP_SDI.2[RAM], FDP_SDI.2[ROM], FDP_SDC.1[EEPROM], FDP_SDC.1[RAM], and
                        FDP_ACC.1[MEM], FDP_ACC.1[SFR] with reference to the Access Control Policies
                        defined in FDP_ACF.1[MEM] and FDP_ACF.1[SFR]. Therefore, these security functional
                        requirements support the secure implementation and operation of FCS_COP.1[TDES],
                        FCS_CKM.4[TDES], FCS_COP.1[AES], FCS_CKM.4[AES] and of FDP_ACC.1 with
                        FDP_ACF.1 as well as the dependent security functional requirements.
                        A hardware platform including the IC Dedicated Software requires Security IC Embedded
                        Software to build a secure product. Thereby the Security IC Embedded Software must
                        support the security functionality of the hardware as well as the IC Dedicated Support
                        Software and implement a sufficient management of the security services implemented
                        by the hardware platform including the IC Dedicated Software. The realisation of the
                        Security Functional Requirements within the P6022y VB provides a good balance
                        between flexible configuration and restrictions to ensure a secure behaviour of the
                        P6022y VB.




P6022y VB                              All information provided in this document is subject to legal disclaimers.     © NXP B.V. 2018. All rights reserved.

Evaluation document                                    Rev. 2.1 — 6 April 2018
PUBLIC                                                                                                                                        75 / 101
NXP Semiconductors
                                                                                                                     P6022y VB
                                                                                                                     Security Target Lite


7       TOE Summary Specification
                        This chapter is composed of sections “Portions of the TOE Security Functionality” and
                        “TOE Summary Specification Rationale”.


                 7.1 Portions of the TOE Security Functionality
                        The TOE Security Functionality (TSF) directly corresponds to the TOE security functional
                        requirements defined in Section 6. The Security Functionality provided by the TOE
                        P6022y VB is split into Security Services (SS) and Security Features (SF). Both are
                        active and applicable to phases 4 to 7 of the Security IC product life-cycle.
                        Note: Parts of the security functionality are configured at the end of phase 3 and all
                        security functionality is active after phase 3 or phase 4 depending on the delivery form.
                        The TOE also comprises security mechanisms, which are not listed as security
                        functionality in the following. Such mechanisms do not implement a complete Security
                        Services or Security Features. They can be used to implement further Security Services
                        and/or Security Features based on Security IC Embedded Software using these security
                        mechanisms, e.g. the Fame2 coprocessor for asymmetric cryptographic algorithms.


               7.1.1 Security Services of the TOE

              7.1.1.1   NXP Secure Smart Card Controller P6022y VB
                        SS.RNG: Random Number Generator
                        The Random Number Generator continuously produces random numbers with a
                        length of one byte. The P6022y VB implements SS.RNG by means of a physical
                        hardware Random Number Generator working stable within the valid ranges of operating
                        conditions, which are guaranteed by SF.OPC.
                        The TSF provides a hardware test functionality, which can be used by the Security
                        IC Embedded Software to hardware detects or bad quality of the produced random
                        numbers.
                        According to AIS31 [7] the Random Number Generator claims the functionality class
                        PTG2. This means that the Random Number Generator is suitable for generation of
                        signature key pairs, generation of session keys for symmetric encryption mechanisms,
                        random padding bits, zero-knowledge proofs, the generation of seeds for DRNGs and
                        fulfils the online test requirements defined in [7].
                        SS.TDES: Triple-DES coprocessor
                        The P6022y VB provides the Triple Data Encryption Standard (Triple-DES) according
                        to the Data Encryption Standard (DES) [23]. SS.TDES is a modular basic cryptographic
                        function, which provides the Triple-DES algorithm as defined by NIST SP 800-67 [23]
                        by means of a hardware coprocessor and supports (a) the 3-key Triple-DES algorithm
                        according to keying option 1 and (b) the 2-key Triple-DES algorithm according to keying
                        option 2 in NIST SP 800-67 [23]. The two/three 56-bit keys (112-/168-bit) for the 2-key/3-
                        key Triple-DES algorithm shall be provided by the Security IC Embedded Software.
                        SS.TDES also supports hardware XOR-operation of two data blocks to support chaining
                        modes of the encryption of Triple-DES if this is configured by the Security IC Embedded


P6022y VB                               All information provided in this document is subject to legal disclaimers.     © NXP B.V. 2018. All rights reserved.

Evaluation document                                     Rev. 2.1 — 6 April 2018
PUBLIC                                                                                                                                         76 / 101
NXP Semiconductors
                                                                                                                    P6022y VB
                                                                                                                    Security Target Lite


                        Software. Note that the hardware support for the CBC mode of SS.TDES is limited to
                        encryption.
                        SS.AES: AES coprocessor
                        The P6022y VB provides the Advanced Encryption Standard (AES) algorithm according
                        to the Advanced Encryption Standard as defined by FIPS PUB 197 [20]. SS.AES is a
                        modular basic cryptographic function, which provides the AES algorithm by means of a
                        hardware coprocessor and supports the AES algorithm with three different key lengths of
                        128, 192 or 256 bit. The keys for the AES algorithm shall be provided by the Security IC
                        Embedded Software.
                        SS.AES also supports hardware XOR-operation of two data blocks to support chaining
                        modes of the encryption of AES if this is configured by the Security IC Embedded
                        Software. Note that the hardware support for the CBC mode of SS.AES is limited to
                        encryption.
                        SS.RECONFIG: Post Delivery Configuration
                        SS.RECONFIG realizes the Post Delivery Configuration. The Hardware Post Delivery
                        Configuration can be used by the customer to set the accessible size of the EEPROM
                        and CXRAM and to enable or disable the Fame2 coprocessor, the AES coprocessor
                        and the contactless interface. The configuration values of the Hardware Post Delivery
                        Configuration options are stored in a special area in the Security Row (see SF.COMP).
                        Note that if the Fame2 coprocessor and the AES coprocessor are disabled, both will no
                        longer be available to the Security IC Embedded Software and attempting to use it will
                        raise an exception. This means the availability of SS.AES is configurable.
                        The customer can change the values of Hardware Post Delivery Configuration through
                        invoking the Hardware Post Delivery Configuration functionality in Firmware Operating
                        System (see SF.MEM_ACC). This functionality is invoked by using the FVEC interface
                        (FVEC0.15).
                        The customer can change these values as many times as he wishes. However, once he
                        calls this Firmware Operating System using FVEC0.15 with a certain parameter set to a
                        specific value, the options are locked permanently, and can no longer be changed. The
                        options must be locked before the P6022y VB is delivered to the customer before phase
                        7 of the Security IC product life-cycle.


               7.1.2 Security Features
                        In this section, the security features of the TOE P6022y VB are described.


              7.1.2.1   NXP Secure Smart Card Controller P6022y VB
                        SF.OPC: Control of Operating Conditions
                        SF.OPC ensures correct operation of the P6022y VB (functions offered by the
                        microcontroller including the standard CPU as well as the Triple-DES coprocessor, AES
                        coprocessor, the arithmetic coprocessor, the memories, registers, I/O interfaces and the
                        other system peripherals) during execution of the IC Dedicated Support Software and
                        Security IC Embedded Software. This includes all security mechanisms of the P6022y
                        VB, which directly contribute to a Security Service or a Security Feature.
                        The P6022y VB ensures its correct operation and prevents any malfunction using the
                        following mechanisms: filtering of power supply, clock frequency and reset input as well
                        as monitoring of voltage supply, clock frequency input and the temperature of the chip
P6022y VB                              All information provided in this document is subject to legal disclaimers.     © NXP B.V. 2018. All rights reserved.

Evaluation document                                    Rev. 2.1 — 6 April 2018
PUBLIC                                                                                                                                        77 / 101
NXP Semiconductors
                                                                                                                   P6022y VB
                                                                                                                   Security Target Lite


                      by means of sensors. There are multiple voltage and frequency sensors for the different
                      ISO/IEC 7816 voltage classes and the contactless operation mode. Light sensors are
                      distributed over the chip surface and used to detect light attacks. In addition to the light
                      sensors the EEPROM provides two functions to detect light attacks. The Security IC
                      Embedded Software can enable/disable the EEPROM double read function.
                      Specific functional units of the P6022y VB are equipped with further fault injection
                      detection. This comprises the Secure Fetch for the processing of code and data by the
                      CPU or special circuitry within a functional unit. The functional units are the Program
                      Counter, the stack pointer, the CPU control register, the MMU address cache and control
                      registers, the SBC interface for the Triple-DES and the AES coprocessors, the Fame2
                      coprocessor, Copy Machine control registers and hardware configuration as well as test
                      control registers. Furthermore the P6022y VB contains a watchdog timer which can be
                      enabled and configured by the Security IC Embedded Software to protect the program
                      execution.
                      If one of the monitored parameters is out of the specified range, either (i) a reset is forced
                      and the actually running program is aborted or (ii) an exception is raised which interrupts
                      the program flow and allows a reaction of the Security IC Embedded Software. In case
                      minor configuration option “Inverse EEPROM Error Correction” is enabled (see Section
                      1.4.2.2) the probability to detect fault injection attack detectors at the EEPROM memory
                      and interface increases and the error correction logic raises an exception when detecting
                      an error. The RAM memory is equipped with additional parity bits which are checked
                      when the corresponding data stored in RAM is read. Additionally a RAM parity watchdog
                      mechanism is supported which checks the parity bits of the complete RAM in random
                      order when the Security IC Embedded Software is not accessing the RAM. In case of
                      detected RAM parity attack detectors both mechanisms trigger a security reset. In case
                      the P6022y VB processes a reset all components of the P6022y VB are initialised with
                      their reset values and the P6022y VB provides a reset cause indicator to the Security IC
                      Embedded Software. In the case an exception is raised an indicator for the reason of the
                      exception is provided. The P6022y VB defends the sensors from being disabled by the
                      Security IC Embedded Software.
                      The P6022y VB controls the specified range of the stack pointer. The stack pointer and
                      the related control logic are implemented threefold for the User Mode, System Mode
                      and Super System Mode (comprising Boot Mode, Test Mode and Firmware Mode). An
                      exception is generated in case the specified limits are exceeded.
                      In addition, SF.OPC comprises a sensor, which checks the high voltage of the write
                      process to the EEPROM during each write sequence. The result of this sensor must
                      be read from a Special Function Register and does not force an automatic event (e.g.
                      exception).
                      SF.PHY: Protection against Physical Manipulation
                      SF.PHY protects the P6022y VB against manipulation of (i) the IC hardware, (ii) the
                      IC Dedicated Software in ROM, (iii) the Security IC Embedded Software in ROM and
                      EEPROM, (iv) the Application Data in EEPROM and RAM including TSF data in the
                      Security Rows. It also protects User Data and TSF data against disclosure by physical
                      probing when stored or while being processed by the P6022y VB.
                      The protection of the P6022y VB comprises several security mechanisms in design and
                      construction, which make reverse-engineering and tamper attacks more difficult. These
                      mechanisms comprise dedicated shielding techniques for the P6022y VB and specific
                      encryption- and check mechanisms for the memories and internal buses. SF.PHY
                      supports the efficiency of other portions of the security functionality.

P6022y VB                             All information provided in this document is subject to legal disclaimers.     © NXP B.V. 2018. All rights reserved.

Evaluation document                                   Rev. 2.1 — 6 April 2018
PUBLIC                                                                                                                                       78 / 101
NXP Semiconductors
                                                                                                                  P6022y VB
                                                                                                                  Security Target Lite


                      SF.PHY also supports the integrity of the EEPROM, RAM and the ROM. The EEPROM
                      is able to correct a 1-bit error within each byte. The EEPROM corrects these attack
                      detectors automatically without user interaction. The RAM and the ROM provide a parity
                      check. In both cases a reset is forced based on a parity error.
                      The CRC coprocessor is used in Boot Mode by the IC dedicated Software for calculation
                      of a CRC checksum for integrity protection of TSF data.
                      SF.PUF: User Data Protection using PUF
                      SF.PUF implements a mechanism to seal/unseal the user data stored in shared
                      memory against unintended disclosure. SF.PUF encrypts/decrypts the user data with
                      a cryptographic key derived from the PUF data. SF.PUF calculates a MAC as a PUF
                      authentication value. SF.PUF provides this sealing/unsealing mechanism through the
                      specified interfaces FVEC2 (see Fig. 2) only.
                      SF.LOG: Logical Protection
                      SF.LOG implements security mechanisms to limit or eliminate the information in the
                      shape and amplitude of signals or in the time between events, which might be found by
                      measuring such signals. This comprises the power supply, signals on other pads, which
                      are not intentionally used for communication by the terminal or the Security IC Embedded
                      Software as well as emanation of the hardware platform. Thereby SF.LOG prevents from
                      disclosure of User Data and TSF data stored and/or processed in the Security IC through
                      measurement of power consumption or emanation and subsequent complex signal
                      analysis. This protection of the P6022y VB is enforced by several security mechanisms in
                      the design, which support these portions of security functionality.
                      The Triple-DES coprocessor includes specific security mechanisms to prevent SPA/
                      DPA analysis of shape and amplitude of the power consumption and emanation. The
                      implementation of the Triple-DES coprocessor further ensures that the calculation time is
                      independent from the chosen key value and plain/cipher text.
                      The AES coprocessor includes specific security mechanisms to prevent SPA/DPA
                      analysis of shape and amplitude of the power consumption and emanation. The
                      implementation of the AES coprocessor further ensures that the calculation time is
                      independent from the chosen key any plain/cipher text for a given key length.
                      The Fame2 coprocessor provides measures to prevent timing attacks on basic modular
                      function. The calculation time of an operation depends on the lengths of the operands,
                      but not on the value of the operands, with the following exceptions: multiplication with
                      reduction, modular inversion and modular division. These three operations have no
                      constant timing due to correction cycles that are needed based on the calculation
                      method. In addition, mechanisms are included, which provide limitations of the capability
                      for the analysis of shape and amplitude of the power consumption. Of course the Fame2
                      coprocessor does not realise an algorithm on its own and algorithm-specific leakage
                      countermeasures have to be added by the Security IC Embedded Software when using
                      the Fame2 coprocessor.
                      Additional security mechanisms can be configured by the Security IC Embedded
                      Software. This comprises the configuration of the clock that can be used to prevent the
                      synchronisation between internal operations and external clock or characteristics of the
                      power consumption that can be used as trigger signal to support leakage attacks (DPA or
                      timing attacks)
                      Some mechanisms described for SF.PHY (e.g. the encryption mechanisms) and for
                      SF.OPC (e.g. the filter mechanisms) support SF.LOG.
                      SF.COMP: Protection of Mode Control
P6022y VB                            All information provided in this document is subject to legal disclaimers.     © NXP B.V. 2018. All rights reserved.

Evaluation document                                  Rev. 2.1 — 6 April 2018
PUBLIC                                                                                                                                      79 / 101
NXP Semiconductors
                                                                                                                   P6022y VB
                                                                                                                   Security Target Lite


                      SF.COMP provides control of the CPU mode for (i) Boot Mode, (ii) Test Mode and
                      (iii) Firmware Mode. This includes protection of electronic fuses stored in a protected
                      memory area, the so-called Security Rows, and the possibility to store initialisation or
                      pre-personalisation data in the so-called FabKey Area.
                      Control of the CPU mode for Boot Mode, Test Mode and Firmware Mode prevents abuse
                      of test functions after TOE delivery. It also inhibits abuse of features, which are used
                      during start-up or reset to configure the P6022y VB.
                      The integrity control of electronic fuses ensures secure storage and setup of
                      configuration and calibration data, during the start-up in Boot Mode. The protection
                      of electronic fuses especially ensures that configuration options with regard to the
                      security functionality cannot be changed, abused or influenced in any way. The transfer
                      of the content of the electronic fuses into the related hardware configuration registers
                      is protected by a CRC checksum generated using the CRC coprocessor. SF.COMP
                      ensures that activation or deactivation of security mechanisms cannot be influenced by
                      the Security IC Embedded Software so that the TSF provides self-protection against
                      interference and tampering by untrusted Security IC Embedded Software.
                      SF.COMP protects CPU mode switches regarding Boot Mode, Test Mode and Firmware
                      Mode in the following way: Switching from Boot Mode to Test Mode or Firmware Mode is
                      allowed, switching from these modes back to Boot Mode is prevented. Switching to Test
                      Mode is prevented as well after TOE delivery, because Test Mode then is permanently
                      disabled. SF.COMP also ensures that Boot Mode is active only in the boot phase during
                      start-up or reset of the P6022y VB, and cannot be invoked afterwards. Therefore, once
                      the P6022y VB has left the test phase and each time the P6022y VB completed start-up
                      or reset, Firmware Mode is the only Super System Mode available.
                      The TSF controls access to the Security Rows, the top-most 512 Bytes of the EEPROM
                      memory, accessible at reserved addresses in the memory map. The available EEPROM
                      memory space for the Security IC Embedded Software is reduced by this area.
                      SF.COMP provides three memory areas in the Security Rows, which can be used by the
                      Security IC Embedded Software. These are
                      • the User Read Only Area
                      • the User Write Protected Area and
                      • the User Write Once Area.
                      The User Read Only Area contains 32 bytes, which are read-only for the Security IC
                      Embedded Software. The User Write Protected area contains 16 bytes, which can be
                      write-protected by the Security IC Embedded Software on demand. The User Write Once
                      Area contains 32 bytes of which each bit can separately be set to ‘1’ once only, and not
                      reset to ‘0’.
                      SF.COMP also provides a memory area in the Security Row where the current values
                      for the Post Delivery Configuration (see SS.RECONFIG). This area cannot be accessed
                      by the Security IC Embedded Software, but it can be accessed by the Resource
                      Configuration Firmware.
                      If minor configuration option “Card Disable” feature is used (refer to section 1.4.2.2)
                      SF.COMP inhibits any start-up of the Security IC Embedded Software once the Security
                      IC Embedded Software disables the card.
                      If minor configuration option “EEPROM application content erase” is used (see Section
                      1.4.2.2) SF.COMP erases the application data stored in the EEPROM once the Security
                      IC Embedded Software has activated this security feature.


P6022y VB                             All information provided in this document is subject to legal disclaimers.     © NXP B.V. 2018. All rights reserved.

Evaluation document                                   Rev. 2.1 — 6 April 2018
PUBLIC                                                                                                                                       80 / 101
NXP Semiconductors
                                                                                                                  P6022y VB
                                                                                                                  Security Target Lite


                      SF.COMP also provides the FabKey Area where initialisation and identification data can
                      be stored. The FabKey area does not belong to the Security Rows and is not protected
                      by hardware mechanisms. The FabKey Area as well as the Security Rows can be used
                      by SF.COMP to store a unique identification for each die.
                      The complete EEPROM is initialized during wafer testing and pre-personalisation. The
                      values for the Security Row depend on the configuration options and choice of the
                      Security IC Embedded Software developer. The values for the application EEPROM
                      depend on the choice of the Security IC Embedded Software developer and are
                      included in the Order Entry Form. The User Write Protected Area and the User Write
                      Once Area are designed to store the identification of a (fully personalised) Security IC
                      (e.g. smartcard) or a sequence of events over the life-cycle, that can be coded by an
                      increasing number of bits set to "one" or protecting bytes, respectively.
                      SF.COMP limits the capabilities of the test functions and provides test personnel during
                      phase 3 with the capability to store identification and/or pre-personalisation data and/or
                      supplements of the Security IC Embedded Software in the EEPROM. SF.COMP provides
                      self-protection against interference and tampering by untrusted subjects both in the Test
                      Mode and in the other modes. It also enforces the separation of domains regarding the
                      IC Dedicated Software and the Security IC Embedded Software.
                      SF.MEM_ACC: Memory Access Control
                      SF.MEM_ACC controls access of any subject (program code comprising processor
                      instructions) to the memories of the P6022y VB through the Memory Management Unit.
                      Memory access is based on virtual addresses that are mapped to physical addresses.
                      The CPU always uses virtual addresses. The Memory Management Unit performs the
                      translation from virtual to physical addresses and the physical addresses are passed
                      from the Memory Management Unit to the memory interfaces to access the memories.
                      Access control is conducted in two ways:
                      • Memory partitioning: Each memory type ROM, RAM and EEPROM is partitioned into
                        two parts. In Boot Mode and Firmware Mode the CPU has access to the Firmware
                        EEPROM, Firmware RAM and Test-ROM. In System Mode and User Mode the CPU
                        has access to the Application EEPROM, Application RAM and Application ROM.
                        Access to both parts of each type is allowed in Test Mode for testing.
                      • Memory segmentation in User Mode: The three accessible parts of the memory in
                        ROM, RAM and EEPROM can be segmented into smaller memory areas. Access
                        rights (read/write or execute) can be defined for these segments. The operation read
                        and write are considered as one kind of operation, if one is allowed, so is the other.
                        However, in general the access to a segment can be denied.
                        In addition, access rights to Special Function Registers related to hardware
                        components can be defined for code executed in User Mode.
                      Memory partitioning is fixed and cannot be changed. It is determined during
                      production of the P6022y VB and is solely dependent on the major configuration (see
                      Section 1.4.2.1.1) and Post Delivery Configuration (see Section 1.4.2.3.1).
                      Memory segmentation can be defined in System Mode. The segmentation is active when
                      the CPU switches to User Mode. The segments, their access rights and the access
                      rights to Special Function Registers related to hardware components are defined in the
                      MMU Segment Table. The MMU Segment Table stores five values for each segment:
                      The memory access rights, the virtual start address of the segment, the virtual end
                      address of the segment, the address offset for the segment and the access rights to
                      Special Function Registers for code that is executed in the segment. The address offset
                      is used to relocate the segment anywhere in the memory map. The resulting address
                      computed by the Memory Management Unit can not overrule memory partitioning. Up
P6022y VB                            All information provided in this document is subject to legal disclaimers.     © NXP B.V. 2018. All rights reserved.

Evaluation document                                  Rev. 2.1 — 6 April 2018
PUBLIC                                                                                                                                      81 / 101
NXP Semiconductors
                                                                                                                  P6022y VB
                                                                                                                  Security Target Lite


                      to 64 segments can be defined in the MMU Segment Table. Special configurations of
                      the memory access rights allow to specify less than 64 segments and to split the MMU
                      Segment Table into several parts being stored at different locations in memory.
                      Note that the MMU Segment Table itself is stored in the memory and therefore the table
                      itself can be placed in a segment accessible in User Mode.
                      In addition, SF.MEM_ACC permanently checks whether accessed addresses point to
                      physically implemented memory. Any access outside the boundaries of the physical
                      implemented memory in all CPU modes except the Test Mode and access to forbidden
                      memory addresses in User Mode are notified by raising an exception.
                      The Memory Management Unit also handles access rights to Special Function Registers
                      related to hardware components for code running in Firmware Mode. The configuration
                      of the access rights for User Mode and Firmware Mode are used by SF.SFR_ACC to
                      grant or block access to the related Special Function Registers. The access rights can
                      be defined for up to 16 groups of Special Function Registers, which are related to 16
                      hardware peripherals or memories described in [9], section 12.4. Thus, User Mode
                      and Firmware Mode can be restricted in their access to the Special Function Registers
                      related to hardware components on demand of the Security IC Embedded Software.
                      Note that SF.MEM_ACC only provides the access rights to SF.SFR_ACC, the access
                      control is enforced by SF.SFR_ACC.
                      SF.SFR_ACC: Special Function Register Access Control
                      SF.SFR_ACC controls access to the Special Function Registers and CPU mode
                      switches based on specific Special Function Register. SF.SFR_ACC implements access
                      control to the Special Function Registers as specified in the Access Control Policy and
                      the Security Functional Requirements FDP_ACC.1[SFR] and FDP_ACF.1[SFR].
                      The function of the Special Function Register and the CPU mode determine, whether
                      read and/or write access to a Special Function Register is allowed or not. Key registers
                      cannot be read since they are write-only to support the confidentiality of keys. Write
                      access is granted depending on the CPU mode. Similar for the output register of the
                      Random Number Generator, which is read-only based on its function, and read access is
                      granted based on the CPU mode.
                      SF.SFR_ACC controls accesses to Special Function Registers. If the access is not
                      allowed or the Special Function Register addressed by the code is not implemented an
                      exception is triggered. The Security IC Embedded Software can react on this exception.
                      Some Special Function Registers are implemented threefold, one for User Mode, a
                      second one for System Mode and a third one for Super System Mode meaning Boot
                      Mode, Test Mode and Firmware Mode. Hence, such Special Function Registers are
                      inherently separated and enforce the separation between the CPU modes.
                      SF.SFR_ACC relies on access rights to Special Function Registers related to hardware
                      components, which are provided by SF.MEM_ACC. Access rights to all other Special
                      Function Registers are pre-defined and cannot be configured by the code running on the
                      hardware platform.
                      This implies that code running in User Mode or Firmware Mode is not able to use
                      SS.RNG, SS.TDES, and SS.AES until access to the respective group of Special Function
                      Registers is explicitly granted by code running in System Mode. This holds for all 16
                      hardware components, which are controlled by the 16 groups of Special Function
                      Registers related to hardware components.
                      SF.SFR_ACC also implements transitions among CPU modes based on specific Special
                      Function Register.
P6022y VB                            All information provided in this document is subject to legal disclaimers.     © NXP B.V. 2018. All rights reserved.

Evaluation document                                  Rev. 2.1 — 6 April 2018
PUBLIC                                                                                                                                      82 / 101
NXP Semiconductors
                                                                                                                  P6022y VB
                                                                                                                  Security Target Lite


                      The CPU mode changes by the following operations.
                      • Call of a system call vector (SVEC) address or a firmware vector (FVEC) address. A
                        call of a SVEC enables System Mode, a call of a FVEC sets enables Firmware Mode.
                        Calls of SVEC addresses are allowed in User Mode only, otherwise an exception is
                        raised.
                      • Execution of an exception or interrupt. Any event that leads to the execution of an
                        exception leads to a special status of the related CPU mode. Any further exception in
                        this special status forces a reset. Interrupts can be executed in User Mode or in System
                        Mode as well as in Firmware Mode. The Security IC Embedded Software running in
                        System Mode can configure this option at run time.
                      • Return from an exception/interrupt or vector call with a RETI instruction. This restores
                        the CPU mode before the event occurred. A RETI in User Mode is allowed only in case
                        interrupts are allowed to be executed in User Mode and an interrupt is actually active,
                        otherwise an exception is raised.
                      • Execution of an LCALL/ACALL/ECALL instruction to a specific address. A call of
                        address 0x800000 in System Mode enables User Mode and starts execution at this
                        (virtual) address. This is similar to a FVEC or SVEC call, but no return address is
                        pushed onto the stack.
                      • Direct modification of the specific Special Function Register. Hardware provided by
                        SF.SFR_ACC ensures that the bits can only be cleared. Therefore it is not possible
                        for code running in User Mode to enter System Mode, but System Mode can switch to
                        User Mode.
                      Two CPU modes are available to the Security IC Embedded Software, which are System
                      Mode and User Mode. System Mode is the more privileged CPU mode since it allows
                      access to all Special Function Registers related to hardware components and for system
                      management (i.e. configuration of Memory Management Unit, clock settings and some
                      mechanisms provided by SF.LOG). User Mode is the less privileged, but in regard to
                      hardware components it can be made as powerful as System Mode.
                      SF.SFR_ACC and SF.COMP together ensure that other CPU modes are not available
                      to the Security IC Embedded Software, but reserved for specific purposes fulfilled by the
                      IC Dedicated Software. As described above, SF.MEM_ACC provides the access control
                      information to Special Function Registers related to hardware components in Firmware
                      Mode and User Mode.
                      SF.FFW: Firmware Firewall
                      SF.FFW (Protected Firmware Mode) implements a mechanism to protect the application
                      data of the different firmware applications (NXP firmware functionality) running in
                      Firmware Mode by means of a firewall separating the application data between each
                      other. The firewall mechanism is based on the security features SF.MEM_ACC and
                      SF.SFR_ACC.
                      SF.FIRMWARE: Firmware Support
                      SF.FIRMWARE (Firmware Operating System) implements specific basic support
                      functionality for the Security IC Embedded Software. The basic support functionality is
                      implemented in a way that the protection and separation of the different type of User
                      Data is enforced. The security feature SF.FIRMWARE is based on the security features
                      SF.MEM_ACC, SF.SFR_ACC and SF.FFW.




P6022y VB                            All information provided in this document is subject to legal disclaimers.     © NXP B.V. 2018. All rights reserved.

Evaluation document                                  Rev. 2.1 — 6 April 2018
PUBLIC                                                                                                                                      83 / 101
NXP Semiconductors
                                                                                                                        P6022y VB
                                                                                                                        Security Target Lite



              7.1.2.2 NXP Secure Smart Card Controller P6022M VB/P6022D VB/P6022J VB
                        The security features of the P6022M VB/P6022D VB/P6022J VB include the security
                        features of the P6022P VB/P6022X VB, except for SF.FFW and SF.FIRMWARE. The
                        security features SF.FFW and SF.FIRMWARE of the P6022M VB/P6022D VB/P6022J
                        VB are described in this section.
                        SF.FFW: Firmware Firewall
                        SF.FFW (Protected Firmware Mode) implements a mechanism to protect the application
                        data of the different firmware applications (NXP firmware functionality and MIFARE
                        Software) runni                                                                         - Applet ROM masking added.




© IDEMIA. All rights reserved.




Specifications and information are subject to change without notice.

The products described in this document are subject to continuous development and improvement.

All trademarks and service marks referred to herein, whether registered or not in specific countries, are the properties of their respective owners.




                                                      - Printed versions of this document are uncontrolled -
                                    Security Target Lite
                                                                                                                  Ref.:
                             IDeal Pass v2.3-n JC with Privacy
                                                                                                            2018_2000036361
                             Protection (SAC/EAC/Polymorphic
                                                                                                               Page: 3/150
                                   eMRTD Configuration)

Table of Contents

 TABLE OF CONTENTS ....................................................................................................... 3

 TABLE OF FIGURES .......................................................................................................... 6

 TABLE OF TABLES ............................................................................................................. 7

 1            ST INTRODUCTION ............................................................................................... 8
     1.1    ST IDENTIFICATION .......................................................................................................... 8
     1.2    TOE REFERENCE .............................................................................................................. 9
     1.3    TOE OVERVIEW............................................................................................................... 9
     1.4    TOE DESCRIPTION ..........................................................................................................11
       1.4.1    TOE Definition ......................................................................................................11
       1.4.2    TOE usage and security features for operational use ...............................................12
       1.4.3    TOE life cycle ........................................................................................................17
 2            CONFORMANCE CLAIMS ..................................................................................... 24
     2.1    CC CONFORMANCE CLAIM .................................................................................................24
     2.2    PP CLAIM ......................................................................................................................24
     2.3    PACKAGE CLAIM ..............................................................................................................25
     2.4    PP CONFORMANCE RATIONALE ...........................................................................................25
       2.4.1    Main aspects .........................................................................................................25
       2.4.2    Overview of differences between the PP and the ST ................................................25
 3            SECURITY PROBLEM DEFINITION ..................................................................... 27
     3.1    ASSETS .........................................................................................................................27
       3.1.1    Primary Assets travel document .............................................................................27
       3.1.2    Secondary Assets travel document .........................................................................28
       3.1.3    Additionals Assets .................................................................................................29
       3.1.4    Assets related to Polymorphic eMRTD ....................................................................29
     3.2    USERS / SUBJECTS...........................................................................................................30
       3.2.1    Subjects listed in PP PACE .....................................................................................30
       3.2.2    Additional Subjects ................................................................................................32
       3.2.3    Subjects related to Polymorphic eMRTD .................................................................33
     3.3    THREATS .......................................................................................................................36
       3.3.1    Threats listed in PP PACE .......................................................................................36
       3.3.2    Additional Threats .................................................................................................38
       3.3.3    Threats related to Polymorphic eMRTD ...................................................................39
     3.4    ORGANISATIONAL SECURITY POLICIES ..................................................................................40
       3.4.1    OSP listed in PP PACE ............................................................................................41
       3.4.2    Additional OSPs from PP EAC .................................................................................42
       3.4.3    OSPs related to Polymorphic eMRTD ......................................................................43
     3.5    ASSUMPTIONS ................................................................................................................45
       3.5.1    Assumptions listed in PP PACE ...............................................................................45
       3.5.2    Assumptions listed in PP EAC .................................................................................45
       3.5.3    Assumptions related to Active Authentication ..........................................................46
       3.5.4    Assumptions related to Polymorphic eMRTD ...........................................................46
 4            SECURITY OBJECTIVES ...................................................................................... 50
     4.1    SECURITY OBJECTIVES FOR THE TOE ...................................................................................50
       4.1.1    Security Objectives listed in PP PACE ......................................................................50
       4.1.2    Additional Security Objectives from PP EAC ............................................................52
                                   Security Target Lite
                                                                                                              Ref.:
                            IDeal Pass v2.3-n JC with Privacy
                                                                                                        2018_2000036361
                            Protection (SAC/EAC/Polymorphic
                                                                                                           Page: 4/150
                                  eMRTD Configuration)

      4.1.3    Security Objectives related to Polymorphic eMRTD ..................................................53
    4.2    SECURITY OBJECTIVES FOR THE OPERATIONAL ENVIRONMENT ....................................................55
      4.2.1    Issuing State or Organisation .................................................................................55
      4.2.2    Travel document Issuer and CSCA: travel document PKI (issuing) branch ................56
      4.2.3    Terminal operator: Terminal receiving branch .........................................................57
      4.2.4    Travel document holder Obligations .......................................................................58
      4.2.5    Receiving State or Organisation .............................................................................58
      4.2.6    Oes related to Polymorphic eMRTD ........................................................................60
    4.3    SECURITY OBJECTIVES RATIONALE ......................................................................................63
      4.3.1    Threats ................................................................................................................63
      4.3.2    Organisational Security Policies ..............................................................................67
      4.3.3    Assumptions .........................................................................................................69
      4.3.4    SPD and Security Objectives ..................................................................................71
5           EXTENDED REQUIREMENTS ............................................................................... 76
    5.1     DEFINITION OF THE FAMILY FAU_SAS .................................................................................76
    5.2     DEFINITION OF THE FAMILY FCS_RND ................................................................................76
    5.3     DEFINITION OF THE FAMILY FIA_API ..................................................................................77
    5.4     DEFINITION OF THE FAMILY FMT_LIM .................................................................................78
    5.5     DEFINITION OF THE FAMILY FPT_EMS .................................................................................80
6           SECURITY REQUIREMENTS ................................................................................ 81
    6.1    SECURITY FUNCTIONAL REQUIREMENTS ................................................................................81
      6.1.1    Class Cryptographic Support (FCS) .........................................................................83
      6.1.2    Class FIA Identification and Authentication .............................................................87
      6.1.3    Class FDP User Data Protection ..............................................................................95
      6.1.4    Class FTP Trusted Path/Channels ......................................................................... 100
      6.1.5    Class FAU Security Audit ...................................................................................... 101
      6.1.6    Class FMT Security Management .......................................................................... 101
      6.1.7    Class FPT Protection of the Security Functions ...................................................... 107
      6.1.8    Class FPR ........................................................................................................... 109
    6.2    SECURITY ASSURANCE REQUIREMENTS................................................................................ 110
    6.3    SECURITY REQUIREMENTS RATIONALE ................................................................................ 110
      6.3.1    Security Objectives for the TOE ........................................................................... 110
      6.3.2    Rationale tables of Security Objectives and SFRs................................................... 115
      6.3.3    Dependencies ..................................................................................................... 119
      6.3.4    Rationale for the Security Assurance Requirements ............................................... 122
      6.3.5    AVA_VAN.5 Advanced methodical vulnerability analysis ......................................... 123
      6.3.6    ALC_DVS.2 Sufficiency of security measures ......................................................... 123
7           TOE SUMMARY SPECIFICATION ....................................................................... 124
    7.1    TOE SUMMARY SPECIFICATION ......................................................................................... 124
      7.1.1    SF.IA Identification and Authentication ................................................................. 124
      7.1.2    SF.CF Cryptographic functions support ................................................................. 125
      7.1.3    SF.ILTB Protection against interference, logical tampering and bypass ................... 125
      7.1.4    SF.AC Access control / Storage and protection of logical travel document data ....... 126
      7.1.5    SF.SM Secure Messaging ..................................................................................... 126
      7.1.6    SF.LCM Security and life cycle management ......................................................... 126
    7.2    SFRS AND TSS............................................................................................................. 129
      7.2.1    SFRs and TSS - Rationale .................................................................................... 129
8           ANNEX .............................................................................................................. 138

GLOSSARY .................................................................................................................... 138
                               Security Target Lite
                                                                                                      Ref.:
                        IDeal Pass v2.3-n JC with Privacy
                                                                                                2018_2000036361
                        Protection (SAC/EAC/Polymorphic
                                                                                                   Page: 5/150
                              eMRTD Configuration)

ABBREVIATIONS .......................................................................................................... 149

REFERENCES ................................................................................................................ 149
                                Security Target Lite
                                                                                                Ref.:
                         IDeal Pass v2.3-n JC with Privacy
                                                                                          2018_2000036361
                         Protection (SAC/EAC/Polymorphic
                                                                                             Page: 6/150
                               eMRTD Configuration)

Table of figures
Figure 1: TOE ......................................................................................................12
Figure 2: TOE life-cycle .........................................................................................18
                                Security Target Lite
                                                                                                Ref.:
                         IDeal Pass v2.3-n JC with Privacy
                                                                                          2018_2000036361
                         Protection (SAC/EAC/Polymorphic
                                                                                             Page: 7/150
                               eMRTD Configuration)


Table of tables
Table 1 Threats and Security Objectives - Coverage .................................................71
Table 2 Security Objectives and Threats - Coverage .................................................72
Table 3 OSPs and Security Objectives - Coverage ....................................................73
Table 4 Security Objectives and OSPs - Coverage ....................................................74
Table 5 Assumptions and Security Objectives for the Operational Environment -
    Coverage .......................................................................................................75
Table 6 Security Objectives for the Operational Environment and Assumptions -
    Coverage .......................................................................................................75
Table 7 Security Objectives and SFRs - Coverage .................................................. 118
Table 8 SFRs Dependencies ................................................................................ 121
Table 9 SARs Dependencies ................................................................................ 122
                        Security Target Lite
                                                                    Ref.:
                 IDeal Pass v2.3-n JC with Privacy
                                                              2018_2000036361
                 Protection (SAC/EAC/Polymorphic
                                                                 Page: 8/150
                       eMRTD Configuration)

1 ST Introduction
The aim of this document is to describe the Security Target for IDeal Pass v2.3-n
JC with Privacy Protection (SAC/EAC/Polymorphic eMRTD Configuration), the
Machine Readable Travel Document (MRTD) with the ICAO application, Password
Authenticated Connection Establishment (covering PACE-GM, PACE-IM and PACE-
CAM), Extended Access Control and Polymorphic eMRTD on NXP JCOP 3 P60.

1.1 ST Identification
                Security Target Lite IDeal Pass v2.3-n JC with Privacy
Title
                Protection (SAC/EAC/Polymorphic eMRTD Configuration)
Reference       2018_2000036361
Version         1.1
Certification
                NSCIB
Body
Author          IDEMIA
CC Version      3.1 Revision 5
Assurance
                EAL5 augmented with ALC_DVS.2 and AVA_VAN.5
Level
                Protection Profile Machine Readable Travel Document with ICAO
                Application, Extended Access Control with PACE (EAC PP) BSI-
                CC-PP-0056-V2-2012, Version 1.3.2, 5th December 2012 [EAC-
Protection      PP-V2]
Profiles
                Protection Profile Machine Readable Travel Document using
                Standard Inspection Procedure with PACE, BSI-CC-PP-0068-V2-
                MA-01, Version 1.0.1, 22 July 2014, BSI [PACE-PP].
                         Security Target Lite
                                                                      Ref.:
                  IDeal Pass v2.3-n JC with Privacy
                                                                2018_2000036361
                  Protection (SAC/EAC/Polymorphic
                                                                   Page: 9/150
                        eMRTD Configuration)

1.2 TOE Reference
                 IDeal Pass v2.3-n JC with Privacy Protection
TOE name
                 (SAC/EAC/Polymorphic eMRTD Configuration)
TOE              7126-9301-0311 for applet loaded in EEPROM
identification   7126-9301-0319 for applet loaded in ROM
TOE version      v2.3.0.14
Name of          NXP JCOP 3 P60 certified by the Dutch NSCIB certification body
Platform         (CC-18-98209/2) on 29-11-2018
                 Platform ID: “JxHyyy0019790400” (SVN 6521; “OSB RC9”)
Platform
                 Patch ID: 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 (no patch)
identification
                           04 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 (PL4)
                 NXP Secure Smart Card Controller P6022y VB including IC
IC reference     Dedicated Software certified by the German BSI certification
                 body (BSI-DSZ-CC-1059-2018) on 18-05-2018
Crypto Lib       Crypto Library V3.1.x on P6022y VB certified by the Dutch
reference        NSCIB certification body (CC-18-67206) on 31-05-2018



1.3 TOE Overview
The Security Target (ST) defines the security objectives and requirements for a
contact or contactless based chip of machine readable travel documents (MRTD)
based on the requirements and recommendations of the International Civil
Aviation Organization (ICAO), EU requirements for biometric European passport
(Council Regulation (EC) No 2252/2004 and Commission Implementing Decision
6181) and Biometric European Resident Permit (REGULATION (EU) 2017/1954
and Commission Implementing Decision 6178). This product is intended to
enable verification of the authenticity of the travel document and to identify its
holder during a border control, using an inspection system. The verification
process is based on Extended Access Control with Password Authenticated
Connection Establishment (PACE) and optionally Active Authentication (AA).

The main features and their origin are the following:
 Password Authenticated Connection Establishment (PACE)
   according to ICAO Technical Report “Supplemental Access Control” [ICAO-
   9303] part 11 and strictly conform to BSI-CC-PP-0068-V2 [PACE-PP] for
   protection of the communication between terminal and chip. The following
   PACE mapping modes are supported and covered by the TOE:
      o    Generic Mapping (PACE-GM)
      o    Integrated Mapping (PACE-IM)
      o    Chip Authentication Mapping (PACE-CAM), which combines PACE-GM
           with Chip Authentication into a single protocol.
                         Security Target Lite
                                                                       Ref.:
                  IDeal Pass v2.3-n JC with Privacy
                                                                 2018_2000036361
                  Protection (SAC/EAC/Polymorphic
                                                                   Page: 10/150
                        eMRTD Configuration)

   Chip Authentication v1
    according to BSI TR-03110 parts 1 and 3 [TR-03110-1], [TR-03110-3] and
    strictly conform to BSI-CC-PP-0056-V2-2012 [EAC-PP-V2], authenticates the
    travel document’s chip to the inspection system.
   Terminal Authentication v1
    according to BSI TR-03110 parts 1 and 3 [TR-03110-1], [TR-03110-3] and
    strictly conform to BSI-CC-PP-0056-V2-2012 [EAC-PP-V2], authenticates the
    inspection system to travel document’s chip and protects the confidentiality
    and integrity of the sensitive biometric reference data during their
    transmission from the TOE to the inspection system.

As a feature that can be optionally configured the TOE supports:
   Active Authentication
    which according to [ICAO-9303] prevents copying the SOD and proves that it
    has been read from the authentic chip. It proves that the chip has not been
    substituted.


   Polymorphic Authentication
    which according to [PCA-eMRTD] provides additional privacy by randomisation
    of returned Polymorphic Identities, Polymorphic Pseudonyms and
    Complementary Polymorphic ID attributes in combination with standard ICAO
    and EAC1 eMRTD protocols specified in ICAO Doc 9303 [ICAO-9303] and BSI
    TR-03110 parts 1 and 3 [TR-03110-1] and [TR 03110-3].

The TOE may also be used as an ISO driving license, compliant to ISO/IEC 18013
or ISO/IEC TR 19446 supporting PACE, AA and CA, as both applications (MRTD
and IDL) share the same protocols and data structure organization. Therefore, in
the rest of the document, the word “MRTD” MAY be understood either as a MRTD
in the sense of ICAO, or a driving license compliant to ISO/IEC 18013 or ISO/IEC
TR 19446 depending on the targeted usage envisioned by the issuer.

Application note
This TOE claims an assurance level EAL5 augmented with AVA_VAN.5 and
ALC_DVS.2. AVA_VAN.5 implies that the TOE is resistant to attacks performed by
an attacker possessing "High attack potential".
Not all key sizes specified in this security target have sufficient cryptographic
strength for satisfying the AVA_VAN.5 “high attack potential”. In order to be
protected against attackers with a "high attack potential", sufficiently large
cryptographic key sizes SHALL be configured for this TOE. References can be
found in national and international document standards. Further details have
been specified in the TOE’s guidance documentation [AGD_PRE].
                         Security Target Lite
                                                                   Ref.:
                  IDeal Pass v2.3-n JC with Privacy
                                                             2018_2000036361
                  Protection (SAC/EAC/Polymorphic
                                                               Page: 11/150
                        eMRTD Configuration)

1.4 TOE Description

1.4.1 TOE Definition
The Target of Evaluation (TOE) addressed by the current security target is an
electronic travel document representing a contactless / contact based smart card
or passport programmed according to Logical data structure (LDS) and protocols
specified in ICAO Doc 9303 [ICAO-9303] and additionally providing the Extended
Access Control according to BSI TR-03110 part 1 [TR-03110-1] and part 3 [TR-
03110-3] and Active Authentication according to [ICAO-9303]. The
communication between terminal and chip shall be protected by Password
Authenticated Connection Establishment (PACE), optionally with Chip
Authentication Mapping (PACE CAM) according to Electronic Passport using
Standard Inspection Procedure with PACE (PACE PP), BSI-CC-PP-0068-V2 [PACE-
PP]. Polymorphic eMRTD extensions are present on the TOE that enable secure
authentication with enhanced privacy protection features. It provides the holder
the possibility to authenticate towards a service provider in a non-traceable and
non-linkable manner thanks to usage of Polymorphic Pseudonyms and other
Polymorphic ID attributes.

The TOE (IDeal Pass v2.3-n JC with Privacy Protection (SAC/EAC/Polymorphic
eMRTD Configuration)) is composed of
    the NXP JCOP 3 P60, composed of
      o the circuitry of the MRTD’s chip (NXP Secure Smart Card Controller
         P6022y VB including IC Dedicated Software) with hardware for the
         contact and contactless interface;
       o   the Crypto Library V3.1.x on P6022y VB;
       o   the IC Embedded Software (operating system): NXP JCOP 3;
      The MRTD application IDeal Pass v2.3-n JC with Privacy Protection
       (SAC/EAC/Polymorphic eMRTD Configuration) loaded in ROM or in
       EEPROM;
      the associated guidance documentation in [AGD_PRE] and [AGD_OPE];
      the Personalisation Agent Key set.


The TOE utilizes the evaluation of NXP JCOP 3 P60 which has been certified by
the Dutch NSCIB certification body (CC-18-98209/2).

A schematic overview of the TOE is shown in Figure 1:
 The MRTD’s chip circuitry and the IC dedicated software forming the Smart
   Card Platform (Hardware Platform and Hardware Abstraction Layer);
 The IC embedded software running on the Smart Card Platform consisting of
      o Java Card virtual machine, ensuring language-level security;
      o Java Card runtime environment, providing additional security features
         for Java card technology enabled devices;
      o Java card API, providing access to card’s resources for the Applet;
                         Security Target Lite
                                                                     Ref.:
                  IDeal Pass v2.3-n JC with Privacy
                                                               2018_2000036361
                  Protection (SAC/EAC/Polymorphic
                                                                 Page: 12/150
                        eMRTD Configuration)

        o  Global Platform Card Manager, responsible for management of Applets
           on the card.
        o Mifare implementation can be enabled or disabled for this TOE.
        o Crypto Library.
    The Applet Layer is IDeal Pass v2.3-n JC with Privacy Protection
     (SAC/EAC/Polymorphic eMRTD Configuration) applet.




                                        Figure 1: TOE



1.4.2 TOE usage and security features for operational use
Depending on its configuration during pre-personalisation and personalisation,
the TOE can be used as:
    ICAO/EAC eMRTD,
    Polymorphic eMRTD and
    EU/ISO Driving Licence.

The ICAO/EAC eMRTD, Polymorphic eMRTD and Driver Licence are installed as a
separate application instances of the applet having their own dedicated
application identifiers and personalisation. The following TOE configurations are
covered within the scope of this Security Target:

    Configuration ICAO/EAC            Polymorphic        Driver licence
                  eMRTD               eMRTD
    1             present             -                  -
    2             present             present            -
    3             -                   -                  present
    4             -                   present            present
    5             -                   Present            -

The authentication protocols PACEv2, Chip authentication (CAv1), Active
Authentication and Terminal Authentication (TAv1) specified in [ICAO-9303] and
                         Security Target Lite
                                                                             Ref.:
                  IDeal Pass v2.3-n JC with Privacy
                                                                       2018_2000036361
                  Protection (SAC/EAC/Polymorphic
                                                                         Page: 13/150
                        eMRTD Configuration)

[TR-03110] have also been refered to in ISO18013 for EU driving licences. The
BAP-1 protocol defined in ISO18013 is equal to Basic Access Protocol (BAC)
defined in [ICAO-9303]. As to the logical data structure, the ISO18013 uses the
same concept of Passive Authentication defined in [ICAO-9303], but specifies
different ISO7816-4 elementary file identifiers for storing the ICAO defined
content of DG3, DG4 and DG15.

When an Issuing state is using the product as an ISO compliant Driving licence,
the following name mapping of roles, definitions, data groups and protocol is
applicable within the scope of this security target:

                        MRTD                           ISO Driving License
                        MRTD                                   IDL
                         ICAO                                ISO/IEC
                      ICAO 9303                    ISO/IEC 18013 or ISO/IEC TR
                                                              19446
                           BAC                                BAP-1
                           DG3                                DG7*
                           DG4                                DG8*
                          DG15                                DG13
                           MRZ                      MRZ or SAI (Scanning area
                                                            identifier)
                         Traveler                             Holder
          *Access rights to the biometric data in DG3 and DG4 are also mapped to
           DG7 and DG8, respectively.

The following two sub sections explain the TOE security features for operational
use of TOE configured as respectively ICAO/EAC eMRTD/Driving licence and
Polymorphic eMRTD.


1.4.2.1 ICAO/EAC eMRTD and ISO Driving licence
This sub section explains the TOE security features for operational use of TOE
configured as ICAO/EAC eMRTD or as Driving Licence.

A State or Organisation issues travel documents to be used by the holder for
international travel. The traveller presents a travel document to the inspection
system to prove his or her identity. The travel document in context of this
Security Target contains:
  I.  visual (eye readable) biographical data and portrait of the holder,
 II.  a separate data summary (MRZ data) for visual and machine reading using
       OCR methods in the Machine readable zone (MRZ) and
III.  data elements on the travel document’s chip according to LDS in case of
       contactless machine reading.

The authentication of the traveller is based on:
  I.  the possession of a valid travel document personalized for a holder with
      the claimed identity as given on the biographical data page and
 II.  biometrics using the reference data stored in the travel document.
                               Security Target Lite
                                                                                           Ref.:
                        IDeal Pass v2.3-n JC with Privacy
                                                                                     2018_2000036361
                        Protection (SAC/EAC/Polymorphic
                                                                                       Page: 14/150
                              eMRTD Configuration)


The issuing State or Organization ensures the authenticity of the data of genuine
travel documents. The receiving State trusts a genuine travel document of an
issuing State or Organization.

For this Security Target the travel document is viewed as unit of:
(i) the physical part of the travel document in form of paper and/or plastic
    and chip. It presents visual readable data including (but not limited to)
    personal data of the travel document holder
    (a) the biographical data on the biographical data page of the travel
         document surface,
    (b) the printed data in the Machine Readable Zone (MRZ) and
    (c) the printed portrait.

(ii) the logical travel document as data of the travel document holder stored
     according to the Logical Data Structure as defined in [ICAO-9303] as specified
     by ICAO on the contact based or contactless integrated circuit. It presents
     contact based / contactless readable data including(but not limited to)
     personal data of the travel document holder
     (a) the digital Machine Readable Zone Data (digital MRZ data, EF.DG1),
     (b) the digitized portraits (EF.DG2),
     (c) the biometric reference data of finger(s) (EF.DG3) or iris image(s)
          (EF.DG4) or both1,
     (d) the other data according to LDS (EF.DG5 to EF.DG16) and
     (e) the Document Security Object (SOD).


The issuing State or Organisation implements security features of the travel
document to maintain the authenticity and integrity of the travel document and
their data. The physical part of the travel document and the travel document’s
chip are identified by the Document Number.

The physical part of the travel document is protected by physical security
measures (e.g. watermark, security printing), logical (e.g. authentication keys of
the travel document’s chip) and organisational security measures (e.g. control of
materials, personalisation procedures) [ICAO-9303].These security measures can
include the binding of the travel document’s chip to the travel document.

The logical travel document is protected in authenticity and integrity by a digital
signature created by the document signer acting for the issuing State or
Organisation and the security features of the travel document’s chip.

The ICAO Doc 9303 [ICAO-9303] defines the baseline security methods Passive
Authentication, advanced security access methods Basic Access Control (BAC)
and Password Authenticated Connection Establishment to the logical travel



These biometric reference data are optional according to [ICAO-9303]. This ST assumes that the issuing State or
1

Organisation uses this option and protects these data by means of extended access control.
                        Security Target Lite
                                                                    Ref.:
                 IDeal Pass v2.3-n JC with Privacy
                                                              2018_2000036361
                 Protection (SAC/EAC/Polymorphic
                                                                Page: 15/150
                       eMRTD Configuration)

document, Active Authentication of the travel document’s chip, Extended Access
Control and the Data Encryption of sensitive biometrics as optional security
measure. The Passive Authentication Mechanism is performed completely and
independently of the TOE by the TOE environment.

The BSI TR-03110 parts 1 and 3 [TR-03110-1] and [TR 03110-3] specify the
Extended Access Control protocols Chip Authentication version 1 (CAv1) and
Terminal Authentication (TAv1), which are required to get secured access to the
biometric data stored in data groups DG3 and DG4 in combination with PACE or
BAC.

This Security Target addresses the protection of the logical travel document:
   (i) in integrity by write-only-once access control and by physical means, and
   (ii) in confidentiality by the Extended Access Control Mechanism.

This Security Target addresses the Chip Authentication Version 1 described in
[TR-03110-1] and PACE-CAM described in [ICAO-9303] part 11 as an alternative
to the Active Authentication stated in [ICAO-9303].

For Basic Access Control (BAC) supported by the product, a separate evaluation
and certification is performed with ST [ST-BAC].

The confidentiality by Password Authenticated Connection Establishment (PACE)
is a mandatory security feature of the TOE. The travel document shall strictly
conform to the ‘Common Criteria Protection Profile Machine Readable Travel
Document using Standard Inspection Procedure with PACE [PACE-PP]. Note that
[PACE-PP] considers high attack potential.

For the PACE protocol according to [ICAO-9303] part 11, the following steps shall
be performed:
 (i) the travel document's chip encrypts a nonce with the shared password,
       derived from the MRZ resp. CAN data and transmits the encrypted nonce
       together with the domain parameters to the terminal.
 (ii) The terminal recovers the nonce using the shared password, by
       (physically) reading the MRZ or CAN data. This nonce shall be converted to
       a group generator using one of the following mapping algorithms, which
       maps a static generator to an ephemeral generator:
           a. Generic mapping (PACE-GM) or
           b. Integrated mapping PACE-IM)
 (iii) The travel document's chip and terminal computer perform a Diffie-
       Hellmann key agreement together with the ephemeral domain parameters
       to create a shared secret. Both parties derive the session keys KMAC and
       KENC from the shared secret.
 (iv) Each party generates an authentication token, sends it to the other party
       and verifies the received token.

In case of PACE with Chip Authenticated Mapping (PACE-CAM), in addition to the
steps above executed for the PACE-GM variant, the MRTD chip computes Chip
Authentication Data CAIC, encrypts them AIC = E(KSEnc, CAIC) and sends them
                         Security Target Lite
                                                                     Ref.:
                  IDeal Pass v2.3-n JC with Privacy
                                                               2018_2000036361
                  Protection (SAC/EAC/Polymorphic
                                                                 Page: 16/150
                        eMRTD Configuration)

to the terminal. The terminal decrypts AIC and verifies the authenticity of the
chip using the recovered Chip Authentication Data CAIC.

After successful key negotiation, the terminal and the travel document's chip
provide private communication (secure messaging) [TR-03110-1], [ICAO-9303].

This Security Target requires the TOE to implement the Extended Access Control
as defined in [TR-03110-1]. The Extended Access Control consists of two parts:
  (i) the Chip Authentication Protocol Version 1 and
  (ii) the Terminal Authentication Protocol Version 1 (v.1).

The Chip Authentication Protocol v.1
  (i) authenticates the travel document’s chip to the inspection syode functionality in
                          combination with the ISO/IEC 7816 contact interface.
                1.4.2.4         Evaluated package types
       stem and
  (ii) establishes secure messaging which is used by Terminal Authentication v.1
       to protect the confidentiality and integrity of the sensitive biometric
       reference data during their transmission from the TOE to the inspection
       system. Therefore Termina                   A number of package types are supported for each major configuration of the TOE. The
                          commercial types are named according to the following format.
                            • P60D024ypp(p)/9Brrff(o) for major configuration P60D024PVB(Y/Z/A)/MVB(Y/Z/A)
                            • P60D016ypp(p)/9Brrff(o) for major configuration P60D016PVB(Y/Z/A)/MVB(Y/Z/A)
                            • P60D012ypp(p)/9Brrff(o) for major configuration P60D012PVB(Y/Z/A)/MVB(Y/Z/A)
                            • P60D024ypp(p)/9Frrff(o) for major configuration P60D024yVF
                            • P60D016ypp(p)/9l Authentication v.1 can only be performed if
     Frrff(o) for major configuration P60D016yVF
                            • P60D012ypp(p)/9Frrff(o) for major configuration P60D012yVF
                          The commercial type name of each major configuration var  Chip Authentication v.1has been succies with esstfheu    FMT_SMR.1/POLY
FMT_MTD.1/Resume_PIN          (FMT_SMF.1) and           FMT_SMF.1,
                              (FMT_SMR.1)               FMT_SMR.1/POLY
FMT_MTD.1/PI_PP_CPI_Load      (FMT_SMF.1) and           FMT_SMF.1,
                              (FMT_SMR.1)               FMT_SMR.1/POLY
FMT_MTD.1/PI_PP_CPI_Read      (FMT_SMF.1) and           FMT_SMF.1,
                              (FMT_SMR.1)               FMT_SMR.1/POLY
FPT_EMS.1                     No Dependencies
FPT_FLS.1                     No Dependencies
FPT_TST.1                     No Dependencies
FPT_PHP.3                     No Dependencies
                              (FCS_CKM.2 or             FCS_CKM.4,
FCS_CKM.1/DH_PACE             FCS_COP.1) and            FCS_COP.1/PACE_ENC,
                              (FCS_CKM.4)               FCS_COP.1/PACE_MAC
                              (FCS_CKM.2 or             FCS_CKM.4,
FCS_CKM.1/CA                  FCS_COP.1) and            FCS_COP.1/CA_ENC,
                              (FCS_CKM.4)               FCS_COP.1/CA_MAC
                              (FCS_CKM.2 or
                                                        FCS_CKM.4,
FCS_CKM.1/POLY                FCS_COP.1) and
                              (FCS_CKM.4)               FCS_COP.1/POLY
                              (FCS_CKM.1 or FDP_ITC.1
FCS_CKM.4                                               FCS_CKM.1/DH_PACE
                              or FDP_ITC.2)
FCS_COP.1/PACE_ENC            (FCS_CKM.1 or FDP_ITC.1   FCS_CKM.1/DH_PACE,
                          Security Target Lite
                                                                      Ref.:
                   IDeal Pass v2.3-n JC with Privacy
                                                               2018_2000036361
                   Protection (SAC/EAC/Polymorphic
                                                                 Page: 121/150
                         eMRTD Configuration)

                                or FDP_ITC.2) and         FCS_CKM.4
                                (FCS_CKM.4)
                                (FCS_CKM.1 or FDP_ITC.1
                                                          FCS_CKM.1/DH_PACE,
FCS_COP.1/PACE_MAC              or FDP_ITC.2) and
                                                          FCS_CKM.4
                                (FCS_CKM.4)
                                (FCS_CKM.1 or FDP_ITC.1
FCS_COP.1/CA_ENC                or FDP_ITC.2) and         FCS_CKM.1/CA, FCS_CKM.4
                                (FCS_CKM.4)
                                (FCS_CKM.1 or FDP_ITC.1
FCS_COP.1/SIG_VER               or FDP_ITC.2) and         FCS_CKM.1/CA, FCS_CKM.4
                                (FCS_CKM.4)
                                (FCS_CKM.1 or FDP_ITC.1
FCS_COP.1/SIG_GEN               or FDP_ITC.2) and         FCS_CKM.1/CA, FCS_CKM.4
                                (FCS_CKM.4)
                                (FCS_CKM.1 or FDP_ITC.1
FCS_COP.1/CA_MAC                or FDP_ITC.2) and         FCS_CKM.1/CA, FCS_CKM.4
                                (FCS_CKM.4)
FCS_COP.1/POLY                  (FCS_CKM.1 or FDP_ITC.1
                                                          FCS_CKM.1/POLY,
                                or FDP_ITC.2) and
                                (FCS_CKM.4)               FCS_CKM.4
FCS_RND.1                       No Dependencies
FPR_ANO.1                       No Dependencies
FPR_UNL.1                       No Dependencies

                          Table 8 SFRs Dependencies


6.3.3.1.1 Rationale for the exclusion of Dependencies


The dependency FMT_MSA.3 of FDP_ACF.1/TRM is discarded. The access
  control TSF according to FDP_ACF.1/TRM uses security attributes which are
  defined during the personalisation and are fixed over the whole life time of the
  TOE. No management of these security attribute (i.e. SFR FMT_MSA.1 and
  FMT_MSA.3) is necessary here.
                         Security Target Lite
                                                                      Ref.:
                  IDeal Pass v2.3-n JC with Privacy
                                                               2018_2000036361
                  Protection (SAC/EAC/Polymorphic
                                                                 Page: 122/150
                        eMRTD Configuration)

6.3.3.2 SARs Dependencies
Requirements     CC Dependencies                          Satisfied Dependencies
ADV_ARC.1       (ADV_FSP.1) and (ADV_TDS.1)               ADV_FSP.5, ADV_TDS.4
ADV_FSP.5       (ADV_IMP.1) and (ADV_TDS.1)               ADV_IMP.1, ADV_TDS.4
ADV_IMP.1       (ADV_TDS.3) and (ALC_TAT.1)               ADV_TDS.4, ALC_TAT.2
                (ADV_IMP.1) and (ADV_TDS.3) and           ADV_IMP.1, ADV_TDS.4,
ADV_INT.2
                (ALC_TAT.1)                               ALC_TAT.2
ADV_TDS.4       (ADV_FSP.5)                               ADV_FSP.5
AGD_OPE.1       (ADV_FSP.1)                               ADV_FSP.5
AGD_PRE.1       No Dependencies
                (ALC_CMS.1) and (ALC_DVS.1) and           ALC_CMS.5, ALC_DVS.2,
ALC_CMC.4
                (ALC_LCD.1)                               ALC_LCD.1
ALC_CMS.5       No Dependencies
ALC_DEL.1       No Dependencies
ALC_DVS.2       No Dependencies
ALC_LCD.1       No Dependencies
ALC_TAT.2       (ADV_IMP.1)                               ADV_IMP.1
                (ASE_ECD.1) and (ASE_INT.1) and           ASE_ECD.1, ASE_INT.1,
ASE_CCL.1
                (ASE_REQ.1)                               ASE_REQ.2
ASE_ECD.1       No Dependencies
ASE_INT.1       No Dependencies
ASE_OBJ.2       (ASE_SPD.1)                               ASE_SPD.1
ASE_REQ.2       (ASE_ECD.1) and (ASE_OBJ.2)               ASE_ECD.1, ASE_OBJ.2
ASE_SPD.1       No Dependencies
                (ADV_FSP.1) and (ASE_INT.1) and           ADV_FSP.5, ASE_INT.1,
ASE_TSS.1
                (ASE_REQ.1)                               ASE_REQ.2
ATE_COV.2       (ADV_FSP.2) and (ATE_FUN.1)               ADV_FSP.5, ATE_FUN.1
                (ADV_ARC.1) and (ADV_TDS.4) and           ADV_ARC.1, ADV_TDS.4,
ATE_DPT.3
                (ATE_FUN.1)                               ATE_FUN.1
ATE_FUN.1       (ATE_COV.1)                               ATE_COV.2
                (ADV_FSP.2) and (AGD_OPE.1) and           ADV_FSP.5, AGD_OPE.1,
ATE_IND.2       (AGD_PRE.1) and (ATE_COV.1) and           AGD_PRE.1, ATE_COV.2,
                (ATE_FUN.1)                               ATE_FUN.1
                (ADV_ARC.1) and (ADV_FSP.4) and           ADV_ARC.1, ADV_FSP.5,
                (ADV_IMP.1) and (ADV_TDS.3) and           ADV_IMP.1, ADV_TDS.4,
AVA_VAN.5
                (AGD_OPE.1) and (AGD_PRE.1) and           AGD_OPE.1, AGD_PRE.1,
                (ATE_DPT.1)                               ATE_DPT.3

                           Table 9 SARs Dependencies


6.3.4 Rationale for the Security Assurance Requirements
The EAL5 was chosen to permits a developer to gain maximum assurance from
positive security engineering based upon rigorous commercial development
practices supported by moderate application of specialist security engineering
techniques. Such a TOE will probably be designed and developed with the intent
of achieving EAL5 assurance. It is likely that the additional costs attributable to
the EAL5 requirements, relative to rigorous development without the application
of specialised techniques, will not be large.
                        Security Target Lite
                                                                   Ref.:
                 IDeal Pass v2.3-n JC with Privacy
                                                            2018_2000036361
                 Protection (SAC/EAC/Polymorphic
                                                              Page: 123/150
                       eMRTD Configuration)

6.3.5 AVA_VAN.5 Advanced methodical vulnerability analysis
The selection of the component AVA_VAN.5 provides the assurance that the TOE
is shown to be highly resistant to penetration attacks to meet the security
objectives OT.Prot_Inf_Leak, OT.Prot_Phys-Tamper and OT.Prot_Malfunction.

6.3.6 ALC_DVS.2 Sufficiency of security measures
The selection of the component ALC_DVS.2 provides a higher assurance of the
secu-rity of the MRTD's development and manufacturing especially for the secure
handling of the MRTD's material.
                        Security Target Lite
                                                                    Ref.:
                 IDeal Pass v2.3-n JC with Privacy
                                                             2018_2000036361
                 Protection (SAC/EAC/Polymorphic
                                                               Page: 124/150
                       eMRTD Configuration)


7 TOE Summary Specification

7.1 TOE Summary Specification
This section provides a description of the security functions and assurance
measures of the TOE that meet the TOE security requirements.

The TOE provides security features (SF) which can be associated to following
groups:
  Identification and Authentication mechanisms
  Cryptographic functions support
  Access control /Storage and protection of logical travel document data
  Secure messaging
  Security and Life-cycle management
Moreover, the TOE will protect itself against interference, logical tampering and
bypass. The security functionality of the TOE respectively the IDeal Pass v2.3-n
JC with Privacy Protection (SAC/EAC/Polymorphic eMRTD Configuration) applet
will be externally available to the user by APDU commands according to the
access conditions specified by the according policies considering the life cycle
state, user role and security state.

7.1.1 SF.IA Identification and Authentication
The different authentication mechanisms are supported by APDU commands and
parameters using the cryptographic functions provided by the platform. The
authentication mechanisms are enforced by protocols and APDU methods as
specified in the functional specification.

Note that Symmetric Basic Access Control (BAC) Authentication Mechanism is
supported by the TOE but not covered by this Security Target.

The TOE supports the following authentication mechanisms:
        SF.IA.1: Password Authenticated Connection Establishment (PACE)
        SF.IA.2: EAC Chip Authentication v. 1
        SF.IA.3: EAC Terminal Authentication Protocol v.1
        SF.IA.4: Authentication of the Personalization Agent with a
         personalisation key set based on a symmetric authentication
         mechanism
        SF.IA.5: ICAO Active Authentication
        SF.IA.6: Optionally PACE with additional Chip Authentication Mapping
         (PACE CAM)
        SF.IA.7: Polymorphic Authentication (PMA)
        SF.IA.8: Polymorphic eMRTD Document Holder Verification
                        Security Target Lite
                                                                  Ref.:
                 IDeal Pass v2.3-n JC with Privacy
                                                           2018_2000036361
                 Protection (SAC/EAC/Polymorphic
                                                             Page: 125/150
                       eMRTD Configuration)

7.1.2 SF.CF Cryptographic functions support
Cryptographic function support is provided by the underlying NXP JCOP 3 P60,
i.e. the TOE relies on the underlying platform for performing its required
cryptographic operations.

SF.CF Cryptographic functions include:
        SF.CF.1: 3DES and AES cipher operations for secure messaging
        SF.CF.2: Digest calculations (SHA-1, SHA-224, SHA-256, SHA-384 and
         SHA-512)
        SF.CF.3: Signature generation (ECDSA, RSA)
        SF.CF.4: Signature verification (ECDSA, RSA)
        SF.CF.5: Diffie-Hellman Key Agreement (ECDH and DH)
        SF.CF.6: Key Generation (PACE ECDH/DH ephemeral keys and secure
         messaging MAC and ENC session keys)
        SF.CF.7: Key and secret authentication data Destruction
        SF.CF.8: True Random Number generation
        SF.CF.9: Randomization of PI/PP/CPI data as part of the Polymorphic
         Authentication protocol (PMA)




7.1.3 SF.ILTB Protection against interference, logical tampering
and bypass

SF.ILTB.1
  Protection against interference, logical tampering and bypass
  Security domains are supported by the Java Card platform used by the TOE
  underlying NXP JCOP 3 P60. The NXP JCOP 3 P60 provides protection against
  physical attack and performs self-tests as described in [PLTF-ST].
  The platform protects the TOE against malfunctions that are caused by
  exposure to operating conditions that may cause a malfunction. This includes
  hardware resets and operation outside the specified norms.
  The IDeal Pass v2.3-n JC with Privacy Protection (SAC/EAC/Polymorphic
  eMRTD Configuration) Applet uses transient memory where a hardware reset
  always reverts the IDeal Pass v2.3-n JC with Privacy Protection
  (SAC/EAC/Polymorphic eMRTD Configuration) Applet into an unauthenticated
  state.
                         Security Target Lite
                                                                        Ref.:
                  IDeal Pass v2.3-n JC with Privacy
                                                                 2018_2000036361
                  Protection (SAC/EAC/Polymorphic
                                                                   Page: 126/150
                        eMRTD Configuration)

7.1.4 SF.AC Access control / Storage and protection of logical
travel document data

SF.AC.1
  Access control / Storage and protection of logical travel document
  data
  The TOE provided access control, storage and protection of logical travel
  document data including access control to MRTD data. The TOE implements
  the subjects, objects, security attributes and rules according to the security
  attribute based access control. Access control is enforced by the APDU
  methods as specified in the interface defined in the functional specification.

7.1.5 SF.SM Secure Messaging

SF.SM.1
  Secure Messaging
  Secure messaging MAC and ENC operations are performed by the TOE’s
  platform.
  Secure messaging in ENC_MAC mode is established during PACE or re-
  established during Chip Authentication v1 and is based on SF.CF.1, 5, 6 and 8.

SF.SM.2
  Secure Messaging – Re-authentication
  The Retail MAC for 3DES and CMAC for AES are part of every APDU
  command/response when secure messaging is active after a successful PACE
  or Chip Authentication has been accomplished. Re-authentication after reset of
  the SM protocol is assured by accepting only valid (mandatory) MAC or CMAC
  cryptograms.

7.1.6 SF.LCM Security and life cycle management

SF.LCM.1
  Management of phases and roles
  For the TOE the following life-cycle phases have been identified:
      1. Manufacturing phase
      2. Personalisation phase
      3. Operational phase
      4. Termination phase
  Each life-cycle phase (or state) has its typical user acting as role holder.
                        Security Target Lite
                                                                  Ref.:
                 IDeal Pass v2.3-n JC with Privacy
                                                           2018_2000036361
                 Protection (SAC/EAC/Polymorphic
                                                             Page: 127/150
                       eMRTD Configuration)

Life-cycle phase           Role
Manufacturing phase        IC Manufacturer
                           MRTD Manufacturer Platform initialisation)
                           MRTD Manufacturer (Pre-personalisation)
Personalisation phase      Personalisation Agent
                           Basic or Extended Inspection system
Operational phase          Polymorphic Authentication System
                           Polymorphic eMRTD document holder
Terminated phase           None

  All role holders in Manufacturing, Pre-Personalisation and Personalisation
  phases are identified by cryptographic authentication keys. In Operational
  phase the PACE password is required to authenticate the Basic or Extended
  Inspection System in order to get access to the non-sensitive ICAO LDS
  datagroups.
  The IDeal Pass v2.3-n JC with Privacy Protection (SAC/EAC/Polymorphic
  eMRTD Configuration) Applet maintains the internal life-cycle state the
  moment that the applet is installed. This state, together with the access
  control mechanisms force the Terminal into a specific role, for the pre-
  personalisation and subsequent, personalisation and operational phases. The
  phases (and corresponding life-cycle states) are controlled by APDU
  commands.



SF.LCM.2
  Life Cycle states of the IDeal Pass v2.3-n JC with Privacy Protection
  (SAC/EAC/Polymorphic eMRTD Configuration) Applet
  The TOE supports the following life-cycle states:
      1. Not instantiated (applet resides in ROM or in EEPROM)
      2. PRE-PERSONALISATION state
      3. PERSONALISATION state
      4. OPERATIONAL state
      5. TERMINATED state (irreversibly)
  Each life-cycle phase (or state) has its typical user acting as role holder.
                          Security Target Lite
                                                                     Ref.:
                   IDeal Pass v2.3-n JC with Privacy
                                                              2018_2000036361
                   Protection (SAC/EAC/Polymorphic
                                                                Page: 128/150
                         eMRTD Configuration)

                     Life-cycle state (maintained
Life-cycle phase                                    Role
                     by applet)
Manufacturing        - (Applet                                              Ref.:
                  IDeal Pass v2.3-n JC with Privacy
                                                                2018_2000036361
                  Protection (SAC/EAC/Polymorphic
                                                                  Page: 47/150
                        eMRTD Configuration)

As related to the polymorphic eMRTD        As from PACE PP     As from EACv1 PP
A.Auth_PKI_Polymorphic                                         A.Auth_PKI
A.Insp_Sys_Polymorphic                                         A.Insp_Sys
A.Polymorphic_Auth

A.Polymorphic_Auth
  It assumed that:
      o All authentication infrastructure keys used by the central Key
          Management       Authority     for   the    polymorphic    authentication
          infrastructure (generation and transformation of PP, PI and CPI) are
          generated, handled and stored securely.
      o The PP/PI/CPI are generated securely by the central Key Management
          Authority of the polymorphic authentication infrastructure and stored
          securely in the eMRTD polymorphic chip during the personalization
          phase.
      o The TOE communicates only with Trustworthy Authentication
          Service/Terminal during the Polymorphic Authentication.
      o The randomised PP, PI and CPI are securely received by Polymorphic
          Authentication Service/Terminal. The randomised PP, PI and CPI are
          transformed (“re-keyed”) by the central Key Management Authority
          (i.e. ElGamal re-encryption of the randomized PP, PI and/or CPI using
          the public key of Servicez Provider, who has is authorized to read the
          plain value of identifying user attributes included in the PP, PI or CPI).
          Identification by the identifying user attributes contained inside the PP,
          PI and CPI takes place at the Service Provider.
  Application Note:
  This Assumption has been added to this ST for the polymorphic authentication
  infrastructure. This addition does not conflict with the strict conformance to
  PACE PP [PACE-PP] and EACv1 PP [EAC-PP-V2].

A.Auth_PKI_Polymorphic
  PKI for Polymorphic eMRTD It is assumed that:
     o The issuing States or Organisations establish a dedicated CVCA, DVCA
        and IS PKI for the polymorphic eMRTD infrastructure.
     o The Country Verifying Certification Authorities, the Document Verifier
        and Extended Inspection Systems hold authentication key pairs and
        certificates for their public keys encoding the access control rights for
        access to the PP, PI and (optional) CPI polymorphic user data. The
        Country Verifying Certification Authorities of the issuing States or
        Organisations are signing the certificates of the Document Verifier and
        the Document Verifiers are signing the certificates of the Polymorphic
        Authentication     Terminal/Service   of   the   receiving   States    or
        Organisations. The issuing States or Organisations distribute the public
                         Security Target Lite
                                                                      Ref.:
                  IDeal Pass v2.3-n JC with Privacy
                                                                2018_2000036361
                  Protection (SAC/EAC/Polymorphic
                                                                  Page: 48/150
                        eMRTD Configuration)

         keys of their Country Verifying Certification Authority to their
         Polymorphic eMRTD document's chip.
      o The issuing State or Organisation establishs the necessary public key
         infrastructure in order to limit the access to Polymorphic data of
         Polymorphic eMRTD document holders to authorized Organisations. The
         Country Verifying Certification Authority of the issuing State or
         Organisation generates card verifiable Document Verifier Certificates
         for the authorized Document Verifier only.
      o The issuing State or Organisation establishs the necessary public key
         infrastructure in order to (i) generate the Polymorphic eMRTD
         document's Chip Authentication Key Pair, (ii) sign and store the Chip
         Authentication Public Key in the Chip Authentication Public Key data
         and (iii) support Polymorphic Authentication Terminals/Services to
         verify the authenticity of the Polymorphic eMRTD document's chip
         according to [TR-03110] used for genuine Polymorphic eMRTD
         document by certification of the Chip Authentication Public Key by
         means of the Document Security Object.
      o The Polymorphic eMRTD document issuer establishes a public key
         infrastructure for the card verifiable certificates used for Terminal
         Authentication. For this aim, the Polymorphic eMRTD document issuer
         shall run a Country Verifying Certification Authority. The PKI shall fulfill
         the requirements and rules of the corresponding certificate policy. The
         Polymorphic eMRTD document issuer shall make the CVCA certificate
         available to the personalization agent or the manufacturer.
      o The polymorphic eMRTD document Issuer issues the polymorphic
         eMRTD document and approves it using the terminals and
         authentication services complying with all applicable laws and
         regulations.
  Application Note:
  This Assumption is an extension of the Assumption 'A.Auth_PKI' defined in
  [EAC-PP-V2]. For the EAC functionality of the TOE the assumption is necessary
  because it covers the pre-requisite for performing the Terminal Authentication
  Protocol Version 1.

A.Insp_Sys_Polymorphic

Polymorphic Inspection Systems and authentication services
     o Polymorphic    Inspection     Systems   (Polymorphic     Authentication
       Terminals/Services) ensure the confidentiality, Privacy, Authenticity
       and integrity of the polymorphic data read from the polymorphic
       eMRTD document (e.g. PACE PIN/PUK, integrity of PKI certificates,
       randomized PI, PP and optional CPI data, etc.), where it is necessary
       for a secure operation of the TOE.
     o Polymorphic Inspection Systems will prevent eavesdropping to their
       communication with the TOE before secure messaging is successfully
       established based on the Chip Authentication Protocol Version 1.
                     Security Target Lite
                                                                Ref.:
              IDeal Pass v2.3-n JC with Privacy
                                                          2018_2000036361
              Protection (SAC/EAC/Polymorphic
                                                            Page: 49/150
                    eMRTD Configuration)

   o   Polymorphic Inspection Systems examine the polymorphic eMRTD
       document presented by the polymorphic eMRTD document holder to
       verify its authenticity by means of the physical security measures and
       to detect any manipulation of the physical part of the polymorphic
       eMRTD document.
    o Polymorphic Inspection Systems include the Country Signing CA Public
       Key and implement the respective terminal part of the protocols
       required to execute PACE with PIN, Passive Authentication (PA), CAv1,
       TAv1 authentication according to [TR-03110-2] and Polymorphic
       Authentication (PMA). They are assumed to securely store static IS
       private keys and generate secure temporary session keys and nonces.
    o The Document Verifier authorizes Polymorphic Inspection Systems by
       creation of Inspection System Certificates for access to polymorphic
       user data stored the polymorphic eMRTD document. An Polymorphic
       Inspection Systems authenticates itselve to the polymorphic eMRTD
       document's chip for getting access to the polymorphic data with its
       private Terminal Authentication key and corresponding Inspection
       System Certificate.
Application Note:
This Assumption is an extension of the Assumption 'A.Insp_Sys' defined in
[EAC-PP-V2]. For the EAC functionality of the TOE the assumption is necessary
because it covers the pre-requisite for performing the PACE with PIN, CAv1
and TAv1 authentication.
                         Security Target Lite
                                                                      Ref.:
                  IDeal Pass v2.3-n JC with Privacy
                                                                2018_2000036361
                  Protection (SAC/EAC/Polymorphic
                                                                  Page: 50/150
                        eMRTD Configuration)


4 Security Objectives

This chapter describes the security objectives for the TOE and the security
objectives for the TOE environment. The security objectives for the TOE
environment are separated into security objectives for the development and
production environment and security objectives for the operational environment.


4.1 Security Objectives for the TOE
This section describes the security objectives for the TOE addressing the aspects
of identified threats to be countered by the TOE and organizational security
policies to be met by the TOE.

4.1.1 Security Objectives listed in PP PACE

OT.Data_Integrity
  Integrity of Data
  The TOE must ensure integrity of the User Data and the TSF-data stored on it
  by protecting these data against unauthorised modification (physical
  manipulation and unauthorised modifying). The TOE must ensure integrity of
  the User Data and the TSF-data during their exchange between the TOE and
  the terminal connected (and represented by PACE authenticated BIS-PACE)
  after the PACE Authentication.

OT.Data_Authenticity
  Authenticity of Data
  The TOE must ensure authenticity of the User Data and the TSF-data stored
  on it by enabling verification of their authenticity at the terminal-side. The TOE
  must ensure authenticity of the User Data and the TSF-data during their
  exchange between the TOE and the terminal connected (and represented by
  PACE authenticated BIS-PACE)after the PACE Authentication. It shall happen
  by enabling such a verification at the terminal-side (at receiving by the
  terminal) and by an active verification by the TOE itself (at receiving by the
  TOE).

OT.Data_Confidentiality
  Confidentiality of Data
  The TOE must ensure confidentiality of the User Data and the TSF-data by
  granting read access only to the PACE authenticated BIS-PACE connected. The
  TOE must ensure confidentiality of the User Data and the TSF-data during
  their exchange between the TOE and the terminal connected (and represented
  by PACE authenticated BIS-PACE) after the PACE Authentication.
                        Security Target Lite
                                                                   Ref.:
                 IDeal Pass v2.3-n JC with Privacy
                                                             2018_2000036361
                 Protection (SAC/EAC/Polymorphic
                                                               Page: 51/150
                       eMRTD Configuration)

OT.Tracing
  Tracing travel document
  The TOE must prevent gathering TOE tracing data by means of unambiguous
  identifying the travel document remotely through establishing or listening to a
  communication via the contactless/contact interface of the TOE without
  knowledge of the correct values of shared passwords (PACE passwords) in
  advance.

OT.Prot_Abuse-Func
  Protection against Abuse of Functionality
  The TOE must prevent that functions of the TOE, which may not be used in
  TOE operational phase, can be abused in order (i) to manipulate or to disclose
  the User Data stored in the TOE, (ii) to manipulate or to disclose the TSF-data
  stored in the TOE, (iii) to manipulate (bypass, deactivate or modify) soft-
  coded security functionality of the TOE.

OT.Prot_Inf_Leak
  Potection against Information Leakage The TOE must provide protection
  against disclosure of confidential User Data or/and TSF-data stored and/or
  processed by the travel document
      by measurement and analysis of the shape and amplitude of signals or the
        time between events found by measuring signals on the electromagnetic
        field, power consumption, clock, or I/O lines,
      by forcing a malfunction of the TOE and/or
      by a physical manipulation of the TOE.

OT.Prot_Phys-Tamper
  Protection against Physical Tampering
  The TOE must provide protection the confidentiality and integrity of the User
  Data, the TSF Data, and the MRTD’s chip Embedded Software. This includes
  protection against attacks with high attack potential by means of
      measuring through galvanic contacts which is direct physical probing on
        the chips surface except on pads being bonded (using standard tools for
        measuring voltage and current) or
      measuring not using galvanic contacts but other types of physical
        interaction between charges (using tools used in solid-state physics
        research and IC failure analysis)
      manipulation of the hardware and its security features, as well as
      controlled manipulation of memory contents (User Data, TSF Data) with a
        prior
      reverse-engineering to understand the design and its properties and
        functions.
                         Security Target Lite
                                                                      Ref.:
                  IDeal Pass v2.3-n JC with Privacy
                                                                2018_2000036361
                  Protection (SAC/EAC/Polymorphic
                                                                  Page: 52/150
                        eMRTD Configuration)

OT.Prot_Malfunction
  Protection against Malfunctions
  The TOE must ensure its correct operation. The TOE must prevent its
  operation outside the normal operating conditions where reliability and secure
  operation have not been proven or tested. This is to prevent functional errors
  in the TOE. The environmental conditions may include external energy
  (especially electromagnetic) fields, voltage (on any contacts), clock frequency
  or temperature.

OT.Identification
  Identification and Authentication of the TOE
  The TOE must provide means to store Initialisation and Pre-Personalisation
  Data in its non-volatile memory. The Initialisation Data must provide a unique
  identification of the IC during the manufacturing and the card issuing life cycle
  phases of the travel document. The storage of the Pre-Personalisation data
  includes writing of the Personalisation Agent Key(s).

OT.AC_Pers
  Access Control for Personalisation of logical MRTD
  The TOE must ensure that the logical travel document data in EF.DG1 to
  EF.DG16, the Document Security Object according to LDS [ICAO-9303] and
  the TSF data can be written by authorized Personalisation Agents only. The
  logical travel document data in EF.DG1 to EF.DG16 and the TSF data may be
  written only during and cannot be changed after personalisation of the
  document.

4.1.2 Additional Security Objectives from PP EAC

OT.Sens_Data_Conf
  Confidentiality of sensitive biometric reference data
  The TOE must ensure the confidentiality of the sensitive biometric reference
  data (EF.DG3 and EF.DG4) by granting read access only to authorized
  Extended Inspection Systems. The authorization of the inspection system is
  drawn from the Inspection System Certificate used for the successful
  authentication and shall be a non-strict subset of the authorization defined in
  the Document Verifier Certificate in the certificate chain to the Country Verifier
  Certification Authority of the issuing State or Organisation. The TOE must
  ensure the confidentiality of the logical travel document data during their
  transmission to the Extended Inspection System. The confidentiality of the
  sensitive biometric reference data shall be protected against attacks with high
  attack potential.
                                  Security Target Lite
                                                                                   Ref.:
                           IDeal Pass v2.3-n JC with Privacy
                                                                             2018_2000036361
                                                                          on page 10 and Section 7.1.1).
                                    End-consumer                                     User of the Composite Product in Phase 7.
                                    IC Dedicated Software                            IC proprietary software embedded in a Security IC
                                                                                     (also known as IC firmware) and developed by the IC
                                                                                     Developer. Such software is required for testing purpose
                                                                                     (IC Dedicated Test Software) but may provide additional
Crypto Library Cobalt on N7021 VA                   All information provided in this document is subject to legal disclaimers.     © NXP B.V. 2019. All rights reserved.

Product evaluation document                                         Rev. 2.3 — 5 June 2019
PUBLIC                                                                                                                                                       27 / 35
NXP Semiconductors                                                                                            Crypto Library Cobalt on N7021 VA
                                                                                                                                Security Target Lite



                                                                                    services to facilitate usage of the hardware and/or
                                                                                    to provide additional services (IC Dedicated Support
                                                                                    Software).
                                    IC Dedicated Test Software That part of the IC Dedicated Software (refer to above)
                                                               which is used to test the TOE before TOE Delivery but
                                                               which does not provide any functionality thereafter.
                                    IC Dedicated Support                            That part of the IC Dedicated Software (refer to above)
                                    Software                                        which provides functions after TOE Delivery. The usage
                                                                                    of parts of the IC Dedicated Software might be restricted
                                                                                    to certain phases.
                                    Initialization Data                             Initialization Data defined by the TOE Manufacturer to
                                                                                    identify the TOE and to keep track of the Security IC’s
                                                                                    production and further life-cycle phases are considered
                                                                                    as belonging to the TSF data. These data are for
                                                                                    instance used for traceability and for TOE identification
                                                                                    (identification data).
                                    Integrated Circuit (IC)                         Electronic component(s) designed to perform processing
                                                                                    and/or memory functions.
                                    Memory                                          The memory comprises of the RAM, ROM and the Flash
                                                                                    of the TOE.
                                    Memory Management Unit                          The MMU maps the virtual addresses used by the CPU
                                                                                    into the physical addresses of RAM, ROM and Flash.
                                                                                    This mapping is done based on memory partitioning.
                                                                                    Memory partitioning is fixed.
                                    Pre-personalization Data                        Any data supplied by the Card Manufacturer that is
                                                                                    injected into the non-volatile memory by the Integrated
                                                                                    Circuits manufacturer (Phase 3). These data are for
                                                                                    instance used for traceability and/or to secure shipment
                                                                                    between phases.
                                    Security IC                                     (as used in this Protection Profile) Composition of the
                                                                                    TOE, the Security IC Embedded Software, user data of
                                                                                    the Composite TOE and the package (the Security IC
                                                                                    carrier).
                                    Security IC Embedded                            Software embedded in a Security IC and normally not
                                    Software                                        being developed by the IC Designer. The Security
                                                                                    IC Embedded Software is designed in Phase 1 and
                                                                                    embedded into the Security IC in Phase 3 or in later
                                                                                    phases of the Security IC product life-cycle. Some part
                                                                                    of that software may actually implement a Security
                                                                                    IC application others may provide standard services.
                                                                                    Nevertheless, this distinction doesn’t matter here
                                                                                    so that the Security IC Embedded Software can be
                                                                                    considered as being application dependent whereas the
                                                                                    IC Dedicated Software is definitely not.
                                    Security IC Product                             Composite product which includes the Security
                                                                                    Integrated Circuit (i.e. the TOE) and the Security IC
                                                                                    Embedded Software and is evaluated as composite

Crypto Library Cobalt on N7021 VA                  All information provided in this document is subject to legal disclaimers.     © NXP B.V. 2019. All rights reserved.

Product evaluation document                                        Rev. 2.3 — 5 June 2019
PUBLIC                                                                                                                                                      28 / 35
NXP Semiconductors                                                                                             Crypto Library Cobalt on N7021 VA
                                                                                                                                 Security Target Lite



                                                                                     target of evaluation in the sense of the Supporting
                                                                                     Document
                                    Secured Environment                              Operational environment maintains the confidentiality
                                                                                     and integrity of the TOE as addressed by OE.Process-
                                                                                     Sec-IC and the confidentiality and integrity of the IC
                                                                                     Security IC Embedded Software, TSF data or user data
                                                                                     associated with the product by security procedures of
                                                                                     the product manufacturer, personaliser and other actors
                                                                                     before delivery to the end-user depending on the life-
                                                                                     cycle.
                                    Test Features                                    All features and functions (implemented by the IC
                                                                                     Dedicated Test Software and/or hardware) which are
                                                                                     designed to be used before TOE Delivery only and
                                                                                     delivered as part of the TOE.
                                    TOE Delivery                                     The period when the TOE is delivered which is (refer to
                                                                                     Figure 2 on page 10) either (i) after Phase 3 (or before
                                                                                     Phase 4) if the TOE is delivered in form of wafers or
                                                                                     sawn wafers (dice) or (ii) after Phase 4 (or before Phase
                                                                                     5) if the TOE is delivered in form of packaged products.
                                    TOE Manufacturer                                 The TOE Manufacturer must ensure that all
                                                                                     requirements for the TOE (as defined in Section 1.2.2)
                                                                                     and its development and production environment
                                                                                     are fulfilled (refer to Figure 2 on page 10). The TOE
                                                                                     Manufacturer has the following roles: (i) IC Developer
                                                                                     (Phase 2) and (ii) IC Manufacturer (Phase 3). If the TOE
                                                                                     is delivered after Phase 4 in form of packaged products,
                                                                                     he has the role of the (iii) IC Packaging Manufacturer
                                                                                     (Phase 4) in addition.
                                    TSF data                                         DataData for the operation of the TOE upon which the
                                                                                     enforcement of the SFR relies. They are created by and
                                                                                     for the TOE, that might affect the operation of the TOE.
                                                                                     This includes information about the TOE’s configuration,
                                                                                     if any is coded in non-volatile non-programmable
                                                                                     memories (ROM), in non-volatile programmable
                                                                                     memories (for instance E2PROM or flash memory), in
                                                                                     specific circuitry or a combination thereof.
                                    User data of the Composite All data managed by the Security IC Embedded
                                    TOE                        Software in the application context.
                                    User data of the TOE                             Data for the user of the TOE, that does not affect
                                                                                     the operation of the TSF. From the point of view of
                                                                                     TOE defined in this PP the user data comprises the
                                                                                     Security IC Embedded Software and the user data of the
                                                                                     Composite TOE.




Crypto Library Cobalt on N7021 VA                   All information provided in this document is subject to legal disclaimers.     © NXP B.V. 2019. All rights reserved.

Product evaluation document                                         Rev. 2.3 — 5 June 2019
PUBLIC                                                                                                                                                       29 / 35
NXP Semiconductors                                                                                              Crypto Library Cobalt on N7021 VA
                                                                                                                                  Security Target Lite



9         Bibliography

                              9.1 Evaluation documents
                                    [1]    Common Criteria for Information Technology Security Evaluation, Part
                                           1: Introduction and general model, Version 3.1, Revision 5, April 2017,
                                           CCMB-2017-04-001
                                    [2]    Common Criteria for Information Technology Security Evaluation, Part 2: Security
                                           functional components, Version 3.1, Revision 5, April 2017, CCMB-2017-04-002
                                    [3]    Common Criteria for Information Technology Security Evaluation, Part 3: Security
                                           assurance components, Version 3.1, Revision 5, April 2017, CCMB-2017-04-003
                                    [4]    Common Methodology for Information Technology Security Evaluation, Evaluation
                                           Methodology, Version 3.1, Revision 5, April 2017, CCMB-2017-04-004
                                    [5]    Security IC Platform Protection Profile with Augmentation Packages, Version 1.0,
                                           registered and certified by Bundesamt fuer Sicherheit in der Informationstechnik
                                           (BSI) under the reference BSI-PP-0084-2014

                              9.2 Developer documents
                                    [6]    N7021 Crypto Library: User Guidance – N7021 Crypto Library
                                    [7]    N7021 Crypto Library: User Manual – Hash
                                    [8]    N7021 Crypto Library: User Manual – SHA
                                    [9]    N7021 Crypto Library: User Manual – RSA
                                    [10]   N7021 Crypto Library: User Manual – RSA Key Generation
                                    [11]   N7021 Crypto Library: User Manual – ECC over GF(p)
                                    [12]   N7021 Crypto Library: User Manual – UtilsAsym
                                    [13]   NXP Secure Smart Card Controller N7021 VA: Security Target, NXP
                                           Semiconductors

                              9.3 Standards
                                    [14] ISO 11568-4-2007: Banking – Key management (retail) – Part 4: Asymmetric
                                         cryptosystems – Key management and life cycle, 2007
                                    [15] ISO/IEC 11770-3-2015: Information technology - Security techniques - Key
                                         management - Part 3: Mechanisms using asymmetric techniques, 2015
                                    [16] FIPS PUB 180-4: Secure Hash Standard, Federal Information Processing
                                         Standards Publication, February 2011, US Department of Commerce/National
                                         Institute of Standards and Technology
                                    [17] FIPS PUB 186-4: Digital Signature Standard, Federal Information Processing
                                         Standards Publication, 2013, July, National Institute of Standards and Technology
                                    [18] ISO/IEC 14888-3:2015: Information technology – Security techniques – Digital
                                         signatures with appendix - Part 3: Discrete logarithm based mechanisms, 2016.
                                    [19] JIL-ATT-SC: Attack Methods for Smartcards and Similar Devices, Joint
                                         Interpretation Library, Version 2.2, January 2013
                                    [20] IEEE Std 1363™-2000: IEEE Standard Specifications for Public-Key Cryptography,
                                         IEEE Computer Society, 2005-12-12
                                    [21] ANSI X9.62: Public Key Cryptography for the Financial Services Industry, The
                                         Elliptic Curve Digital Signature Standard (ECDSA), American National Standard,
                                         November 16th, 2005


Crypto Library Cobalt on N7021 VA                    All information provided in this document is subject to legal disclaimers.     © NXP B.V. 2019. All rights reserved.

Product evaluation document                                          Rev. 2.3 — 5 June 2019
PUBLIC                                                                                                                                                        30 / 35
NXP Semiconductors                                                                                           Crypto Library Cobalt on N7021 VA
                                                                                                                               Security Target Lite



                                    [22] ANSI X9.63: Public Key Cryptography for the Financial Services Industry, Key
                                         Agreement and Key Transport Using Elliptic Curve cryptography, American National
                                         Standard, January 2011
                                    [23] RFC 5639: Elliptic Curve Cryptography (ECC) Brainpool Standard - Curves and
                                         Curve Generation, IETF, March 2010
                                    [24] ANSSI 2011:http://www.legifrance.gouv.fr/affichTexte.do;jsessionid=?
                                         cidTexte=JORFTEXT000024668816




Crypto Library Cobalt on N7021 VA                 All information provided in this document is subject to legal disclaimers.     © NXP B.V. 2019. All rights reserved.

Product evaluation document                                       Rev. 2.3 — 5 June 2019
PUBLIC                                                                                                                                                     31 / 35
NXP Semiconductors                                                                                             Crypto Library Cobalt on N7021 VA
                                                                                                                                 Security Target Lite



10 Legal information

                            10.1 Definitions
                                    Draft — The document is a draft version only. The content is still under internal review
                                    and subject to formal approval, which may result in modifications or additions. NXP
                                    Semiconductors does not give any representations or warranties as to the accuracy
                                    or completeness of information included herein and shall have no liability for the
                                    consequences of use of such information.

                            10.2 Disclaimers
                                    Limited warranty and liability — Information in this document is believed to be accurate
                                    and reliable. However, NXP Semiconductors does not give any representations or
                                    warranties, expressed or implied, as to the accuracy or completeness of such information
                                    and shall have no liability for the consequences of use of such information. NXP
                                    Semiconductors takes no responsibility for the content in this document if provided by an
                                    information source outside of NXP Semiconductors.
                                    In no event shall NXP Semiconductors be liable for any indirect, incidental, punitive,
                                    special or consequential damages (including - without limitation - lost profits,        Support of Authentication of the Security IC ..................................................................................45
6.2           TOE Security Assurance Requirements ................................................................................................45
6.2.1            Refinements .....................................................................................................................................46
6.2.2            Security policy model details ..........................................................................................................47
6.3           Security Requirements Rationale .........................................................................................................48
6.3.1            Rationale for the Security Functional Requirements .....................................................................48
6.3.2            Rationale of the Assurance Requirements......................................................................................52
7             TOE Summary Specification (ASE_TSS) ...........................................................................53
7.1           SF_DPM: Device Phase Management ...................................................................................................53
7.2           SF_PS: Protection against Snooping....................................................................................................53
7.3           SF_PMA: Protection against Modifying Attacks ...................................................................................53
7.4           SF_PLA: Protection against Logical Attacks.........................................................................................53
7.5           SF_CS: Cryptographic Support .............................................................................................................53
7.6           Assignment of Security Functional Requirements to TOE’s Security Functionality...........................53
7.7           Security Requirements are internally consistent.................................................................................55
8             References ...................................................................................................................56
9             Appendix: hash signatures of NRGҹ SW ...........................................................................58
9.1           Hash Digests of the NrgOS.lib ...............................................................................................................58
9.2           Hash Digests of the NrgManagement.lib..............................................................................................58
10            Appendix: hash signatures of the HSL .............................................................................59
11            Appendix: hash signatures of UMSLC lib ..........................................................................60
12            Appendix: hash signatures of SCL ...................................................................................61
13            Appendix: hash signatures of ACL ...................................................................................62
14            List of Abbreviations .....................................................................................................63
15            Glossary.......................................................................................................................66
16            Revision History ...........................................................................................................68




Security Target                                                               3                                                                             v4.0
                                                                                                                                                      2020-10-15
Security Target Lite

Security Target Introduction (ASE_INT)


1                 Security Target Introduction (ASE_INT)
1.1               ST reference
The ST has the revision v4.0 and is dated 2020-10-15. The title of this document IFX_CCI_00002Dh,
IFX_CCI_000039h, IFX_CCI_00003Ah, IFX_CCI_000044h, IFX_CCI_000045h, IFX_CCI_000046h, IFX_CCI_000047h,
IFX_CCI_000048h, IFX_CCI_000049h, IFX_CCI_00004Ah, IFX_CCI_00004Bh, IFX_CCI_00004Ch, IFX_CCI_00004Dh,
IFX_CCI_00004Eh T11 Security Target Lite.

1.2               TOE Reference
The ST comprises an Infineon Technologies Security Controller named IFX_CCI_00002Dh, IFX_CCI_000039h,
IFX_CCI_00003Ah, IFX_CCI_000044h, IFX_CCI_000045h, IFX_CCI_000046h, IFX_CCI_000047h, IFX_CCI_000048h,
IFX_CCI_000049h, IFX_CCI_00004Ah, IFX_CCI_00004Bh, IFX_CCI_00004Ch, IFX_CCI_00004Dh, IFX_CCI_00004Eh
design step T11 with firmware 80.306.16.0, optional NRGҹ SW 05.03.4097, optional HSL v3.52.9708, UMSLC lib
v01.30.0564, optional SCL v2.11.003, optional ACL v3.02.000and user guidance in the following called TOE
(Target of evaluation).
The ST is based on the Protection Profile [PP0084].
The Protection Profile and the ST are built in compliance to Common Criteria v3.1.
The targeted assurance level is EAL6+.




Security Target                                        4                                                v4.0
                                                                                                  2020-10-15
Security Target Lite

Security Target Introduction (ASE_INT)



Table 1       Identification
 Hardware                            Version                   Method of identification
 IFX_CCI_00002Dh,                    T11 (design step)         Non-ISO ATR
 IFX_CCI_000039h,
 IFX_CCI_00003Ah,
 IFX_CCI_000044h,
 IFX_CCI_000045h,
 IFX_CCI_000046h,
 IFX_CCI_000047h,
 IFX_CCI_000048h,
 IFX_CCI_000049h,
 IFX_CCI_00004Ah,
 IFX_CCI_00004Bh,
 IFX_CCI_00004Ch,
 IFX_CCI_00004Dh,
 IFX_CCI_00004Eh (each of the
 comma separated term is a
 Common Criteria Certification
 Identifier)
 firmware
 BOS & POWS                          80.306.16.0               Non-ISO ATR: firmware identifier
 Flash-loader                        09.12.0005                Flash-loader function
 Software
 NRGҹ SW (optional)                  05.03.4097                NRGҹ SW function
 HSL (optional)                      v3.52.9708                HSL function
 UMSLC                               v01.30.0564               UMSLC function
 SCL (optional)                      v2.11.003                 SCL function
 ACL (optional)                      v3.02.000                 ACL function
 User Guidance
 32-bit Security Controller – V11,                             document
 Hardware Reference Manual           V5.2, 2020-02-05
 32-bit Security Controllers,        V4.5, 2020-06-22          document
 SLx1/SLx3 Controller Family,
 Programmer’s Reference Manual
 32-bit Security Controller – V11,   v1.00-2661, 2020-10-05    document
 Security Guidelines
 Production and personalization      v.09.12, 2020-07-03       document
 32-bit ARM-based security
 controller
 32-bit Security Controller          V2.0, 2019-04-24          document
 Crypto2304T V3, User Manual
 HSL SLCx7 V11, Hardware Support     v3.52.9708, 2020-02-03    document
 Library (optional)
 UMSLC library for SLCx7 in 40nm,    v01.30.0564, 2019-06-19   document

Security Target                                         5                                       v4.0
                                                                                          2020-10-15
Security Target Lite

Security Target Introduction (ASE_INT)

 Hardware                             Version                               Method of identification
 SCL37-SCP-v440-C40                   v2.11.003, 2020-02-10                 document
 Symmetric Crypto Library for SCP-
 v440 AES/DES/MAC (optional)
 ACL37-Crypto2304T-C40                v3.02.000, 2020-02-07                 document
 Asymmetric Crypto Library for
 Crypto2304T RSA/ECC/Toolbox
 (optional)


A customer can identify the TOE hardware and its configuration (for details see chapter 1.4.7) using the Non-ISO
ATR. The Non-ISO ATR outputs a Common Criteria Certification Identifier and firmware identifier, which links
the TOE to this ST. Specific firmware functions can be used to determine the exact configuration of a device
from the certified range defined in Table 3.
The TOE can be ordered with a preloaded image. This image contains NVM loader functionality and is called
PFL (Performance Flash Loader) with version v09.10.90.9. The PFL is intended to be used in a secured
environment only and is not part of the TOE.

1.3               TOE Overview

1.3.1             TOE Definition and Usage
The TOE consists of smart card ICs (Security Controllers), firmware and user guidance meeting high
requirements in terms of performance and security designed by Infineon Technologies AG. This TOE is intended
to be used in smart cards for security-relevant applications and as developing platform for smart card
operating systems according to the lifecycle model from [PP0084]
The term Smartcard Embedded Software is used in the following for all operating systems and applications
stored and executed on the TOE. The TOE is the platform for the Smartcard Embedded Software. The
Smartcard Embedded Software itself is not part of the TOE. The TOE does not require any non-TOE
hardware/software/firmware.

1.3.2             TOE major security features
   Cryptographic support: TDES, AES, RSA, ECDSA, ECC, ECDH, RNG (Hybrid Random Number Generator PTG.3,
    True Random Number Generator PTG.2, Deterministic Random Number generator DRG.3 and DRG.4
    according to [BSI_RNGs])
   Memory protection unit supporting different memory access levels
   Memory encryption
   Robust set of sensors and detectors for the purpose of monitoring proper chip operating conditions
   Redundant alarm propagation and system deactivation principle
   Register protection
   Security life control
   Program flow integrity protection
   Peripheral access control
   Bus encryption for security peripherals
   Tearing safe NVM programming
   Security optimized wiring
   Leakage control of data dependent code execution

Security Target                                        6                                                     v4.0
                                                                                                       2020-10-15
Security Target Lite

Security Target Introduction (ASE_INT)

 Device phase management supporting isolation of test features and Flash Loader accessibility
 Detection of NVM single and multi bit errors



1.4                  TOE description

1.4.1                TOE components

1.4.1.1              Hardware components
Figure 1 shows a block diagram of the TOE hardware:
Figure 1      Block diagram of TOE hardware


                                                                Memory System

             Core:                                                     Solid FlashTM NVM     IFX ROM

                 CPU
                 NVIC             CPAU          Cache        ICS           Memory Bus (32 Bit)
                 MPU
                 ISS
                                                   ICS        Memory Bus (32 Bit)           RAM




                                                             Peripherals
                                                                           3x timer        Filters/
                                          SCP         RNG       µSM4                                    CRC
                                                                           & WDT           Sensors

                          SPAU                               Peripheral Bus (16 Bit)
                                                                              UART/            RF
                                     Crypto2304T      UMSLC         CLKU                                I2C
                                                                              GPIO          interface




The TOE hardware consists of a core, a memory system and peripherals.
The major components of the core system are a 32-bit CPU (Central Processing Unit), an MPU (Memory
Protection Unit), a Nested Vectored Interrupt Controller (NVIC) and an Instruction Stream Signature Checking
(ISS).
The MPU of the core stores code and data in a linear 4-GByte memory space (32-bit range), allowing direct
access without the need to swap memory segments in and out of memory using a memory protection unit.
There are two separate bus entities: a memory bus and a peripheral bus for high-speed communication with
the peripherals.
The SPAU can be configured by the user to block or allow peripheral access. It can also be used to block RAM
areas (For keeping Figure 1 simple, the connection between SPAU and RAM is not shown). The CPAU enables
the user to block or allow unprivileged level access to NVM and specific registers of ICS and NVM.
Security Target                                          7                                                    v4.0
                                                                                                        2020-10-15
Security Target Lite

Security Target Introduction (ASE_INT)

The CPU accesses memory via the Internal Ciphering System (ICS), which encrypts/decrypts memory content.
All data of the memory block is encrypted. The NVM is equipped with an error correction code (ECC). Security
modules manage the alarms. Alarms may be triggered when the environmental conditions are outside the
specified operational range.
A set of sensors (temperature sensor, backside light detector, glitch sensor, low frequency sensor) is used to
detect excessive deviations from the specified operational range and serve for robustness of the TOE. The
UMSLC function can be used to test the alarm lines.
A Random Number Generator (RNG) consist of a physical Random Number Generator with a cryptographically
strong post processing unit. It can be operated in the modes as follows:
 True Random Number Generation, meeting AIS31 PTG.2
 Hybrid Random Number Generation, meeting AIS31 PTG.3
 Deterministic Random Number Generation (DRNG) AIS31 DRG.3 and DRG.4

The Symmetric Cryptographic Processor (SCP) implements calculation of dual-key or triple-key triple-DES and
AES.
The µSM4 supports the Chinese standard encryption algorithm SM4.
The Crypto2304T co-processor provides basic means optimized for the implementation of fast and secure
software of many asymmetric or public key cryptographic schemes like RSA or elliptic curve based ones. The
user accessibility of the Crypto2304T is a customer ordering option
The implemented sleep mode logic (clock stop mode per ISO/IEC 7816-3) is used to reduce overall power
consumption.
The TOE is able to communicate using either its contact based or contactless interface (RF interface). The
contact based interface allows to use the ISO 7816 protocol via the UART. Further it offers a GPIO and an I2C
slave interface. The contactless interface can be configured to RFI or ACLB mode. Both interface types support
the signaling modes as follows:
 Signalling mode ISO/IEC 14443, Type A and Type B
 Signalling mode ISO/IEC 18092 passive mode, Type F
 NRGҹ interface

The UMSLC enables the user software to check the activity and proper function of the system’s security
features.
The Clock Unit (CLKU) supplies the clocks for all components of the TOE. The Clock Unit can work in internal
and external clock mode. When operating the internal clock mode the system frequency is derived from an
oscillator, whereas in external clock mode, the system clock is derived from an externally supplied interface
clock.
The watchdog timer triggers an event in case of a counter overflow. The timers are general purpose up-
counting timers.
A CRC (Cyclic Redundancy Check) module computes a checksum value from a message or any other block of
data.
The ROM is used by IFX only. The user software has to be implemented in SOLID FLASHҹ memory. The user can
choose, whether the software is loaded into the SOLID FLASHҹ memory by Infineon Technologies AG or by the
user.
The TOE uses Special Function Registers (SFRs). These SFRs are used for general purposes and chip
configuration; they are located in SOLID FLASHҹ memory in a configuration area page. The Online

Security Target                                         8                                                     v4.0
                                                                                                        2020-10-15
Security Target Lite

Security Target Introduction (ASE_INT)

Configuration Check (OCC) function is used for register protection, i.e. controls the modification of relevant
SFR settings.
In case a security violation is detected, secure state is entered by the hardware.

1.4.1.2            Firmware and software components
The TOE provides low-level firmware components: the Boot Software (BOS), the Performance Optimized Write
Scheme (POWS) and the Flash Loader (FL).
The BOS firmware is used for test purposes during start-up and the FL allows downloading of user software to
the NVM during the manufacturing process. All mandatory functions for start-up and internal testing are
protected by a dedicated hardware firewall with two levels “BOS” and “user”.
The POWS library is an internal firmware library, i.e. not accessible by the user. It is used by the BOS and FL to
store data in NVM in a tearing safe manner.
The Flash Loader allows downloading of User Software into the NVM during the manufacturing process.
The software of the TOE consists of optional packages:
   NRGҹ SW: The optional NRGҹ SW supports Card and Reader Mode, e.g. card creation, personalization and
    deletion. The NRGҹ SW does not implement any security functionality
   HSL: The optional HSL provides functionality via APIs to the Smartcard Embedded Software . which
    contains SOLID FLASHҹ NVM service routines and functionality for tearing safe programming of SOLID
    FLASHҹ NVM.
   UMSLC lib: this library provides a wrapper around the UMSLC hardware functionality with measures to
    counter fault attacks.
   Symmetric Crypto Library (SCL): The optional SCL is used to provide a high level interface to the TDES and
    AES cryptography, which is partly implemented on the hardware component SCP and includes
    countermeasures against SPA, DPA and DFA attacks. The SCL is delivered as object code and in this way
    integrated into the user software.
   Asymmetric Crypto Library (ACL): The optional ACL implements RSA and elliptic curve based cryptographic
    schemes

1.4.1.3            User Guidance components
The user guidance consists of the components as follows:
   32-bit Security Controller – V11, Hardware Reference Manual: description of hardware features and user
    interfaces
   32-bit ARM-based Securtity Controller, SLC 37/(40-nm Techn2.2      Security Policy                                                   9
                                                                                                 2.3      Assumptions and Clarification of Scope                            9
                                                                                                 2.4      Architectural Information                                         9
                                                                                                 2.5      Documentation                                                    10
                                                                                                 2.6      IT Product Testing                                               10
                                                                                                 2.7      Re-used evaluation results                                       12
                                                                                                 2.8      Evaluated Configuration                                          12
                                                                                                 2.9      Results of the Evaluation                                        12
                                                                                                 2.10     Comments/Recommendations                                         13

                                                                                                 3 Security Target                                                         14

                                                                                                 4 Definitions                                                             14

                                                                                                 5 Bibliography                                                            15
® TÜV, TUEV and TUV are registered trademarks. Any use or application requires prior approval.
                                                                                                 Page: 4/15 of report number: NSCIB-CC-67206-CR4.1, dated 25 August 2020




                                                                                                 Foreword
                                                                                                 The Netherlands Scheme for Certification in the Area of IT Security (NSCIB) provides a third-party
                                                                                                 evaluation and certification service for determining the trustworthiness of Information Technology (IT)
                                                                                                 security products. Under this NSCIB, TÜV Rheinland Nederland B.V. has the task of issuing
                                                                                                 certificates for IT security products, as well as for protection profiles and sites.
                                                                                                 Part of the procedure is the technical examination (evaluation) of the product, protection profile or site
                                                                                                 according to the Common Criteria assessment guidelines published by the NSCIB. Evaluations are
                                                                                                 performed by an IT Security Evaluation Facility (ITSEF) under the oversight of the NSCIB Certification
                                                                                                 Body, which is operated by TÜV Rheinland Nederland B.V. in cooperation with the Ministry of the
                                                                                                 Interior and Kingdom Relations.
                                                                                                 An ITSEF in the Netherlands is a commercial facility that has been licensed by TÜV Rheinland
                                                                                                 Nederland B.V. to perform Common Criteria evaluations; a significant requirement for such a license is
                                                                                                 accreditation to the requirements of ISO Standard 17025 “General requirements for the accreditation
                                                                                                 of calibration and testing laboratories”.
                                                                                                 By awarding a Common Criteria certificate, TÜV Rheinland Nederland B.V. asserts that the product or
                                                                                                 site complies with the security requirements specified in the associated (site) security target, or that
                                                                                                 the protection profile (PP) complies with the requirements for PP evaluation specified in the Common
                                                                                                 Criteria for Information Security Evaluation. A (site) security target is a requirements specification
                                                                                                 document that defines the scope of the evaluation activities.
                                                                                                 The consumer should review the (site) security target or protection profile, in addition to this
                                                                                                 certification report, in order to gain an understanding of any assumptions made during the evaluation,
                                                                                                 the IT product's intended environment, its security requirements, and the level of confidence (i.e., the
                                                                                                 evaluation assurance level) that the product or site satisfies the security requirements stated in the
                                                                                                 (site) security target.
                                                                                                 Reproduction of this report is authorized provided the report is reproduced in its entirety.
® TÜV, TUEV and TUV are registered trademarks. Any use or application requires prior approval.
                                                                                                 Page: 5/15 of report number: NSCIB-CC-67206-CR4.1, dated 25 August 2020




                                                                                                 Recognition of the certificate
                                                                                                 Presence of the Common Criteria Recognition Arrangement and SOG-IS logos on the certificate
                                                                                                 indicates that this certificate is issued in accordance with the provisions of the CCRA and the SOG-IS
                                                                                                 agreement and will be recognised by the participating nations.

                                                                                                 International recognition
                                                                                                 The CCRA has been signed by the Netherlands in May 2000 and provides mutual recognition of
                                                                                                 certificates based on the CC. Starting September 2014 the CCRA has been updated to provide mutual
                                                                                                 recognition of certificates based on cPPs (exact use) or STs with evaluation assurance components
                                                                                                 up to and including EAL2+ALC_FLR. The current list of signatory nations and approved certification
                                                                                                 schemes can be found on: http://www.commoncriteriaportal.org.

                                                                                                 European recognition
                                                                                                 The European SOGIS-Mutual Recognition Agreement (SOGIS-MRA) version 3 effective from April
                                                                                                 2010 provides mutual recognition of Common Criteria and ITSEC certificates at a basic evaluation
                                                                                                 level for all products. A higher recognition level for evaluation levels beyond EAL4 (resp. E3-basic) is
                                                                                                 provided for products related to specific technical domains. This agreement was initially signed by
                                                                                                 Finland, France, Germany, The Netherlands, Norway, Spain, Sweden and the United Kingdom. Italy
                                                                                                 joined the SOGIS-MRA in December 2010. The current list of signatory nations, approved certification
                                                                                                 schemes and the list of technical domains for which the higher recognition applies can be found on:
                                                                                                 http://www.sogisportal.eu.
® TÜV, TUEV and TUV are registered trademarks. Any use or application requires prior approval.
                                                                                                 Page: 6/15 of report number: NSCIB-CC-67206-CR4.1, dated 25 August 2020




                                                                                                 1 Executive Summary
                                                                                                 This Certification Report states the outcome of the Common Criteria security evaluation of the Crypto
                                                                                                 Library V3.1.x on P6022y VB. The developer of the Crypto Library V3.1.x on P6022y VB is NXP
                                                                                                 Semiconductors Germany GmbH located in Hamburg, Germany and they also act as the sponsor of
                                                                                                 the evaluation and certification. A Certification Report is intended to assist prospective consumers
                                                                                                 when judging the suitability of the IT security properties of the product for their particular requirements.
                                                                                                 The Target of Evaluation (TOE) consists of the Crypto Library V3.1.x and the NXP Secure Smart Card
                                                                                                 Controller P6022y VB Secure Smart Card Controller. For ease of reading the TOE is often called
                                                                                                 “Crypto Library on SmartMX2”.
                                                                                                 The Crypto Library on SmartMX2 is a cryptographic library, which provides a set of cryptographic
                                                                                                 functions that can be used by the Smartcard Embedded Software. The cryptographic library consists
                                                                                                 of several binary packages that are intended to be linked to the Smartcard Embedded Software. The
                                                                                                 Smartcard Embedded Software developer links the binary packages that he needs to his Smartcard
                                                                                                 Embedded Software and the whole is subsequently implemented in arbitrary memory. The NXP
                                                                                                 SmartMX2 smart card processor provides the computing platform and cryptographic support by means
                                                                                                 of co-processors for the Crypto Library on SmartMX2.
                                                                                                 The TOE provides AES, DES, Triple-DES (3DES), RSA, RSA key generation, RSA public key
                                                                                                 computation, ECDSA, ECC key generation, ECDH, ECC point addition, and SHA-1, SHA-224, SHA-
                                                                                                 256, SHA-384, SHA-512 algorithms.
                                                                                                 In addition, the Crypto Library implements a software (pseudo) random number generator, which is
                                                                                                 initialised (seeded) by the hardware random number generator of the SmartMX2.
                                                                                                 Finally, the TOE provides a secure copy routine, a secure compare routine, a secure modular multiply
                                                                                                 routine, a secure modular add and subtract routine, and includes internal security measures for
                                                                                                 residual information protection. For more details refer to the [ST], chapter 1.3.2.
                                                                                                 Note that in the [ST] the “Crypto Library V3.1.x” represents the Crypto Library V3.1.2.
                                                                                                 In case of a composite evaluation the used minor version of the CL should be explicitly checked and
                                                                                                 mentioned.
                                                                                                 The TOE has been originally evaluated by Brightsight B.V. located in Delft, The Netherlands and was
                                                                                                 certified on 28 July 2016, and re-certified on 17 November 2017 and 29 May 2019. The re-evaluation
                                                                                                 also took place by Brightsight B.V. and was completed on 5 December 2019 with the approval of the
                                                                                                 ETR. The re-certification procedure has been conducted in accordance with the provisions of the
                                                                                                 Netherlands Scheme for Certification in the Area of IT Security [NSCIB].
® TÜV, TUEV and TUV are registered trademarks. Any use or application requires prior approval.




                                                                                                 This fourth issue of the Certification Report addresses the following changes of the underlying platform
                                                                                                 certification: updated guidance, additional production sites and an additional hardware configuration,
                                                                                                 with the subsequent recertification of the hardware. The security evaluation re-used the evaluation
                                                                                                 results of previously performed evaluations. A full, up to date vulnerability analysis has been made, as
                                                                                                 well as renewed testing.
                                                                                                 Note that in the second certification of this TOE, the ST was updated to remove all claims regarding
                                                                                                 the security of ECC parameter verification. If the security of a composite or end product relies on this
                                                                                                 functionality, appropriate evaluation of the security properties of this functionality is required.
                                                                                                 Note that in the third certification of this TOE, the scope of the underlying platform certification was
                                                                                                 updated: MIFARE is now out of all scopes, production sites were added and an additional variant was
                                                                                                 included.
                                                                                                 For clarity to composite evaluations and certifications, this certification report has been updated to
                                                                                                 explicitly state that the additional minor hardware configuration added by the underlying hardware
                                                                                                 recertification [HW-CERT] has been explicitly considered in both the vulnerability analysis and
                                                                                                 penetration testing. The references to the hardware certificate [HW-CERT] and ETR for Composition
                                                                                                 [HW-ETRfC] have been corrected in this version 4.1 of the Certification Report. As there is no change
                                                                                                 or update to the evaluation work done, the original certificate and certificate date 07-01-2020 are valid
                                                                                                 without change.
                                                                                                 Page: 7/15 of report number: NSCIB-CC-67206-CR4.1, dated 25 August 2020




                                                                                                 The scope of the evaluation is defined by the security target [ST], which identifies assumptions made
                                                                                                 during the evaluation, the intended environment for the Crypto Library V3.1.x on P6022y VB, the
                                                                                                 security requirements, and the level of confidence (evaluation assurance level) at which the product is
                                                                                                 intended to satisfy the security requirements. Consumers of the Crypto Library V3.1.x on P6022y VB
                                                                                                 are advised to verify that their own environment is consistent with the security target, and to give due
                                                                                                 consideration to the comments, observations and recommendations in this certification report.
                                                                                                                                                                           1
                                                                                                 The results documented in the evaluation technical report [ETR] for this product provide sufficient
                                                                                                 evidence that it meets the EAL6 augmented (EAL6(+)) assurance requirements for the evaluated
                                                                                                 security functionality. This assurance level is augmented with ALC_FLR.1 (Basic flaw remediation)
                                                                                                 and ASE_TSS.2 (TOE summary specification with architectural design summary).
                                                                                                 The evaluation was conducted using the Common Methodology for Information Technology Security
                                                                                                 Evaluation, Version 3.1 Revision 5 [CEM], for conformance to the Common Criteria for Information
                                                                                                 Technology Security Evaluation, version 3.1 Revision 5 [CC].
                                                                                                 TÜV Rheinland Nederland B.V., as the NSCIB Certification Body, declares that the evaluation meets
                                                                                                 all the conditions for international recognition of Common Criteria Certificates and that the product will
                                                                                                 be listed on the NSCIB Certified Products list. It should be noted that the certification results only apply
                                                                                                 to the specific version of the product as evaluated.
® TÜV, TUEV and TUV are registered trademarks. Any use or application requires prior approval.




                                                                                                 1
                                                                                                  The Evaluation Technical Report contains information proprietary to the developer and/or the
                                                                                                 evaluator, and is not releasable for public review.
                                                                                                 Page: 8/15 of report number: NSCIB-CC-67206-CR4.1, dated 25 August 2020




                                                                                                 2 Certification Results
                                                                                                 2.1     Identification of Target of Evaluation
                                                                                                 The Target of Evaluation (TOE) for this evaluation is the Crypto Library V3.1.x on P6022y VB from
                                                                                                 NXP Semiconductors Germany GmbH located in Hamburg, Germany.
                                                                                                 The TOE is comprised of the following main components:
                                                                                                                                                     Release
                                                                                                 Type           Name                                            Date         Form of delivery
                                                                                                 Library File   phSmx2ClDes.lib                      1.5        2015-09-14   Electronic file

                                                                                                                phSmx2ClAes.lib                      1.6        2015-09-14   Electronic file
                                                                                                                phSmx2ClRsa.lib                      1.10       2015-09-14   Electronic file
                                                                                                                phSmx2ClRsaKg.lib                    2.7        2015-09-14   Electronic file
                                                                                                                phSmx2ClEccGfp.lib                   2.7        2015-09-14   Electronic file
                                                                                                                phSmx2ClSha.lib                      1.7        2015-09-14   Electronic file
                                                                                                                phSmx2ClSha512.lib                   1.8        2015-09-14   Electronic file
                                                                                                                phSmx2ClRng.lib                      2.8        2015-09-14   Electronic file
                                                                                                                phSmx2ClUtils.lib                    2.2        2015-09-14   Electronic file
                                                                                                                phSmx2ClSymCfg.lib                   1.8        2015-09-14   Electronic file
                                                                                                 Header file    phSmx2ClDes.h                        1.4        2015-03-26   Electronic file
                                                                                                                phSmx2ClAes.h                        1.5        2015-03-26   Electronic file
                                                                                                                phSmx2ClRsa.h                        1.9        2015-04-28   Electronic file
                                                                                                                phSmx2ClRsaKg.h                      2.6        2015-04-28   Electronic file
                                                                                                                phSmx2ClEccGfp.h                     2.6        2015-04-28   Electronic file
                                                                                                                phSmx2ClSha.h                        1.6        2015-03-26   Electronic file
                                                                                                                phSmx2ClSha512.h                     1.7        2015-03-26   Electronic file
                                                                                                                phSmx2ClRng.h                        2.7        2015-04-28   Electronic file
                                                                                                                phSmx2ClUtils.h                      2.0        2015-04-28   Electronic file
                                                                                                                phSmx2ClUtils_ImportExportFcts.h     2.0        2015-04-28   Electronic file
                                                                                                                phSmx2ClUtils_RngAccess.h            2.0        2015-04-28   Electronic file
® TÜV, TUEV and TUV are registered trademarks. Any use or application requires prior approval.




                                                                                                                phSmx2ClTypes.h                      1.1        2013-11-15   Electronic file
                                                                                                                phSmx2ClSymCfg.h                     1.7        2015-03-26   Electronic file
                                                                                                                phSmx2ClSymCfg_Aes.h                 1.7        2015-03-26   Electronic file
                                                                                                                phSmx2ClSymCfg_Des.h                 1.7        2015-03-26   Electronic file
                                                                                                 Source code    phSmx2ClUtils_ImportExportFcts.a51   2.0        2015-04-28   Electronic file
                                                                                                                phSmx2ClUtils_RngAccess.a51          2.0        2015-04-28   Electronic file


                                                                                                 To ensure secure usage a set of guidance documents is provided together with the Crypto Library
                                                                                                 V3.1.x on P6022y VB. Details can be found in section 2.5 of this report.
                                                                                                 The hardware part of the TOE is delivered by NXP as described in the hardware guidance.
                                                                                                 The Crypto Library is delivered in Phase 1 of the TOE lifecycle (for a detailed and precise description
                                                                                                 of the TOE lifecycle refer to the [ST], chapter 1.2.2.) as a software package (a set of binary files) to the
                                                                                                 developers of the Smartcard Embedded Software. The Smartcard Embedded Software may comprise
                                                                                                 in this case an operating system and/or other smart card software (applications). The Software
                                                                                                 developers can incorporate the Crypto Library into their product.
                                                                                                 As explained in the user guidance, as part of the delivery procedure, the customer shall verify the
                                                                                                 correctness of the delivered files by calculating the SHA-256 hash value of the delivered files and
                                                                                                 comparing them to reference values provided in the user guidance.
                                                                                                 For the identification of the Hardware please refer to the hardware certification.
                                                                                                 Page: 9/15 of report number: NSCIB-CC-67206-CR4.1, dated 25 August 2020




                                                                                                 2.2     Security Policy
                                                                                                 The TOE provides the cryptographic algorithms AES, DES, Triple-DES (3DES), RSA, RSA key
                                                                                                 generation, RSA public key computation, ECDSA (ECC over GF(p)) signature generation and
                                                                                                 verification, ECDSA (ECC over GF(p)) key generation, ECDH (ECC Diffie-Hellmann key-exchange, full
                                                                                                 point addition (ECC over GF(p)), standard security level SHA 1, SHA-224, SHA-256, SHA-384, SHA-
                                                                                                 512 algorithms in addition to the functionality described in the Hardware Security Target [ST-HW] for
                                                                                                 the hardware platform. The cryptographic algorithms (except SHA) are resistant against Side Channel
                                                                                                 Attacks, including Simple Power Analysis (SPA), Differential Power Analysis (DPA), Differential Fault
                                                                                                 Analysis (DFA) and timing attacks. SHA is only resistant against Side Channel Attacks and timing
                                                                                                 attacks. Details on the resistance claims are provided in the Security Target [ST], relevant details are
                                                                                                 provided in the user guidance documents.
                                                                                                 The TOE implements a software (pseudo) random number generator, which is initialised (seeded) by
                                                                                                 the hardware random number generator of the SmartMX2.
                                                                                                 The TOE also a secure copy routine, a secure compare routine, secure modular multiply routine, a
                                                                                                 secure modular add and subtract routine and includes internal security measures for residual
                                                                                                 information protection.
                                                                                                 Note that the TOE does not restrict access to the functions provided by the hardware: these functions
                                                                                                 are still directly accessible to the Smartcard embedded Software.

                                                                                                 2.3     Assumptions and Clarification of Scope

                                                                                                 2.3.1    Assumptions
                                                                                                 The assumptions defined in the Security Target are not covered by the TOE itself. These aspects lead
                                                                                                 to specific Security Objectives to be fulfilled by the TOE-Environment. Detailed information on these
                                                                                                 security objectives that must be fulfilled by the TOE environment can be found in chapter 4 of the [ST].

                                                                                                 2.3.2    Clarification of scope
                                                                                                 The evaluation did not reveal any threats to the TOE that are not countered by the evaluated security
                                                                                                 functions of the product.

                                                                                                 2.4     Architectural Information
                                                                                                 This chapter provides a high-level description of the IT product and its major components based on
® TÜV, TUEV and TUV are registered trademarks. Any use or application requires prior approval.




                                                                                                 the evaluation evidence described in the Common Criteria assurance family entitled “TOE design
                                                                                                 (ADV_TDS)”. The intent of this chapter is to characterise the degree of architectural separation of the
                                                                                                 major components and to show dependencies between the TOE and products using the TOE in a
                                                                                                 composition (e.g. dependencies between HW and SW).
                                                                                                 The TOE contains a Crypto Library, which provides a set of cryptographic functionalities that can be
                                                                                                 used by the Smartcard Embedded Software. The Crypto Library consists of several binary packages
                                                                                                 that are intended to be linked to the Smartcard Embedded Software. The Smartcard Embedded
                                                                                                 Software developer links the binary packages that he needs to his Smartcard Embedded Software and
                                                                                                 the whole is subsequently implemented in arbitrary memory. Please note that the crypto functions are
                                                                                                 supplied as a library rather than as a monolithic program, and hence a user of the library may include
                                                                                                 only those functions that are actually required. However, some dependencies exist; details are
                                                                                                 described in the User Guidance.
                                                                                                 The TOE is implemented as a set of subsystems. The division into subsystems is chosen according to
                                                                                                 the cryptographic algorithms provided. The whole TOE provides AES, DES, Triple-DES (3DES), RSA,
                                                                                                 RSA key generation, RSA public key computation, ECDSA (ECC over GF(p)) signature generation
                                                                                                 and verification, ECDSA (ECC over GF(p)) signature generation and verification, ECDSA (ECC over
                                                                                                 GF(p)) key generation, ECDH (ECC Diffie-Hellmann) key-exchange, full point addition (ECC over
                                                                                                 GF(p), SHA-1, SHA-224, SHA-256, SHA-384, SHA-512 algorithms in addition to the functionality
                                                                                                 described in the Hardware Security Target [ST-HW] for the hardware platform. In addition, the TOE
                                                                                                 implements a software (pseudo) random number generator, which is initialised (seeded) by the
                                                                                                 hardware random number generator of the SmartMX2.
                                                                                                 Page: 10/15 of report number: NSCIB-CC-67206-CR4.1, dated 25 August 2020




                                                                                                 Finally, the TOE provides a secure copy routine, a secure compare routine, a secure modular multiply
                                                                                                 routine, a secure modular add and subtract routine, and includes internal security measures for
                                                                                                 residual information protection.

                                                                                                 2.5      Documentation
                                                                                                 The following documentation is provided with the product by the developer to the customer:

                                                                                                 Type             Name                              Release     Date         Form of delivery


                                                                                                 Documents User Guidance Manual                    1.6         2018-02-28   Electronic document
                                                                                                                 User Guidance: DES                1.0         2015-11-23   Electronic document
                                                                                                                 User Guidance: AES                1.0         2015-11-23   Electronic document
                                                                                                                 User Guidance: RSA                1.0         2015-11-23   Electronic document
                                                                                                                 User Guidance: RSA Key Generation 1.0         2015-11-23   Electronic document
                                                                                                                 User Guidance: ECC over GF(p)     1.0         2015-11-23   Electronic document
                                                                                                                 User Guidance: SHA                1.0         2015-11-23   Electronic document
                                                                                                                 User Guidance: SHA512             1.0         2015-11-23   Electronic document
                                                                                                                 User Guidance: RNG                1.0         2015-11-23   Electronic document
                                                                                                                 User Guidance: Utils              1.0         2015-11-23   Electronic document
                                                                                                                 User Guidance: SymCfg             1.1         2016-03-16   Electronic document



                                                                                                 2.6      IT Product Testing
                                                                                                 Testing (depth, coverage, functional tests, independent testing): The evaluators examined the
                                                                                                 developer’s testing activities documentation and verified that the developer has met their testing
                                                                                                 responsibilities.

                                                                                                 2.6.1         Testing approach and depth
                                                                                                 For the Crypto Library, the developer has performed extensive testing on FSP, subsystem and module
                                                                                                 level. All parameter choices have been addressed at least once. All boundary cases identified have
                                                                                                 been tested explicitly, and additionally the near-boundary conditions have been covered
® TÜV, TUEV and TUV are registered trademarks. Any use or application requires prior approval.




                                                                                                 probabilistically. The testing was largely automated using a test-OS that allows access to the
                                                                                                 functionalities. Test scripts were extensively used to verify that the functions return the expected
                                                                                                 values.
                                                                                                 The hardware test results are extendable to composite evaluations on this hardware TOE, as the
                                                                                                 hardware is operated according to its guidance and the composite evaluation requirements are met.
                                                                                                 For the testing performed by the evaluators, the developer has provided a testing environment. The
                                                                                                 evaluators have reproduced a selection of the developer tests, as well as a small number of test cases
                                                                                                 designed by the evaluator.

                                                                                                 2.6.2         Independent Penetration Testing
                                                                                                 The evaluator independent penetration tests were conducted according to the following testing
                                                                                                 approach:
                                                                                                 1. Inventory of required resistance
                                                                                                       This step uses the JIL attack list [JIL-AM] as a reference for completeness and studies the ST
                                                                                                       claims to decide which attacks in the JIL attack list apply for the NXP Crypto Library. In addition,
                                                                                                       both external ([BSI-RSA], [BSI-ECC]) and internal attack lists are used to augment the JIL attack
                                                                                                       list.
                                                                                                 2. Validation of security functionalities
                                                                                                 Page: 11/15 of report number: NSCIB-CC-67206-CR4.1, dated 25 August 2020




                                                                                                     This step identifies the implemented security functionalities and performs tests to verify
                                                                                                     implementation and to validate proper functioning. (ATE)
                                                                                                 3. Vulnerability analysis
                                                                                                     This step first gives an overview against which attacks the implemented security functionalities are
                                                                                                     meant to provide protection. Secondly in this step the design of the implemented security
                                                                                                     functionalities is studied. Thirdly, an analysis is performed to determine whether the design
                                                                                                     contains vulnerabilities against the respective attacks of step 1. (AVA)
                                                                                                 4. Analysis of input from other evaluation activities
                                                                                                     This step first analyses the input from other CC-evaluation classes expressed as possible
                                                                                                     vulnerabilities. Secondly, the evaluators made an analysis of the TOE in its intended environment
                                                                                                     to check whether the developer vulnerability analysis provides sufficient assurance or whether
                                                                                                     penetration testing is needed to provide sufficient assurance. (AVA)
                                                                                                 5. Design assurance evaluation
                                                                                                     This step analyses the results from an attack perspective as defined in step 1. Based on this
                                                                                                     design analysis the evaluators determine whether the design provides sufficient assurance or
                                                                                                     whether penetration testing is needed to provide sufficient assurance. (AVA)
                                                                                                 6. Penetration testing
                                                                                                     This step performs the penetration tests identified in step 4 and step 5. (AVA)
                                                                                                 7. Conclusions on resistance
                                                                                                     This step performs a [JIL-AM] compliant rating on the results of the penetration tests in relation
                                                                                                     with the assurance already gained by the design analysis. Based on the ratings the evaluators
                                                                                                     draw conclusions on the resistance of NXP Crypto Library against attackers possessing a high
                                                                                                     attack potential.

                                                                                                 2.6.3    Test Configuration
                                                                                                 Since the TOE is not an end-user product it is not possible to perform testing without first embedding it
® TÜV, TUEV and TUV are registered trademarks. Any use or application requires prior approval.




                                                                                                 in a testable configuration. To this end, the developer has created a proprietary test operating system.
                                                                                                 The main purpose of the test OS is to provide access to the crypto library’s functionality. The test OS,
                                                                                                 and its documentation, was provided to the evaluators, and was used in all the testing. See the [ETR]
                                                                                                 for details.
                                                                                                 The following items were used to provide support during the tests:
                                                                                                     •    A set of card samples (the TOE) containing the following:
                                                                                                              o    Hardware sample: P6022P VB in contact mode.
                                                                                                              o    Crypto library loaded into the hardware sample.
                                                                                                              o    CryptOS loaded into the hardware sample.
                                                                                                     •     A toolset provided by the developer in order to facilitate recreation of the Cryptographic
                                                                                                          library, and loading the library and the CryptOS into samples.
                                                                                                     •    CryptOS documentation

                                                                                                 2.6.4    Testing Results
                                                                                                 The testing activities, including configurations, procedures, test cases, expected results and observed
                                                                                                 results are summarised in the [ETR], with references to the documents containing the full details.
                                                                                                 The developer’s tests and the independent functional tests produced the expected results, giving
                                                                                                 assurance that the TOE behaves as specified in its [ST] and functional specification.
                                                                                                 Page: 12/15 of report number: NSCIB-CC-67206-CR4.1, dated 25 August 2020




                                                                                                 No exploitable vulnerabilities were found with the independent penetration tests.
                                                                                                 The algorithmic security level of cryptographic functionality has not been rated in this certification
                                                                                                 process, but the current consensus on the algorithmic security level in the open domain, i.e. from the
                                                                                                 current best cryptanalytic attacks published, has been taken into account.
                                                                                                 The strength of the implementation of the cryptographic functionality has been assessed in the
                                                                                                 evaluation, as part of the AVA_VAN activities. These activities revealed that for some cryptographic
                                                                                                 functionality the security level could be reduced. As the remaining security level still exceeds 80 bits,
                                                                                                 this is considered sufficient. So no exploitable vulnerabilities were found with the independent
                                                                                                 penetration tests.
                                                                                                 For composite evaluations, please consult the [ETRfC] for details.

                                                                                                 2.7     Re-used evaluation results
                                                                                                 This is a re-certification. Documentary evaluation results of the earlier version of the TOE have been
                                                                                                 re-used, but vulnerability analysis and penetration testing has been renewed.
                                                                                                 Note that this fourth issue of the Certification Report addresses the following changes of the
                                                                                                 underlying platform certification: updated guidance, additional production sites and an additional
                                                                                                 hardware configuration.
                                                                                                 Note that in the second certification of this TOE, the ST was updated to remove all claims regarding
                                                                                                 the security of ECC parameter verification. If the security of a composite or end product relies on this
                                                                                                 functionality, appropriate evaluation of the security properties of this functionality is required.
                                                                                                 Note that in the third certification of this TOE, the scope of the underlying platform certification was
                                                                                                 updated: MIFARE is now out of all scopes, production sites were added and an additional variant was
                                                                                                 included.
                                                                                                 The security evaluation re-used the evaluation results of previously performed evaluations. For this
                                                                                                 fourth issue of the Certification report a full, up to date vulnerability analysis has been made, as well
                                                                                                 as renewed testing.
                                                                                                 There has been extensive re-use of the ALC aspects for the sites involved in the software component
                                                                                                 of the TOE (NXP Semiconductors Hamburg, NXP Semiconductors Austria GmbH Styria, NXP
                                                                                                 Semiconductors Leuven) by the use of site certificates and site re-use report approaches. Sites
                                                                                                 involved in the development and production of the hardware platform were re-used by composition.
                                                                                                 No sites have been visited as part of this evaluation.
® TÜV, TUEV and TUV are registered trademarks. Any use or application requires prior approval.




                                                                                                 2.8     Evaluated Configuration
                                                                                                 The TOE is defined uniquely by its name and version number Crypto Library V3.1.x on P6022y VB.
                                                                                                 The TOE consists of a hardware part and a software part. This certification covers the configurations
                                                                                                 of the TOE identified as follows:
                                                                                                       •The authenticity of the hardware part of the TOE is checked following the guidance and
                                                                                                        certification report of the hardware.
                                                                                                       •The reference of the software part of the TOE is checked by calculating the SHA-256 hash value
                                                                                                        of the delivered files and comparing them to reference values provided in the user guidance.

                                                                                                 2.9     Results of the Evaluation
                                                                                                                                                                            2
                                                                                                 The evaluation lab documented their evaluation results in the [ETR] which references an ASE
                                                                                                 Intermediate Report and other evaluator documents. To support composite evaluations according to
                                                                                                 [CCDB-2007-09-01] a derived document [ETRfC] was provided and approved. This document
                                                                                                 provides details of the TOE evaluation that have to be considered when this TOE is used as platform
                                                                                                 in a composite evaluation.


                                                                                                 2
                                                                                                  The Evaluation Technical Report contains information proprietary to the developer and/or the
                                                                                                 evaluator, and is not releasable for public review.
                                                                                                 Page: 13/15 of report number: NSCIB-CC-67206-CR4.1, dated 25 August 2020




                                                                                                 The verdict of each claimed assurance requirement is “Pass”.
                                                                                                 Based on the above evaluation results the evaluation lab concluded the Crypto Library V3.1.x on
                                                                                                 P6022y VB, to be CC Part 2 extended, CC Part 3 conformant, and to meet the requirements of EAL
                                                                                                 6 augmented with ASE_TSS.2 and ALC_FLR.1. This implies that the product satisfies the security
                                                                                                 requirements specified in Security Target [ST].
                                                                                                 The Security Target claims ’strict’ conformance to the Protection Profile [BSI-PP-0084].

                                                                                                 2.10 Comments/Recommendations
                                                                                                 The user guidance as outlined in section 2.5 contains necessary information about the usage of the
                                                                                                 TOE. Certain aspects of the TOE’s security functionality, in particular the countermeasures against
                                                                                                 attacks, depend on accurate conformance to the user guidance of both the software and the hardware
                                                                                                 part of the TOE. There are no particular obligations or recommendations for the user apart from
                                                                                                 following the user guidance. Please note that the documents contain relevant details with respect to
                                                                                                 the resistance against certain attacks.
                                                                                                 In addition all aspects of assumptions, threats and policies as outlined in the Security Target not
                                                                                                 covered by the TOE itself need to be fulfilled by the operational environment of the TOE.
                                                                                                 The customer or user of the product shall consider the results of the certification within his system risk
                                                                                                 management process. In order for the evolution of attack methods and techniques to be covered, he
                                                                                                 should define the period of time until a re-assessment for the TOE is required and thus requested from
                                                                                                 the sponsor of the certificate.
                                                                                                 The strength of the implemented cryptographic algorithms and protocols was not rated in the course of
                                                                                                 this evaluation. This specifically applies to the following proprietary or non-standard algorithms,
                                                                                                 protocols and implementations: MIFARE (out of scope).
                                                                                                 To fend off attackers with high attack potential appropriate cryptographic algorithms with adequate key
                                                                                                 lengths must be used (references can be found in national and international documents and
                                                                                                 standards).
                                                                                                 The user of the Crypto Library must implement the advice of the hardware user guidance.
® TÜV, TUEV and TUV are registered trademarks. Any use or application requires prior approval.
                                                                                                 Page: 14/15 of report number: NSCIB-CC-67206-CR4.1, dated 25 August 2020




                                                                                   ecified below:

FCS_COP.1/RSA/<iteration>           Cryptographic operation
Hierarchical to:                    No other components.
Dependencies:                       [FDP_ITC.1 Import of user data of the Composite TOE without security
                                    attributes, or
                                    FDP_ITC.2 Import of user data of the Composite TOE with security
                                    attributes, or
                                    FCS_CKM.1 Cryptographic key management]
                                    FCS_CKM.4 Cryptographic key destruction.
FCS_COP.1.1/RSA/<iteration>         The TSF shall perform [assignment: list of cryptographic operations] in
                                    accordance with a specified cryptographic algorithm [assignment:
                                    cryptographic algorithm]
                                    and cryptographic key sizes of [assignment: cryptographic key sizes]that
                                    meet the following standards: [assignment: list of standards]




Table 18      Cryptographic table for FCS_COP.1/RSA
 <iteration>       [assignment:     [assignment:        [assignment:          [assignment: list of standards]
                   list of          cryptographic       cryptographic key
                   cryptographic    algorithm]          sizes]
                   operations]
 ENC               RSA              RSAEP,              512 – 2112 Bits       [RSA-PKCSB], ch. 5.1.1
                   encryption       IFEP-RSA                                  [IEEE1363], ch. 8.2.2
 DEC               RSA              RSADP,              512 – 2112 Bits       [RSA-PKCSB], ch. 5.1.2
                   decryption       IFDP-RSA                                  [IEEE1363], ch. 8.2.1(I) and 8.2.3
 DEC_CRT           RSA              RSADP (CRT),        512 – 4224 Bits       [RSA-PKCSB], ch. 5.1.2
                   decryption       IFDP-RSA (CRT)                            [IEEE1363], ch. 8.2.1(II) and 8.2.3
 SIG               RSA signature    RSASP1              512 – 2112 Bits       [RSA-PKCSB], ch. 5.2.1
                   generation       IFSP-RSA1                                 [IEEE1363], ch. 8.2.1(I) and 8.2.4
 SIG_CRT           RSA signature    RSASP1 (CRT)        512 – 4224 Bits       [RSA-PKCSB], ch. 5.2.1
                   generation       IFSP-RSA1 (CRT)                           [IEEE1363], ch. 8.2.1(II) and 8.2.4
 VER               RSA              RSAVP1              512 – 4224 Bits       [RSA-PKCSB], ch. 5.2.2
                   signature        IFVP-RSA1                                 [IEEE1363], ch. 8.2.5
                   verification

Note:         RSA CRT is with 2 primes only, i.e. always with u = 2 in [RSA-PKCSB]

FCS_CKM.1/RSA/<iteration>           Cryptographic key generation
Hierarchical to:                    No other components.
Dependencies:                       FCS_CKM.2 Cryptographic key distribution, or

Security Target                                           33                                                       v4.0
                                                                                                             2020-10-15
Security Target Lite

Security Requirements (ASE_REQ)

                                          FCS_COP.1 Cryptographic operation]
                                          FCS_CKM.4 Cryptographic key destruction
FCS_CKM.1.1/RSA/<iteration>               The TSF shall generate cryptographic keys in accordance with a specified
                                          cryptographic key generation algorithm [assignment: list of cryptographic
                                          operations]and specified cryptographic key sizes of [assignment:
                                          cryptographic key sizes that meet the following: [assignment: list of
                                          standards]



Table 19         Cryptographic table for FCS_CKM.1/RSA/
<iteration> Operation                                        Key size (bits)                Standards
CRT               IFX RSA CRT key generation                 512 – 4224 Bits                [RSA-PKCSB], ch. 3.1 and
                                                                                            3.2 (2)
                                                                                            [IEEE1363], ch. 8.1.3.1(2)
n_d               IFX RSA key generation (i.e. without       512 - 2112 Bits                [RSA-PKCSB] , ch. 3.1 and
                  CRT) and return of (n, d)                                                 3.2 (1)
                                                                                            [IEEE1363] , ch. 8.1.3.1(1)
p_q_d             IFX RSA key generation (i.e. without       512 – 2112 Bits                [IEEE1363] , ch. 8.1.3.1(3)
                  CRT) and return of (p , q, d)

Note:            RSA CRT is with 2 primes only, i.e. always with u = 2 in [RSA-PKCSB]

FCS_CKM.4/RSA                      Cryptographic key destruction
Hierarchical to:                   No other components.
Dependencies:                      [FDP_ITC.1 Import of user data without security attributes, or
                                   FDP_ITC.2 Import of user data with security attributes, or
                                   FCS_CKM.1 Cryptographic key generation]
FCS_CKM.4.1/RSA                    The TSF shall destroy cryptographic keys in accordance with a specified
                                   cryptographic key destruction method destruction of RAM key during system or
                                   power on reset1 that meets the following: None2

Note:            The TOE can be delivered with or without the optional RSA library. If the RSA library is not deliverd, the
                 TOE does not provide the SFRs of this chapter. In case of a blocked Crypto@2304T the optionally
                 delivered cryptographic RSA library cannot be used and therefore the SFRs of this chapter are also not
                 applicable.

6.1.3.4                 Elliptic Curve Cryptography (ECC)
For cryptographic ECC functionality, the TOE shall meet the requirement cryptographic operation (FCS_COP.1)
and cryptographic key construction (FCS_CKM .1) as specified below:

FCS_COP.1/ECC/<iteration>                 Cryptographic operation
Hierarchical to:                          No other components.
Dependencies:                             [FDP_ITC.1 Import of user data of the Composite TOE without security
                                          attributes, or

1
    [assignment: cryptographic key destruction method]
2
    [assignment: list of standards]

Security Target                                               34                                                       v4.0
                                                                                                                 2020-10-15
Security Target Lite

Security Requirements (ASE_REQ)

                                     FDP_ITC.2 Import of user data of the Composite TOE with security
                                     attributes, or
                                     FCS_CKM.1 Cryptographic key management]
                                     FCS_CKM.4 Cryptographic key destruction.
FCS_COP.1.1/ECC/<iteration>          The TSF shall perform [assignment: list of cryptographic operations] in
                                     accordance with a specified cryptographic algorithm [assignment:
                                     cryptographic algorithm]
                                     and cryptographic key sizes of [assignment: cryptographic key sizes]that
                                     meet the following standards: [assignment: list of standards]

Table 20      Cryptographic table for FCS_COP.1/ECC
 <iteration>      [assignment: list of     [assignment: [assignment:             [assignment: list of standards]
                  cryptographic            cryptographic cryptographic
                  operations]              algorithm]    key sizes]

 SIG              EC signature             ECDSA             160 – 521 Bits      [ANSX9.62], ch. 7.3
                  generation               ECSP-DSA                              [IEEE1363], ch. 7.2.7
 VER              EC signature             ECDSA             160 – 521 Bits      [ANSX9.62], ch. 7.4.1
                  verification             ECVP-DSA                              [IEEE1363], ch. 7.2.8
 DH               ECDH key agreement ECDH                    160 – 521 Bits      [ANSX9.63], ch. 5.4.1
                                     ECSVHDP-DH                                  [ISO11770_3], appendix D.6
                                                                                 [IEEE1363], ch. 7.2.1
 ADD              EC point addition        C = A+B           160 – 521 Bits      n.a.

Note:         The following ECC curves are in scope of this evaluation:
              - all Brainpool curves from [IETF5639]
              - all NIST curves from [N186-4]

Note:         For the /SIG iteration, the following deviations from the standards apply:
              In [ANSX9.62]:
              Step d) is not supported

Note:         For the /VER iteration, the following deviations from the standards apply:
              In [ANSX9.62]:
              Step b) is not supported.
              Beside noted calculation, our algorithm adds a random multiple of order of the basepoint to the
              calculated values u1 and u2.

Note:         For the/ DH iteration, the implementation always returns the y-coordinate in addition to the x-
              coordinate.

Note:         For the /ADD iteration, the elliptic curve points A, B and C are considered as secrets.

Note:         Cofactor multiplication is not supported

FCS_CKM.1/ECC                 Cryptographic key generation
Hierarchical to               No other components.
Dependencies                  FCS_CKM.2 Cryptographic key distribution, or
                              FCS_COP.1 Cryptographic operation]

Security Target                                            35                                                    v4.0
                                                                                                           2020-10-15
Security Target Lite

Security Requirements (ASE_REQ)

                                FCS_CKM.4 Cryptographic key destruction
FCS_CKM.1.1/ECC                 The TSF shall generate cryptographic keys in accordance with a specified
                                cryptographic key generation algorithm EC key generation1 and specified
                                cryptographic key sizes of 160-521 bits2 that meet the following: [ANSX9.62], ch.
                                A4.3 and [IEEE1363], ch. A.16.9.3

Note:         The following ECC curves are in scope of this evaluation:
              - all Brainpool curves from [IETF5639]
              - all NIST curves from [N186-4]

FCS_CKM.4/ECC                   Cryptographic key destruction
Hierarchical to:                No other components.
Dependencies:                   [FDP_ITC.1 Import of user data without security attributes, or
                                FDP_ITC.2 Import of user data with security attributes, or
                                FCS_CKM.1 Cryptographic key generation]
FCS_CKM.4.1/ECC                 The TSF shall destroy cryptographic keys in accordance with a specified
                                cryptographic key destruction method destruction of RAM key during system or
                                power on reset4 that meets the following: None5


Note:         The TOE can be delivered with or without the optional ECC library. If the ECC library is not deliverd, the
              TOE does not provide the SFRs of this chapter. In case of a blocked Crypto@2304T the optionally
              delivered cryptographic ECClibrary cannot be used and therefore this SFR is also not applicable. .




6.1.4                Subset of TOE testing
The security is strongly dependent on the correct operation of the security functions. Therefore, the TOE shall
support that particular security functions or mechanisms are tested in the operational phase (Phase 7). The
tests can be initiated by the Smartcard Embedded Software and/or by the TOE.
The TOE shall meet the requirement “Subset TOE testing (FPT_TST.2)” as specified below (Common Criteria
Part 2 extended).

FPT_TST.2                       Subset TOE testing
Hierarchical to:                No other components.
Dependencies:                   No dependencies
FPT_TST.2.1                     The TSF shall run a suite of self tests at the conditions request of the Security IC
                                Embedded Software1 to demonstrate the correct operation of the alarm lines
                                and/or the environmental sensor mechanisms:


1
  [assignment: list of cryptographic operations]
2
  [assignment: cryptographic key sizes
3
  [assignment: list of standards]
4
  [assignment: cryptographic key destruction method]
5
  [assignment: list of standards]

Security Target                                             36                                                       v4.0
                                                                                                               2020-10-15
Security Target Lite

Security Requirements (ASE_REQ)

                                       Please refer to the confidential Security Target2


6.1.5                  Memory access control
Usage of multiple applications in one Smartcard often requires code and data separation in order to prevent
that one application can access code and/or data of another application. For this reason the TOE provides Area
based Memory Access Control. The underlying Memory Protection Unit (MPU) is documented in Appendix B3.5
of the ARMv7 M architecture reference manual [ARMv7M].
In particular, the MPU provides full support for:
 Protection regions.
 Overlapping protection regions, with ascending region priority:
  − Region 7 = highest priority.
  − Region 0 = lowest priority.
 Access permissions.
   MPU mismatches and permission violations invoke the programmable-priority MemManage fault handler.

The MPU can be used to:
   Enforce privilege rules, preventing user applications from corrupting operating system data.
   Separate processes, blocking the active task from accessing other tasks’ data.
   Enforce access rules, allowing memory regions to be defined as read-only or detecting unexpected memory
    accesses.

The SFRs are provided by the Memory Access Control Policy (FDP_ACC.1 and dependencies).


6.1.5.1                Subjects, objects and operations of the Memory Access Control Policy
Subjects:
 MPU

Objects:
 memory/code addresses

Operations:
 Read a/o write a/o execute access


6.1.5.2                Security attributes of the Memory Access Control Policy
Security Attribute which define the roles for Subject MPU:
 Npriv flag defining privilege/non-privilege mode


Security Attribute which control the behavior of the Subject MPU:



1
  [selection: during initial start-up, periodically during normal operation, at the request of the authorized user, and/or at the conditions
     [assignment: conditions under which self test should occur]]
2
  [assignment: functions and/or mechanisms]

Security Target                                                      37                                                                 v4.0
                                                                                                                                  2020-10-15
Security Target Lite

Security Requirements (ASE_REQ)

 MPU enable/disable bit.
 8 regions with the following attributes
    − a unique priority
    − the enable bit
    − the xn (execute never) bit
    − the start address and size
    − an access matrix which defines if an Operation of the MPU (Subject) to a memory/code address (Object)
     lying in the region is allowed or denied
 A bit defining the acces behavior of the default region, i.e. memory/code addresses not covered by one of the
  8 MPU regions.


Security Attributes for objects:
There are no security attributes for objects.


6.1.5.3            Access control rules of the Memory Access Control Policy
The following generic rules shall apply in case the MPU is enabled. In case the MPU is disabled, a privileged and
unprivileged code has full read/write/execute rights to all addresses.
 If an address is contained in multiple enabled regions, then the region with the highest priority defines the
    access rights.
   If an address is contained in no region then the default region defines the access rights.
   The region defining the access rights checks if the Subject has access to the Object with respect to the desired
    Operation. In case the access is denied the MPU throws an access violation exception. The checks are done
    according to the access matrix inTable 21.
   overlapping regions, have access to other regions with ascending region priority:
    region 7 = highest priority, region 0 = lowest priority
   execution of code is bound to the read access of Table 21 and the xn bit. If the xn bit is cleared and read
    access is enabled then execution of code is defined by Table 21. If the xn bit is set then execution is never
    allowed.

Table 21      Access matrix for read(execute)/write access
 Privileged Mode Permissions            User Mode                             Description
                                        Permissions
 No access                              No access                             All accesses in user mode and
                                                                              privileged mode generate a
                                                                              permission fault
 Read/write                             No access                             Privilege mode has full access
                                                                              while any access from user mode
                                                                              leads to a permission fault.
 Read/write                             Read(execute) only                    Privileged mode has full access
                                                                              while the user mode has no write
                                                                              access rights. Execute access in
                                                                              User mode further depends on the
                                                                              xn bit.
 Read/write                             Read(execute)/write                   Privileged mode has read and
                                                                              execute access rights. Write

Security Target                                         38                                                     v4.0
                                                                                                         2020-10-15
Security Target Lite

Security Requirements (ASE_REQ)

    Privileged Mode Permissions                 User Mode                                      Description
                                                Permissions
                                                                                               accesses from privileged mode
                                                                                               lead to a permission fault.
                                                                                               Any access of the user mode leads
                                                                                               to a permission fault.
    Read only                                   No access                                      Privileged mode has read and
                                                                                               execute access rights. Write
                                                                                               accesses lead to a permission
                                                                                               fault.
                                                                                               The same holds for the user mode,
                                                                                               except execute access further
                                                                                               depends on the xn bit.
    Read only                                   Read(execute) only                             All accesses in user mode and
                                                                                               privileged mode generate a
                                                                                               permission fault


6.1.5.4                SFRs of the Memory Access Control Policy
FDP_ACC.1                    Subset access control
Hierarchical to:             No other components.
Dependencies:                FDP_ACF.1 Security attribute based access control
FDP_ACC.1.1                  The TSF shall enforce the Memory Access Control Policy as1 defined in section 6.1.5.12.


FDP_ACF.1                    Security attribute based access control
Hierarchical to:             No other components.
Dependencies:                FDP_ACC.1 Subset access control
                             FMT_MSA.3 Static attribute initialization
FDP_ACF.1.1                  The TSF shall enforce the Memory Access Control Policy3 to objects based on the
                             following: Attributes as specified in section 6.1.5.24 .
FDP_ACF.1.2                  The TSF shall enforce the following rules to determine if an operation among
                             controlled subjects and controlled objects is allowed: As specified in the section
                             6.1.5.35.
FDP_ACF.1.3                  The TSF shall explicitly authorize access of subjects to objects based on the following
                             additional rules: none6.
FDP_ACF.1.4                  The TSF shall explicitly deny access of subjects to objects based on the following
                             additional rules: none1.


1
  editorially refined
2
  [assignment: list of subjects, objects, and operations among subjects and objects covered by the SFP]
3
  [assignment: access control SFP]
4
  [assignment: list of subjects and objects controlled under the indicated SFP, and for each, the SFP-relevant security attributes, or
     named groups of SFP-relevant security attributes]
5
  [assignment: rules governing access among controlled subjects and controlled objects using controlled operations on controlled
     objects]
6
  [assignment: rules, based on security attributes, that explicitly authorise access of subjects to objects]

Security Target                                                      39                                                                v4.0
                                                                                                                                 2020-10-15
Security Target Lite

Security Requirements (ASE_REQ)


FMT_MSA.3                    Static attribute initialization
Hierarchical to:             No other components.
Dependencies:                FMT_MSA.1 Management of security attributes
                             FMT_SMR.1 security roles
FMT_MSA.3.1                  The TSF shall enforce the Memory Access Control Policy2 to provide restrictive3 default
                             values for security attributes that are used to enforce the SFP.
FMT_MSA.3.2                  The TSF shall allow the privilege mode4 to specify alternative initial values to override
                             the default values when an object or information is created.


FMT_MSA.1                    Management of security attributes
Hierarchical to:             No other components.
Dependencies:                [FDP_ACC.1 Subset access control or FDP_IFC.1 Subset information flow control]
                             FMT_SMF.1 Specification of management functions
                             FMT_SMR.1 Security roles
FMT_MSA.1.1                  The TSF shall enforce the Memory Access Control Policy5 to restrict the ability to
                             modify6 the security attributes Security Attribute which control the behavior of the
                             Subject MPU7 to the privilege mode8.


FMT_SMF.1                    Specification of management functions
Hierarchical to:             No other components
Dependencies:                No dependencies
FMT_SMF.1.1                  The TSF shall be capable of performing the following security management functions:
                             modifying the security attributes9.


FMT_SMR.1                    Security roles
Hierarchical to:             No other components.
Dependencies:                FIA_UID.1 Timing of identification
FMT_SMR.1.1                  The TSF shall maintain the roles privilege mode and non-privilege mode10.
FMT_SMR.1.2                  The TSF shall be able to associate users with roles.

6.1.6                  Data Integrity
FDP_SDI.2                    Stored data integrity monitoring and action


1
  [assignment: rules, based on security attributes, that explicitly deny access of subjects to objects]
2
  [assignment: access control SFP, information flow control SFP]
3
  [selection, choose one of: restrictive, permissive, [assignment: other property]]
4
  [assignment: the authorised identified roles]
5
  [assignment: access control SFP(s), information flow control SFP(s)]
6
  [selection: change_default, query, modify, delete, [assignment: other operations]]
7
  [assignment: list of security attributes]
8
  [assignment: the authorised identified roles]
9
  [assignment: list of management functions to be provided by the TSF]
10
   [assignment: the authorised identified roles]

Security Target                                                       40                                             v4.0
                                                                                                               2020-10-15
Security Target Lite

Security Requirements (ASE_REQ)

Hierarchical to:             FDP_SDI.1 stored data integrity monitoring
Dependencies:                No dependencies
FDP_SDI.2.1                  The TSF shall monitor user data stored in containers controlled by the TSF for data
                             integrity and one- and/or more-bit-errors1 on all objects, based on the following
                             attributes: error correction ECC for the SOLID FLASHҹ NVM2.
FDP_SDI.2.2                  Upon detection of a data integrity error, the TSF shall correct 1 bit errors in the SOLID
                             FLASHҹ NVM automatically and inform the user about other bit errors3.



FDP_SDC.1                    Stored data confidentiality
Hierarchical to:             No other components
Dependencies:                No dependencies
FDP_SDC.1.1                  The TSF shall ensure the confidentiality of the information of the user data while it is
                             stored in the RAM and SOLID FLASHҹ NVM4.




6.1.7                  Support of Flash Loader
The TOE provides a Flash Loader to download user data into the SOLID FLASHҹ NVM, either during production
of the TOE or at customer site. Depending on the configuration option EA the Flash Loader claims different sets
of SFRs. [PP0084] section 7.3.1 “Package 1: Loader dedicated for usage in secured environment only” is claimed
for both options. [PP0084] section 7.2 Package “Authentication of the Security IC” and [PP0084] section 7.3.2
“Package 2: Loader dedicated for usage by authorized users only” is only claimed in case TOE is ordered with
EA unavailable, however a subset of SFRs from loader package 2 is also claimed, if TOE is ordered with EA
available.




6.1.8                  Flash Loader Policy
The table as follows shows the Flash Loader SFR claims in dependency of the order option EA.

Table 22       Flash loader SFR claims
EA unavailable                                                  EA available
Limited capabilities (FMT_LIM.1/Loader)                         Limited capabilities (FMT_LIM.1/Loader)
Limited availability – Loader (FMT_LIM.2/Loader)                Limited availability – Loader (FMT_LIM.2/Loader)
Authentication Proof of Identity (FIA_API.1)                    -
Inter-TSF trusted channel (FTP_ITC.1)                           -
Basic data exchange confidentiality (FDP_UCT.1)                 Basic data exchange confidentiality (FDP_UCT.1)
Data exchange integrity (FDP_UIT.1)                             Data exchange integrity (FDP_UIT.1)

1
  [assignment: integrity errors]
2
  [assignment: user data attributes]
3
  [assignment: action to be taken]
4
  [assignment: memory area]

Security Target                                               41                                                      v4.0
                                                                                                                2020-10-15
Security Target Lite

Security Requirements (ASE_REQ)

EA unavailable                                                EA available
Subset access control – Loader (FDP_ACC.1/Loader)             Subset access control – Loader (FDP_ACC.1/Loader)
Security attribute based access control – Loader              Security attribute based access control – Loader
(FDP_ACF.1/Loader)                                            (FDP_ACF.1/Loader)
Management of TSF data – Loader                               Management of TSF data – Loader
(FMT_MTD.1/Loader)                                            (FMT_MTD.1/Loader)
Security Roles – Loader (FMT_SMR.1/Loader)                    Security Roles – Loader (FMT_SMR.1/Loader)
Specification of Management Functions – Loader                Specification of Management Functions – Loader
(FMT_SMF.1/Loader)                                            (FMT_SMF.1/Loader)
User Identification before any action – Loader                User Identification before any action – Loader
(FIA_UID.2/Loader)                                            (FIA_UID.2/Loader)



The TOE shall meet the loader SFRs as specified below:

FMT_LIM.1/Loader            Limited Capabilities
    Hierarchical to:         No other components.
    Dependencies:            No other components
    FMT_LIM.1.1/Loader       The TSF shall be designed and implemented in a manner that limits its capabilities so
                             that in conjunction with “Limited availability (FMT_LIM.2)” the following policy is
                             enforced: Deploying Loader functionality after permanent deactivation does not
                             allow stored user data to be disclosed or manipulated by unauthorized user1.



FMT_LIM.2/Loader            Limited availability - Loader
    Hierarchical to:         No other components.
Dependencies:               FMT_LIM.1 Limited capabilities.
    FMT_LIM.2.1/Loader       The TSF shall be designed in a manner that limits its availability so that in conjunction
                             with “Limited capabilities (FMT_LIM.1)” the following policy is enforced: The TSF
                             prevents deploying the Loader functionality after permanent deactivation2.

Regarding FMT_LIM.1.1/Loader the User Guidance requires the Flash Loader to be permanently deactivated
prior delivery to the end user (Phase 7).
 FTP_ITC.1               Inter-TSF trusted channel
    Hierarchical to:         No other components.
    Dependencies:            No dependencies.
    FTP_ITC.1.1              The TSF shall provide a communication channel between itself and administrator
                             user, or Download operator user3, that is logically distinct from other communication
                             channels and provides assured identification of its end points and protection of the
                             channel data from modification or disclosure.




1
  [assignment: Limited capability policy]
2
  [assignment: Limited availability policy]
3
  [assignment: users authorized for using the Loader]

Security Target                                             42                                                       v4.0
                                                                                                               2020-10-15
Security Target Lite

Security Requirements (ASE_REQ)

    FTP_ITC.1.2              The TSF shall permit another trusted IT product1 to initiate communication via the
                             trusted channel.
    FTP_ITC.1.3              The TSF shall initiate communication via the trusted channel for deploying Loader for
                             downloading user data2.

    FDP_UCT.1                Basic data exchange confidentiality
    Hierarchical to:         No other components.
    Dependencies:            [FTP_ITC.1 Inter-TSF trusted channel, or FTP_TRP.1 Trusted path]
                             [FDP_ACC.1 Subset access control, or FDP_IFC.1 Subset information flow control]
    FDP_UCT.1.1              The TSF shall enforce the Loader SFP3 to receive4 user data in a manner protected
                             from unauthorised disclosure.

    FDP_UIT.1                Data exchange integrity
    Hierarchical to:         No other components.
    Dependencies:            [FTP_ITC.1 Inter-TSF trusted channel, or FTP_TRP.1 Trusted path]
                             [FDP_ACC.1 Subset access control, or FDP_IFC.1 Subset information flow control]
    FDP_UCT.1.1              The TSF shall enforce the Loader SFP5 to receive6 user data in a manner protected
                             from modification, deletion, insertion7 errors.
FDP_UIT.1.2                 The TSF shall be able to determine on receipt of user data, whether modification,
                            deletion, insertion8 has occurred.



FDP_ACC.1/Loader            Subset access control - Loader
    Hierarchical to:         No other components.
    Dependencies:            FDP_ACF.1 Security attribute based access control.
    FDP_ACC.1.1/Loader       The TSF shall enforce the Loader SFP9 on
                              the subjects Administrator User, Download Operator User and Image Provider,
                              the objects user data in SOLID FLASHҹ NVM memory of the TOE,
                              the operation deployment of Loader10




    FDP_ACF.1/Loader         Security attribute based access control - Loader
    Hierarchical to:         No other components.


1
  [selection: the TSF, another trusted IT product]
2
  [assignment: list of functions for which a trusted channel is required][assignment: rules]
3
  [assignment: access control SFP(s) and/or information flow control SFP(s)]
4
  [selection: transmit, receive]
5
  [assignment: access control SFP(s) and/or information flow control SFP(s)]
6
  [selection: transmit, receive]
7
  [selection: modification, deletion, insertion, replay]
8
  [selection: modification, deletion, insertion, replay]
9
  [assignment: access control SFP]
10
   [assignment: list of subjects, objects, and operations among subjects and objects covered by the SFP]

Security Target                                                    43                                            v4.0
                                                                                                           2020-10-15
Security Target Lite

Security Requirements (ASE_REQ)

    Dependencies:             FMT_MSA.3 Static attribute initialisation
    FDP_ACF.1.1/Loader        FDP_ACF.1.1 The TSF shall enforce the Loader SFP1 to objects based on the following:
                              the subjects and objects of FDP_ACC.1.1/Loader without security attributes2
    FDP_ACF.1.2/Loader        FDP_ACF.1.2 The TSF shall enforce the following rules to determine if an operation
                              among controlled subjects and controlled objects is allowed:
                              The authenticated Administrator User or authenticated Download Operator User can
                              modify the user data by new user data when the new user data is authorized by the
                              Image Provider3
    FDP_ACF.1.3/Loader        FDP_ACF.1.3 The TSF shall explicitly authorise access of subjects to objects based on
                              the following additional rules: none4.
    FDP_ACF.1.4/Loader        The TSF shall explicitly deny access of subjects to objects based on the following
                              additional rules: none5.

Note:          The security functional requirements FIA_API.1, FTP_ITC.1, FDP_UCT.1, FDP_UIT.1, FDP_ACC.1/Loader
               and FDP_ACF.1/Loader apply only to TOE products with activated Flash Loader. In other cases the
               Flash Loader is not available anymore and the user data download is completed.

The following SFRs have been added to the SFRs from Flash Loader package 2 of [PP0084] in order to describe
the management of the various Flash Loader authentication keys.



FMT_MTD.1/Loader               Management of TSF data
    Hierarchical to:           No other components.
    Dependencies:              FMT_SMR.1 Security roles
                               FMT_SMF.1 Specification of Management Functions
    FMT_MTD.1.1/Loader         The TSF shall restrict the ability to change_default, modify, delete6 the Authentication
                               keys for Administrator User, Download Operator User and Image Provider7 to
                               Administrator User, Download Operator User8.

Note:          The Administrator User can manage the keys for Administration User, Download Operator User and
               Image Provider. The Download Operator User can delete the key for Image Provider and Download
               Operator, otherwise manage the keys for the Download Operator User only. The image provider cannot
               modify any keys or perform authentication with the Flash Loader. It can simply built authentic
               loadable images.

FMT_SMR.1/Loader               Security roles
    Hierarchical to:           No other components.


1
  [assignment: access control SFP]
2
  [assignment: list of subjects and objects controlled under the indicated SFP, and for each, the SFP-relevant security attributes, or
     named groups of SFP-relevant security attributes]
3
  [assignment: rules governing access among controlled subjects and controlled objects using controlled operations on controlled
     objects]
4
  [assignment: rules, based on security attributes, that explicitly authorise access of subjects to objects]
5
  [assignment: rules, based on security attributes, that explicitly deny access of subjects to objects]
6
  [selection: change_default, query, modify, delete, clear, [assignment: other operations]]
7
  [assignment: list of TSF data]
8
  [assignment: the authorised identified roles]

Security Target                                                      44                                                                v4.0
                                                                                                                                 2020-10-15
Security Target Lite

Security Requirements (ASE_REQ)

    Dependencies:            FIA_UID.1 Timing of identification
    FMT_SMR.1.1/Loader       The TSF shall maintain the roles Administrator User, Download Operator User, Image
                             provider1.
    FMT_SMR.1.2/Loader       The TSF shall be able to associate users with roles.



FMT_SMF.1/Loader             Specification of Management Functions
    Hierarchical to:         No other components.
    Dependencies:            FIA_UID.1 Timing of identification
    FMT_SMF.1.1/Loader       The TSF shall be capable of performing the following management functions: Change
                             Key, Invalidate Key2.

Note:          “Change Key” of this SFR combines the “Change default” and “modify” operations from SFR
               FMT_MTD.1/Loader. “Invalidate Key” of this SFR is equivalent to the “delete” operation from SFR
               FMT_MTD.1/Loader.

    FIA_UID.2/Loader         User Identification before any action
    Hierarchical to:         FIA_UID.1
    Dependencies:            No dependencies.
    FIA_UID.2.1/Loader       The TSF shall require each user to be successfully identified before allowing any other
                             TSF-mediated actions on behalf of that user.


6.1.9                  Support of Authentication of the Security IC
The Flash Loader provides a security IC authentication service.



FIA_API.1                   Authentication Proof of Identity
Hierarchical to:            No other components.
Dependencies:               No dependencies.
FIA_API.1.1                 The reased by
means of configuration options.
The key lengths used for the AES and DES functionality follow the national AIS32 regulation regarding the 100
bit security level issued by the BSI1. This regulation excludes the single DES operation from the certification as it
is considered to be not sufficiently secure from algorithm perspective.
For both versions, the certification covers the SCL cryptographic functionality of the AES algorithm with key
lengths of 128, 192, 256 bits and the TDEA or TripleDES (TDES) algorithm with an effective key size of 112 and
168 Bits. For the version v2.04.002 the certification covers the CMAC functionality too.

Beside the inclusion and support of cryptographic libraries this TOE comes with the optional Hardware Support
Library (HSL) in different alternative versions significantly simplifying the management of the SOLID FLASH™
NVM functionality. The HSL (all versions) constitutes an application interface (API) accessing the HSL state
machine and abstracting low level properties like special function registers and settings of specific hardware

           1 German: Bundesamt für Sicherheit in der Informationstechnik, English: Federal Office for Information Security


CC Document                                                      29                                                                 1.8
                                                                                                                             2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Target of Evaluation Description


features. In short the HSL provides a user friendly also use case oriented interface considering endurance,
reliability and performance.
All HSL library versions are delivered as object code.
The HSL is delivered as object code and in this way integrated in the user software.
All HSL versions implement, beyond the low level driver, the basic method In-place Update leveraging the
dedicated advantages of the new SOLID FLASH™ NVM technology.
In addition to the above, all HSL versions provide an advanced additional method called Incremental Write (IWR).
This method provides enhanced endurance of the SOLID FLASH NVM even beyond the erase endurance limits
for often written objects. Thus this method serves applications with a demand for high endurance and fast
writing times. On the other hand, the read times using this method are slower than the other methods provided.
The HSL versions provide tearing save behavior, whereas we define tearing as an untimed power cut off which
could occur anytime and in the worse therewith could also occur during writing to or erasing of pages in the
SOLID FLASH™ NVM.
If the HSL – all versions are meant - comes with the TOE and the user implements the offered configuration and
dedicated functions tearing save behaviour of the SOLID FLASH™ NVM is provided. In these cases the user does
not need to care about tearing events since either the old data or the new data are correctly in place.
In addition to the versions 01.22.4346 and 02.01.6634, the HSLs in versions 03.11.8339 and 03.12.8812 provide a
furthermore improved method for the Incremental Write (IWR).
But, even in the cases where the user decides not to use the HSL and did also not implement own routines
preserving the consistency of the SOLID FLASH™ NVM, the hardware protection means prevent from operation
of inconsistent data. Therefore, in no cases a tearing event leads to an exploitable situation respectively
vulnerability.
Anyhow, the user should be aware and is recommended to use either the HSL or implement own routines
managing tearing events since if there would occur a faulty programmed SOLID FLASH™ NVM location the TOE
ends operation at that point.

The order option CIPURSE™ Cryptographic Library (CIPURSE™ CL) provides cryptographic functionality to
implement a CIPURSE™ V2 conformant protocol.
This protocol provides a secure mutual authentication of two entities, namely the terminal (denoted as PCD =
Proximity Coupling Device (CIPURSE™-compliant terminal)) and a smart card or a token in other form factors
which is called PICC. PICC stands for Proximity Integrated Circuit Card (CIPURSE™-compliant card).
Beside the mutual authentication, the protocol implements measures to maintain the integrity of the after
passing successfully the authentication transferred data. It depends on the chosen operation mode whether the
user requires integrity protection only, for example if the exchange is used in a secure environment only, or
whether complete protection including the encrypted transfer of user data between the two authentication
entities is an issue. Both operation modes are part of the CIPURSE™ open standard and offered as integrity
protection mode and as confidential communication mode.
By that the CIPURSE™ CL supports the user to implement systems conformant to the CIPURSE™ open standard
implementing a secured, interoperable and flexible transit fare collection solution, including ISO 7816, ISO/IEC
14443-4 communication and AES-128 bit cryptography for multiple payment types.
The CIPURSE™ CL is conformant to the CIPURSE™ open standard [18] for both, the PICC and then PCD software
parts. It implements the by the OSPT alliance standardized application interface for the card and the terminal
side.
The scope of this certification of this TOE covers all parts of the CIPURSE™ CL which are later implemented by
the user on the user card respectively token based on this TOE and the functionality of the PCD software part
which is implemented in the terminal side. The PCD software operates also on the hardware of this TOE which is
implemented in the terminal.
The CIPURSE™ CL implements the by the OSPT alliance standardized application interface for the card and the
terminal side.
The certification comprises the entire functionality of the optional CIPURSE™ CL implemented and operated on
the TOE hardware. On one hand the TOE can operate the PICC side software part as a token and on the other
hand, a second TOE product operates the PCD side software part if used inside a terminal or similar system.
CC Document                                            30                                                    1.8
                                                                                                      2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Target of Evaluation Description


The environment on the terminal, the terminal systems, their security and their interfaces to the background
systems are not in the scope of this certification. The user operating system and further applications
implemented on the TOE are also out of scope of this certification.
To summarize, if used with the PCD software the certification view equals to the case where the TOE is running
the PICC software: The TOE operates one of the optional software parts of the CIPURSE™ CL – regardless
whether PICC or PCD part - and is enabled to communicate via the selected interfaces. The surrounding
environment is in both cases out of scope. The CIPURSE™ CL is delivered as object code and in this way
integrated in the user software.

The NRG software is a further order option, which implements the routines for a NRG interface. The NRG
implements an operating system handling the emulation of an NRG card together with the RF interface. One
part of the NRG software is permanently stored in the ROM and the second part consisting of patch and API is
located in the SOLID FLASH™ NVM. The second part is only present if the NRG is a part of the delivery. If the
NRG is not part of the delivery the ROM part is present but not used. The NRG implements tearing safe
behaviour in context with the SOLID FLASH™ NVM management and is therefore independent from the HSL.
The NRG NVM part is – if ordered – delivered as object code and in this way integrated in the user software.
The NRG is not part of the TOE Security Functionality (TSF).

Note 1:
The asymmetric cryptographic libraries regardless of the version chosen are delivery options.
Therefore the TOE may come with free combinations with the other libraries of or without these libraries. In the
case of coming without one or any combination of the asymmetric libraries the TOE does not provide the
Additional Specific Security Functionality Rivest-Shamir-Adleman Cryptography (RSA) and/or Elliptic Curve
Cryptography (EC).

The symmetric cryptographic library SCL, in two alternative versions, is a delivery option.
Therefore the TOE may come with free combinations with the other libraries of or without these libraries. In the
case of coming without the SCL the TOE does not provide the specific security functionality implemented by this
software. Even in case of a TOE coming without SCL, the symmetric cryptographic functionality is unchanged
covered by the hardware symmetric cryptographic coprocessor SCP.

The presence of the cryptographic library CIPURSE™ CL is a delivery option.
Therefore the TOE may come with free combinations with the other libraries of or without these libraries. In the
case of coming without the CIPURSE™ CL, the TOE does not provide the specific security functionality
implemented by this software.
End of note.




CC Document                                            31                                                     1.8
                                                                                                       2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Target of Evaluation Description


The firmware and software parts of the TOE comprise:

Firmware
     in several alternative versions,
      whereas the latter version provides additional functionality regarding the TOE identification as order
      option
     Boot Software (BOS)
     Resource Management System (RMS)
     Flash Loader (FL)
     RFAPI functions
      The RFAPI is not part of the TOE Security Functionality (TSF).
     NRG basic functions in ROM.
      The NRG is not part of the TOE Security Functionality (TSF).

Optional Software
    RSA cryptographic library in three alternative versions
    EC cryptographic library in three alternative versions
    Toolbox library in three alternative versions.
      None of the Toolbox libraries is part of the TOE Security Functionality (TSF).
    SCL library in two alternative versions
    HSL library in four alternative versions
    CIPURSE™ Cryptographic Library
    NRG library.
      The NRG is not part of the TOE Security Functionality (TSF).


2.2.3          Interfaces of the TOE
       The physical interface of the TOE to the external environment is the entire surface of the IC.
       The electrical interface of the TOE to the external environment is constituted by the pads of the chip,
        particularly ISO pads, the CLK and power supply pads, as well as the pads used for contactless and
        contact based interfacing.
        A further electrical interface are the La and Lb pads used for the antenna connection and alternatively for
        the ACLB communication mode connecting an external reader chip which is not part of the TOE.
       The RF interface (radio frequency power and signal interface) enables contactless communication
        between a PICC (proximity integration chip card, PICC) and a PCD reader/writer (proximity coupling
        device, PCD). Power supply is received and data are received or transmitted by an antenna which
        consists of a coil with a few turns directly connected to the IC. Depending on customer orders the
        contactless interface options are set by means of blocking either at Infineon premises or at the premises
        of the user.
       The data-oriented I/O interface to the TOE is formed by the pads used for contact based or contactless
        communication.
       The interface to the firmware – regardless of the version chosen – is constituted by special registers used
        for hardware configuration and control (Special Function Registers, SFR).
       The interface of the TOE to the operating system is constituted by the RMS and by the instruction set of
        the TOE.
       The interface of the TOE to the test routines is formed by the BOS test routine call, i.e. entry to the test
        modes.

CC Document                                             32                                                       1.8
                                                                                                          2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Target of Evaluation Description


       The interface to the RSA calculations is defined from the RSA library interface. This is regardless of the
        version chosen.
       The interface to the EC calculations is defined from the EC library interface. This is regardless of the
        version chosen.
       The interface to the Toolbox is defined by the Toolbox library interface. This is regardless of the version
        chosen.
       The interface to the SCL is defined by the Symmetric Cryptographic Library interface. This is regardless
        of the version chosen.
       The interface to the HSL is defined by the functions of the Hardware Support Library interface. This is
        regardless of the version chosen.
       The interface to the CIPURSE™ CL is defined by the functions of the CIPURSE™ cryptographic library
        (each version). This is regardless of the version chosen.
       The NRG interface is defined by the functions of the NRG Software.

Note that the interfaces to the optional software parts are only present, if the TOE comes with the belonging
software part depending on the customer order.


2.2.4          Guidance documentation
The following provides a brief overview of the document set constituting the user guidance for this TOE. The
exact document titles and versions are given in chapter 9.
    The document Hardware Reference Manual HRM [1] is the user data book of the TOE and contains the
        relevant module, function and feature description
    The document Production and Personalization User Manual [2] contains detailed information about the
        usage of the Flash Loader
    The document Programmers Reference Manual [3] describes the usage and interfaces of the Resource
        Management System RMS, of the NRG Software and of the RFAPI.
    The document [6] Security Guidelines User Manual provides the guidance and recommendations to
        develop secure software for and secure usage of this TOE.
    The document [7] Errata Sheet contains latest updates and corrections of the TOE relevant for the user
        and it is a kind addendum to the hardware reference manual HRM [1]. The Errata Sheet can be changed
        during the life cycle of the TOE. New Errata Sheet releases are reported in a monthly updated list
        provided from Infineon Technologies AG to the user. This list is not part of the certification process. Part
        of the TOE certification is the released version valid at the point in time the certificate was issued.
    The document asymmetric Cryptographic Library ACL [4-1] for Crypto@2304T user interface for the
        version v2.08.007 contains all interfaces of the RSA, EC and Toolbox library and are only delivered to the
        user in case the RSA library and/or the EC library is/are part of the delivered TOE.
    The document asymmetric Cryptographic Library ACL [4-2] for Crypto@2304T user interface for the
        version v2.07.003 contains all interfaces of the RSA, EC and Toolbox library and are only delivered to the
        user in case the RSA library and/or the EC library is/are part of the delivered TOE.
    The document asymmetric Cryptographic Library ACL [4-3] for Crypto@2304T user interface for the
        version v2.06.003 contains all interfaces of the RSA, EC and Toolbox library and are only delivered to the
        user in case the RSA library and/or the EC library is/are part of the delivered TOE.
    The document [5] Crypto@2304T User Manual describes the architecture of cryptographic coprocessor
        on register level. It also provides a functional description of the register architecture, instruction set and
        gives programming guidance. This document is not required if one of Infineon’s asymmetric
        cryptographic libraries ACL is used. The ACL takes properly care about the low level hardware interfaces.


CC Document                                               33                                                       1.8
                                                                                                            2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Target of Evaluation Description


      The user guidance for the optional Symmetric Cryptographic Library SCL [16-1] in version v2.04.002
       contains all user interfaces required to have a simplified and secure use of the symmetric cryptographic
       coprocessor. This user guidance is only delivered if the optional SCL is part of the delivery to the user.
      The user guidance for the optional Symmetric Cryptographic Library SCL [16-2] in version v2.02.010
       contains all user interfaces required to have a simplified and secure use of the symmetric cryptographic
       coprocessor. This user guidance is only delivered if the optional SCL is part of the delivery to the user.
      The user guidance for the CIPURSE™ Cryptographic Library [17-1] provides detailed information and the
       complete application interface for the user for implementation of an OSPT™ compliant PCD / PICC
       communication solution.
      The document reference [15-1] for the Hardware Support Library (HSL) in version 03.12.8812 provides an
       application interface (API) accessing the HSM state machine and abstracting low level properties like
       special function registers and settings of specific hardware features.
      The document reference [15-2] for the Hardware Support Library (HSL) in version 03.11.8339 provides an
       application interface (API) accessing the HSM state machine and abstracting low level properties like
       special function registers and settings of specific hardware features.
      The document reference [15-3] for the Hardware Support Library (HSL) in version 02.01.6634 provides an
       application interface (API) accessing the HSM state machine and abstracting low level properties like
       special function registers and settings of specific hardware features.
      The document reference [15-4] for the Hardware Support Library (HSL) in version 01.22.4346 provides an
       application interface (API) accessing the HSM state machine and abstracting low level properties like
       special function registers and settings of specific hardware features.
      Finally the certification report by BSI may contain an overview of the recommendations to the software
       developer regarding the secure use of the TOE. These recommendations are also included in the ordinary
       user documentation, the Security Guidelines User Manual [6].
      The user guidance of the optional NRG library is included in the Programmers Reference Manual [3] and
       in the Security Guidelines [6].




CC Document                                            34                                                     1.8
                                                                                                       2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Target of Evaluation Description


2.2.5          Forms of delivery
The TOE can be delivered:
    in form of complete modules
    with or without inlay mounting
    with or without inlay antenna mounting
    in form of plain wafers
    in any IC case (for example TSSOP28, VQFN32, VQFN40, CCS-modules, etc.)
    in no IC case or package, simply as bare dies
    or in whatever type of package

The form of delivery does not affect the TOE security and it can be delivered in any type, as long as the processes
applied and sites involved have been subject of the appropriate audit.
The delivery can therefore be at the end of phase 3 or at the end of phase 4 which can also include pre-
personalization steps according to PP [9]. Nevertheless in both cases the TOE is finished and the extended test
features are removed. In this document are always both cases mentioned to avoid incorrectness but from the
security policy point of view the two cases are identical.
The delivery to the software developer (phase 2  phase 1) contains the development package and is delivered
in form of documentation as described above, data carriers and/or download from a secure server containing the
tools and emulators as development and debugging tool.
Part of the software delivery can also be the Flash Loader software running on the TOE and receiving the
transmitted information of the user software to be loaded into the SOLID FLASH™ NVM. The download is only
possible after successful mutual authentication and the user software can also be downloaded in an encrypted
way. This download can also be done at a third party acting as download service provider for the user. This
organization is subject of the user.
In any case, the user is after finalization of the download and prior delivery to the field obligated to permanently
lock further use of the Flash Loader. How the user can do this is detailed in the user guidance [2].
Note that it depends on the procurement order, whether the Flash Loader program is present or not.

The belonging user guidance documents are delivered in electronic form: Either by user downloads from a secure
server or alternatively on request as encrypted email attachment.




CC Document                                              35                                                      1.8
                                                                                                          2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Target of Evaluation Description




                                        Table 4       TOE delivery types

      TOE Component             Delivered Format              Delivery Method                Comment

                                                      Hardware

  All derivatives as stated   Plain wafers, bare dies,        Postal transfer in    All materials are delivered to
        in chapter 1          complete modules, IC             cages or metal       distribution centres in locked
                               cases of any type (for              boxes                cages or metal boxes.
                                example TSSOP28,
                                VQFN32, VQFN40,
                                CCS-modules, etc.),
                                  with or without
                                antenna mounting,
                               with or without inlay
                                  mounting, or in
                                 whatever package

                                                      Firmware

              All                         –                           –               Stored on the delivered
                                                                                            hardware.

                                                      Software

    All software libraries      Precompiled object            Secured download                    –
                              format code – L251 file          as zipped-file (1)
                              type with ending “.lib”

                                              Guidance Documentation

     All User Guidance             Personalized pdf        Secured download                       –
         documents                                        (1) or on demand by
                                                            encrypted email.

   (1) Users having an account on the secure server can login and download the according document-
       respectively software files




CC Document                                              36                                                      1.8
                                                                                                          2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Target of Evaluation Description


2.2.6          Production sites
The TOE may be handled in different production sites until delivery, but the wafers of this TOE are produced in
Taiwan at two different production sites. For logistic and capacity reasons the production lines have been
doubled and thus this certification comprises the products of both production lines.
To distinguish the different production sites in the field, the two sites are coded into the Generic Chip Ident Mode
(GCIM) data. The exact coding of the generic chip identification data is described in the hardware reference
manual HRM [1].
The delivery measures are described in the ALC_DVS aspect.

The production lines are coded as follows:
Taiwan: One production line is coded with »0Dh« and the other is coded with »0Ah«




CC Document                                              37                                                      1.8
                                                                                                          2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Conformance Claims (ASE_CCL)




3             Conformance Claims (ASE_CCL)
This Security Target (ST) and the TOE claim conformance to Common Criteria version v3.1 and in particular,
conformance is claimed for:
               Common Criteria part 2 extended [11] and Common Criteria part 3 conformant [12].

PP Claim
This Security Target is in strict conformance to the Security IC Platform Protection Profile [9].
The targeted EAL6+ level includes already the highest assurance families AVA_VAN.5 and ALC_DVS.2 from
Common Criteria part 3 [12]. To achieve an additional augmentation, this Security Target is assurance package
augmented compared to the Security IC Platform Protection Profile [9].
The augmentation is achieved – with regard to CCv3.1 Part 3 [12]: Security assurance components by including:

                        Table 5      Augmentations of the assurance level of the TOE
          Assurance Class                      Assurance Family                         Description
         Life-cycle support                       ALC_FLR.1                        Basic flaw remediation

The Security IC Platform Protection Profile with Augmentation Packages is registered and certified by the
Bundesamt für Sicherheit in der Informationstechnik (BSI) under the reference:
                            BSI-CC-PP-0084-2014, Version 1.0, dated 2014-01-13.
The security assurance requirements of the TOE are according to the Security IC Platform Protection Profile [9]
and to Part 3 of the Common Criteria version v3.1 [12].

Package Claim
This Security Target claims conformance to the following additional packages taken from the Security IC
Platform Protection Profile [9]:

•       Package Authentication of the Security IC, section 7.2, augmented
•       Package Loader, Package 1: Loader dedicated for usage in secured environment only, section 7.3.1,
conformant
This package is optional and fulfilled only by TOE products coming with Flash Loader.
•       Package Loader, Package 2: Loader dedicated for usage by authorized users only,
section 7.3.2, conformant
This package is optional and fulfilled only by TOE products coming with Flash Loader.
•       Package TDES ; section 7.4.1, augmented
The symmetric cryptographic coprocessor SCP can be blocked and the symmetric cryptographic library SCL is an
optional software. Thus this package is optional, but if one of both is available the claim is fulfilled and
augmented.
•       Package AES ; section 7.4.2, augmented
The symmetric cryptographic coprocessor SCP can be blocked and the symmetric cryptographic library SCL is an
optional software. Thus this package is optional, but if one of both is available the claim is fulfilled and
augmented.

                                     The assurance level of this TOE is:
                                        EAL6 augmented (EAL6+)
                          with the component ALC_FLR.1 and additional packages




CC Document                                            38                                                     1.8
                                                                                                       2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Conformance Claims (ASE_CCL)


The highest assurance component AVA_VAN.5 Vulnerability Assessment, advanced methodical vulnerability
analysis, is already standard requirement for the EAL6. Thus the augmentation is achieved by another assurance
class.

Conformance Rationale
This security target claims strict conformance only to the PP [9].
The Target of Evaluation (TOE) is a typical security IC as defined in PP chapter 1.2.2 comprising:
•       the circuitry of the IC (hardware including the physical memories),
•       configuration data, initialization data related to the IC Dedicated Software and the behavior of the
security functionality
•       the IC Dedicated Software with the parts
•       the IC Dedicated Test Software,
•       the IC Dedicated Support Software.
The TOE is designed, produced and/or generated by the TOE Manufacturer.

Security Problem Definition
Following the PP [9], the security problem definition is enhanced by adding additional threats, organization
security policies and an augmented assumption. Including these add-ons, the security problem definition of this
security target is consistent with the statement of the security problem definition in the PP [9], as the security
target claimed strict conformance to the PP [9].

Conformance Rationale
The augmented organizational security policy P.Add-Functions, coming from the additional security
functionality of the cryptographic libraries, the augmented assumption A.Key-Function, related to the usage of
key-depending function, and the threat memory access violation T.Mem-Access, due to specific TOE memory
access control functionality, have been added. These add-ons have no impact on the conformance statements
regarding CC [10] and PP [9], with following rational:
•        The security target remains conformant to CC [10], claim 482 as the possibility to introduce additional
restrictions is given.
•        The security target fulfils the strict conformance claim of the PP [9] due to the application notes 5, 6 and
7 which apply here. By those notes the addition of further security functions and security services are covered,
even without deriving particular security functionality from a threat but from a policy.



3.1.1          Adding Objectives

Due to additional security functionality coming from
     the cryptographic libraries
            o O.Add-Functions,
     the memory access control
            o O.Mem-Access
     and objectives related to the Flash Loader
            o O.Authentication,
            o O.Cap_Avail_Loader,
            o O.Ctrl_Auth_Loader and
            o O.Prot_TSF_Confidentiality
additional security objectives have been introduced.
These add-ons have no impact on the conformance statements regarding CC [10] and PP [9] with following
rational:

CC Document                                               39                                                       1.8
                                                                                                            2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Conformance Claims (ASE_CCL)


       The security target remains conformant to CC [10], claim 482 as the possibility to introduce additional
        restrictions is given.
       The security target fulfils the strict conformance of the PP [9] due to the application note 9 applying
        here. This note allows the definition of high-level security goals due to further functions or services
        provided to the Security IC Embedded Software.


3.1.2          AES and TDES

The PP [9] implements the optional policy cryptographic services P.Crypto_Service with its packages TDES and
AES. This TOE provides these optional packages requiring secure hardware based cryptographic services for the
IC Embedded Software as outlined in chapter 7.1.4.
Due to these optional additional security functionalities the security objectives O.TDES and O.AES have been
introduced. These add-ons have no impact on the conformance statements regarding CC [10] and PP [9], with
following rational:
      The security target fulfils the strict conformance claim of the PP [9] due to the application notes applying
        here. By these notes the addition of further security functions and security services are covered, even
        without deriving particular security functionality from a threat or a policy.


3.1.3          Loader

The PP [9] implements the optional policy for applying a Loader. The Loader is used to load data into the SOLID
FLASH™ NVM.
The Flash Loader provides the service for authentication and implements the Package for Authentication of the
Security IC containing FIA_API.1 Authentication Proof of Identity of the TOE against a user.
This means that the user clearly can identify the TOE on his external request. This fulfils the objective
O.Authentication, authentication to external entities, and obligates an objective to the environment
OE.TOE_Auth, external entities authenticating of the TOE as outlined in the PP [9].
The Loader policy defines the Package 1 with its policy P.LIM_Block_Loader where the Loader is dedicated for
usage in secured environment only and the Package 2 with its policy P.Ctlr_Loader where the Loader is
dedicated for usage by authorized users only.
 This TOE provides a Flash Loader complying with the optional packages:
       Package 1:
        Loader dedicated for usage in secured environment only
       Package 2:
        Loader dedicated for usage by authorized users only as outlined in sections 7.2 and 7.3 of the PP [9]
 Due to these optional additional security functionalities the security objectives
    O.Cap_Avail_Loader, capability and availability of the Loader,
    O.Ctrl_Auth_Loader, access control and authenticity for the Loader and
    OE.Loader_Usage. secure communication and usage of the Loader
    O.Prot_TSF_Confidentiality, protection of the confidentiality of the TSF
    OE.Lim_Block_Loader, limitation of capability and blocking the Loader
have been introduced.




CC Document                                             40                                                      1.8
                                                                                                         2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Conformance Claims (ASE_CCL)


3.1.4         CIPURSE Cryptographic Library (CCL)

The TOE provides “Additional Specific Security Functionality (O.Add-Functions)” including the CIPURSE™
Cryptography. This cryptographic functionality implements additional cryptographic services by implementation
of a protocol providing a secure mutual authentication of two entities, namely the terminal (denoted as PCD =
Proximity Coupling Device (CIPURSE™-compliant terminal)) and a smart card or a token in other form factors
which is called PICC. PICC stands for Proximity Integrated Circuit Card (CIPURSE™-compliant card).
Beside the mutual authentication, the protocol implements measures to maintain the integrity of the transferred
data and preserves in parallel the confidentiality of the transferred data.
Due to these additional security functionalities the security objectives
     O.Ctrl_Auth_CCL
     O.Prot_Integrity
     O.Prot_Confidentiality
have been introduced.




CC Document                                           41                                                    1.8
                                                                                                     2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Conformance Claims (ASE_CCL)


3.1.5          Summary

All of the above add-ons have no impact on the conformance statements regarding CC [10] and PP [9], with
following rational:
The security target fulfils the strict conformance claim of the PP [9] due to the application notes 9 applying here.
By this note the addition of further security functions and security services are covered, even without deriving
particular security functionality from a threat or a policy.
Due to the above rational, the security objectives of this security target are consistent with the statement of the
security objectives in the PP [9], as the security target claims package augmentation to the PP [9].
All security functional requirements defined in the PP [9] are included and completely defined in this ST.
A listing of all security functional requirements and where those are taken from is given in chapter 7.1.

The following security functional requirement is included and completely defined in this ST, section 6.

                         FPT_TST.2               Subset TOE security testing1

All assignments and selections of the security functional requirements are done in the PP [9] and in this Security
Target.


3.2            Application Notes
The functional requirements
     FCS_RNG.1/HPRG,
     FCS_RNG.1/TRNG,
     FCS_RNG.1/DRNG and
     FCS_RNG.1/KSG
are iterations of the FCS_RNG.1 as defined in the Protection Profile [9] according to “Anwendungshinweise und
Interpretationen zum Schema (AIS)” respectively “Functionality classes and evaluation methodology for physical
random number generators”, AIS31 [13].




                                             1
                                                 Requirement from the PP [9]


CC Document                                                 42                                                    1.8
                                                                                                           2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security Problem Definition (ASE_SPD)




4              Security Problem Definition (ASE_SPD)
The content of the PP [9] applies to this chapter completely.


4.1            Threats
The threats are directed against the assets and/or the security functions of the TOE. For example, certain attacks
are only one step towards a disclosure of assets while others may directly lead to a compromise of the
application security. The more detailed description of specific attacks is given later on in the process of
evaluation and certification.
The threats to security are defined and described in PP [9] section 3.2, respectively for T.Masquerade_TOE in
chapter 7.2.1.

                                      Table 6      Threats according PP [9]
                             Threat                                Name
                     T.Phys-Manipulation        Physical Manipulation
                     T.Phys-Probing             Physical Probing
                     T.Malfunction              Malfunction due to Environmental Stress
                     T.Leak-Inherent            Inherent Information Leakage
                     T.Leak-Forced              Forced Information Leakage
                     T.Abuse-Func               Abuse of Functionality
                     T.RND                      Deficiency of Random Numbers
                     T.Masquerade_TOE           Masquerade of the TOE



4.1.1          Additional Threat due to TOE specific Functionality
Threat Memory Access Violation
The additional functionality of introducing sophisticated privilege levels and access control allows the secure
separation between the operation system(s) and applications, the secure downloading of applications after
personalization and enables multitasking by separating memory areas and performing access controls between
different applications. Due to this additional functionality “area based memory access control” a new threat is
introduced.
The Smartcard Embedded Software is responsible for its User data of the Composite TOE according to the
assumption “Treatment of User data of the Composite TOE (A.Resp-Appl)”. However, the Smartcard Embedded
Software may comprise different parts, for instance an operating system and one or more applications. In this
case, such parts may accidentally or deliberately access data (including code) of other parts, which may result in
a security violation.




CC Document                                             43                                                      1.8
                                                                                                         2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security Problem Definition (ASE_SPD)


The TOE shall avert the threat “Memory Access Violation (T.Mem-Access)” as specified below:

 T.Mem-            Memory Access Violation
 Access
                   Parts of the Smartcard Embedded Software may cause security violations by accidentally or
                   deliberately accessing restricted data (which may include code) or privilege levels. Any
                   restrictions are defined by the security policy of the specific application context and must be
                   implemented by the Smartcard Embedded Software.

Threat Diffusion of Open Samples
The additional functionality of a Loader as defined in the PP [9], section 7.3 requires to address the following
threat, as defined in the document “PP0084: Interpretation” [9.1].
The TOE shall avert the threat “Diffusion of open Samples (T.Open_Samples_Diffusion)” as specified below:

 T.Open_Samples_Diffusion         Diffusion of Open Samples
                                  An attacker may get access to open samples of the TOE and use them to gain
                                  information about the TSF (loader, memory management unit, ROM code …).
                                  He may also use the open samples to characterize the behavior of the IC and its
                                  security functionalities (for example: characterization of side channel profiles,
                                  perturbation cartography …). The execution of a dedicated security features
                                  (for example: execution of a DES computation without countermeasures or by
                                  de-activating countermeasures) through the loading of an adequate code
                                  would allow this kind of characterization and the execution of enhanced
                                  attacks on the IC.

Note:
This threat is only relevant if the Flash Loader is still available and the attacker would in addition have the
authentication key. If both would be given, then this would enable downloading additional software.
End of note.

               Table 7       Additional threats due to TOE specific functions and augmentations
T.Mem-Access                              Memory Access Violation                           Hardware
T.Open_Samples_Diffusion                  Diffusion of open samples                         Flash Loader



4.1.2          Assets regarding the Threats
The primary assets concern the User data which includes the user data of the Composite TOE as well as program
code (Security IC Embedded Software) stored and in operation and the provided security services. These assets
have to be protected while being executed and or processed and on the other hand, when the TOE is not in
operation.
This leads to four primary assets with its related security concerns:
    / SC1 integrity of user data of the Composite TOE
     SC2 confidentiality of user data of the Composite TOE being stored in the TOE’s protected memory
        areas
     SC3 correct operation of the security services provided by the TOE for the Security IC Embedded
        Software
     SC4 continuous availability of random numbers
SC4 is an additional security service provided by this TOE which is the availability of random numbers. These
random numbers are generated either by a true random number or a deterministic random number generator or
CC Document                                               44                                                        1.8
                                                                                                             2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security Problem Definition (ASE_SPD)


by both, when a true random number is used as seed for the deterministic random number generator. Note that
the generation of random numbers is a requirement of the PP [9].
To be able to protect the listed assets the TOE shall protect its security functionality as well. Therefore critical
information about the TOE shall be protected. Critical information includes:
      logical design data, physical design data, IC Dedicated Software, and configuration data
      Initialization Data and Pre-personalization Data, specific development aids, test and characterization
        related data, material for software development support, and reticles.
The information and material produced and/or processed by the TOE Manufacturer in the TOE development and
production environment (Phases 2 up to TOE Delivery) can be grouped as follows:
      logical design data,
      physical design data,
      IC Dedicated Software, Security IC Embedded Software, Initialization Data and Pre-personalization
        Data,
      specific development aids,
      test and characterization related data,
      material for software development support, and
      reticles and products in any form
as long as they are generated, stored, or processed by the TOE Manufacturer.
For details see PP [9] section 3.1.


4.2            Organizational Security Policies
The TOE has to be protected during the first phases of their lifecycle (phases 2 up to TOE delivery which can be
after phase 3 or phase 4). Later on each variant of the TOE has to protect itself. The organizational security policy
according to PP [9] covers this aspect.

 P.Process-TOE              Identification during TOE Development and Production
                            An accurate identification must be established for the TOE. This requires that each
                            instantiation of the TOE carries this unique identification.

Due to the augmentations of PP [9] and the chosen packages additional policies are introduced and described in
the next chapter.




CC Document                                              45                                                       1.8
                                                                                                           2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security Problem Definition (ASE_SPD)


4.2.1          Augmented Organizational Security Policy
Due to the augmentations of the PP [9] and the chosen packages additional policies are introduced.
The TOE provides specific security functionality, which can be used by the Smartcard Embedded Software. In the
following specific security functionality is listed which is not derived from threats identified for the TOE’s
environment because it can only be decided in the context of the smartcard application, against which threats
the Smartcard Embedded Software will use the specific security functionality.
The IC Developer / Manufacturer must apply the policy “Additional Specific Security Functionality
(P.Add-Functions)” as specified below.

P.Add-Functions                   Additional Specific Security Functionality
                                  The TOE shall provide the following specific security functionality to the
                                  Smartcard Embedded Software:
                                      Rivest-Shamir-Adleman Cryptography (RSA)
                                      Elliptic Curve Cryptography (EC)
                                      CIPURSE™ Cryptographic Library (CCL)
                                      Cipher based Message Authentication Code (CMAC by the SCL-1)

Note 2:
The cryptographic libraries RSA, EC, SCL, CCL, and the Toolbox library as stated in chapter 1.1 are delivery
options. Therefore the TOE may come with free combinations of or even without these libraries. In the case of
coming without one or any combination of the cryptographic libraries RSA, EC, SCL, CCL, the TOE does not
provide the Additional Specific Security Functionality Rivest-Shamir-Adleman Cryptography (RSA) and/or Elliptic
Curve Cryptography (EC) and/or CIPURSE™ Cryptographic Library and/or Cipher based Message Authentication
Code (CMAC by SCL-1).
The Toolbox Library is no cryptographic library, provides no additional specific security functionality and thus the
Toolbox library is not part of the TOE Security Functionality (TSF).
End of note.

The IC Developer / Manufacturer must apply the organizational security policy “Cryptographic services of the
TOE (P.Crypto-Service)” as specified below:

 P.Crypto-Service              Cryptographic services of the TOE
                               The TOE provides secure hardware based cryptographic services for the IC
                               Embedded Software.
                                   Triple Data Encryption Standard (TDES)
                                   Advanced Encryption Standard (AES)

Note 3:
This TOE can come with both cryptographic coprocessors accessible, or with a blocked SCP or with a blocked
Crypto2304T, or with both crypto co-processors blocked. The blocking depends on the customer demands prior
to the production of the hardware. In case the SCP is blocked, no AES and DES respectively CMAC computation
supported by hardware or SCL is possible. In case the Crypto2304T is blocked, no RSA and EC computation – of
any version as stated in chapter 1.1 - supported by hardware is possible. No accessibility of the deselected
cryptographic co-processors is without impact on any other security policy of the TOE; it is exactly equivalent to
the situation where the user decides just not to use the cryptographic co-processors.
End of note.



CC Document                                             46                                                       1.8
                                                                                                          2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security Problem Definition (ASE_SPD)


The IC Developer / Manufacturer must apply the organizational security policy “Limiting and Blocking the Loader
Functionality (P.Lim_Block_Loader)” as specified below:

 P.Lim_Block_Loader             Limiting and Blocking the Loader Functionality
                                The composite manufacturer uses the Loader for loading of Security IC
                                Embedded Software, user data of the Composite Product or IC Dedicated
                                Support Software in charge of the IC Manufacturer. He limits the capability
                                and blocks the availability of the Loader in order to protect stored data from
                                disclosure and manipulation.
 P.Ctrl_Loader                  Controlled usage to Loader Functionality
                                Authorized user controls the usage of the Loader functionality in order to
                                protect stored and loaded user data from disclosure and manipulation.



4.3           Assumptions
The TOE assumptions on the operational environment are defined and described in PP [9] section 3.4.
The assumptions concern the phases where the TOE has left the chip manufacturer.
The support of cipher schemas requires an additional assumption.

 A.Process-Sec-IC                Protection during Packaging, Finishing and Personalization
                                 It is assumed that security procedures are used after delivery of the TOE by
                                 the TOE Manufacturer up to delivery to the end-consumer to maintain
                                 confidentiality and integrity of the TOE and of its manufacturing and test
                                 data (to prevent any possible copy, modification, retention, theft or
                                 unauthorized use).
 A.Resp-Appl                     Treatment of User data of the Composite TOE
                                 All User data of the Composite TOE are owned by Security IC Embedded
                                 Software. Therefore, it must be assumed that security relevant User data of
                                 the Composite TOE (especially cryptographic keys) are treated by the
                                 Security IC Embedded Software as defined for its specific application context.


4.3.1         Augmented Assumptions
The developer of the Smartcard Embedded Software must ensure the appropriate “Usage of Key-dependent
Functions (A.Key-Function)” while developing this software in Phase 1 as specified below.

 A.Key-Function               Usage of Key-dependent Functions
                              Key-dependent functions (if any) shall be implemented in the Smartcard
                              Embedded Software in a way that they are not susceptible to leakage attacks
                              (as described under T.Leak-Inherent and T.Leak-Forced).

Note that here the routines which may compromise keys when being executed are part of the Smartcard
Embedded Software. In contrast to this the threats T.Leak-Inherent and T.Leak-Forced address (i) the
cryptographic routines which are part of the TOE. For details please refer to PP [9] section 3.4.




CC Document                                            47                                                      1.8
                                                                                                        2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security Problem Definition (ASE_SPD)


4.3.2          Note regarding CIPURSE™ CL
The CIPURSE™ CL as cryptographic functionality establishes a cryptographic secured communication channel
between two identified entities. Depending on the implementation and usage, the CIPURSE™ CL can act either
in the PICC or in the PCD role. In any case the secrets applied for establishing and usage of the secured channel
must be treated in an appropriate way by both entities PICC and PCD.
This means that it is essential on user side that the critical data for establishing this cryptographic secured
communication channel is generated and stored in an appropriate way and that integrity and confidentiality is
maintained.
These preconditions are treated in the PP [9] section 3.1 claims 67 and 68, and are the reason for not placing an
assumption here.




CC Document                                             48                                                      1.8
                                                                                                         2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security objectives (ASE_OBJ)



 5             Security objectives (ASE_OBJ)
This section shows the subjects and objects where are relevant to the TOE.
A short overview is given in the following.
The user has the following standard high-level security goals related to the assets:
     SG1 maintain the integrity of user data (when being executed/processed and when being stored in the
        TOE´s memories)
     SG2 maintain the confidentiality of user data (when being executed/processed and when being stored in
        the TOE´s memories)
     SG3 maintain the correct operation of the security services provided by the TOE for the Security IC
        Embedded Software
     SG4 provision of random numbers.


5.1            Security objectives for the TOE
The security objectives of the TOE are defined and described in PP [9] section 4.1, 7.2.1, 7.3.1, 7.3.2, 7.4.1 and
7.4.2.

                             Table 8       Objectives for the TOE according to PP [9]
 O.Phys-Manipulation            Protection against Physical Manipulation
 O.Phys-Probing                 Protection against Physical Probing
 O.Malfunction                  Protection against Malfunction
 O.Leak-Inherent                Protection against Inherent Information Leakage
 O.Leak-Forced                  Protection against Forced Information Leakage
 O.Abuse-Func                   Protection against Abuse of Functionality
 O.Identification               TOE Identification
 O.RND                          Random Numbers
                                Capability and availability of the Loader
 O.Cap_Avail_Loader
                                Valid only for the TOE derivatives delivered with activated Flash Loader.
                                Authentication to external entities
 O.Authentication
                                Valid only for the TOE derivatives delivered with activated Flash Loader
                                Access control and authenticity for the Loader - valid only for the TOE
 O.Ctrl_Auth_Loader
                                derivatives delivered with activated Flash Loader
 O.TDES                         Cryptographic service Triple-DES
 O.AES                          Cryptographic service AES




CC Document                                               49                                                        1.8
                                                                                                             2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security objectives (ASE_OBJ)


Note 4:
The objectives O.Cap_Avail_Loader, O. Authentication, O.Ctrl_Auth_Loader and O.Prot_TSF_Confidentiality
apply only at TOE products coming with activated Flash Loader enabled for software or data download by the
user. In other cases the Flash Loader is not available anymore and the user software or data download is
completed. Depending on the capabilities of the user software these objectives may then reoccur as subject of
the composite TOE.
End of note.

The TOE provides “Additional Specific Security Functionality (O.Add-Functions)” as specified below.

 O.Add-Functions              Additional Specific Security Functionality
                              The TOE must provide the following specific security functionality to the
                              Smartcard Embedded Software:
                                  Rivest-Shamir-Adleman Cryptography (RSA)
                                  Elliptic Curve Cryptography (EC)
                                  CIPURSE™ Cryptography
                                  Cipher base Message authentication code (CMAC)

Note 5:
The cryptographic libraries RSA, EC, SCL, CCL and the Toolbox library are delivery options, regardless of the
version chosen. Therefore the TOE may come with free combinations of or even without these libraries. In the
case of coming without one or any combination of the cryptographic libraries RSA, EC, SCL, CCL the TOE does
not provide the Additional Specific Security Functionality Rivest-Shamir-Adleman Cryptography (RSA) and/or
Elliptic Curve Cryptography (EC) and/or CIPURSE™ Cryptographic Library and/or Cipher based Message
Authentication Code (CMAC by the SCL-1).
The Toolbox Library is no cryptographic library, provides no additional specific security functionality and thus the
Toolbox library is not part of the TOE Security Functionality (TSF).
End of note.

Note 6:
This TOE can come with both crypto co-processors accessible, or with a blocked SCP or with a blocked
Crypto2304T, or with both crypto co-processors blocked. The blocking depends on the customer demands prior
to the production of the hardware. In case the SCP is blocked, no AES and DES computation supported by
hardware is possible. In case the Crypto2304T is blocked, no RSA and EC computation – in any of the version
stated in chapter 1.1 – supported by hardware is possible. No accessibility of the deselected cryptographic co-
processors is without impact on any other security policy of the TOE; it is exactly equivalent to the situation
where the user decides just not to use the cryptographic co-processors.
End of note.

Note 7:
In case the SCP is blocked, no AES, no DES and no Cipher based Message Authentication Code (CMAC by SCL)
computation supported by hardware is possible and thus the CIPURSE™ CL and SCL usage is not possible. This is
regardless of the library version chosen.
End of note.




CC Document                                              50                                                      1.8
                                                                                                          2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security objectives (ASE_OBJ)


The TOE shall provide “Area based Memory Access Control (O.Mem-Access)” as specified below.

 O.Mem Access                Area based Memory Access Control
                             The TOE must provide the Smartcard Embedded Software with the capability to
                             define restricted access memory areas. The TOE must then enforce the
                             partitioning of such memory areas so that access of software to memory areas and
                             privilege levels is controlled as required, for example, in a multi-application
                             environment.

The additional functionality of a Loader as defined in the PP [9], section 7.3 requires to address the following
objective, as defined in the document “PP0084: Interpretation” [9.1].
The TOE shall provide “Protection of the confidentiality of the TSF (O.Prot_TSF_Confidentiality)” as specified
below:

O.Prot_TSF_Confidentiality Protection of the confidentiality of the TSF
                           The TOE must provide protection against disclosure of confidential operations of
                           the Security IC (loader, memory management unit …) through the use of a
                           dedicated code loaded on open samples.

If the CIPURSE™ CL is ordered the additional functionality address the following objectives as defined in this
document:

 O.Ctrl_Auth_CCL              Authentication of entities
                              The CIPURSE™ CL must implement mutual authentication to establish a ready to
                              use secure communication channel between two authenticated entities before
                              any other communication between the two entities is applied.

 O.Prot_Integrity             Integrity protection
                              The CIPURSE™ CL must implement integrity protection functionality for the user
                              data to be exchanged via the secure communication channel.

 O.Prot_Confidentiality Confidentiality protection
                        The CIPURSE™ CL must protect the confidentiality of the user data to be
                        exchanged via the secure communication channel if the user configures
                        accordingly.




CC Document                                              51                                                       1.8
                                                                                                           2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security objectives (ASE_OBJ)


              Table 9     Additional objectives due to TOE specific functions and augmentations
 O.Add-Functions                            Additional specific security functionality
 O.Mem-Access                               Area based Memory Access Control
 O.Prot_TSF_Confidentiality                 Protection of the confidentiality of the TSF
 O.Ctrl_Auth_CCL                            Authentication of entities
 O.Prot_Integrity                           Integrity protection
 O.Prot_Confidentiality                     Confidentiality protection


5.2            Security Objectives from PP for development and environment
The security objectives for the security IC embedded software development environment and the operational
environment are defined in PP [9] section 4.2, 4.3, 7.2.1and 7.3.

For secure use of the CIPURSE™ CL it is essential that on user side the common secret is generated and stored in
an appropriate way and that integrity and confidentiality of this user secret is maintained. These preconditions
are treated in the PP [9] section 3.1 claims 67 and 68.

The operational environment of the TOE shall provide “Limitation of capability and blocking the Loader
“OE.Lim_Block_Loader”, “External entities authentication of the TOE “OE.TOE_Auth" and “Secure
communication and usage of the Loader “OE.Loader¬Usage” as specified below:

 OE.Lim_Block_Loader            Limitation of capability and blocking the Loader
                                The Composite Product Manufacturer will protect the Loader functionality
                                against misuse, limit the capability of the Loader and terminate irreversibly
                                the Loader after intended usage of the Loader.
 OE.TOE_Auth                    Authentication to external entities
                                The operational environment shall support the authentication verification
                                mechanism and know authentication reference data of the TOE.
 OE.Loader_Usage                Secure communication and usage of the Loader
                                The authorized user must support the trusted communication with the TOE by
                                confidentiality protection and authenticity proof of the data to be loaded and
                                fulfilling the access conditions required by the Loader.
 OE.Process-Sec-IC              Protection during composite product manufacturing
                                The protection during packaging, finishing and personalization includes also
                                the personalization process (Flash Loader) and the personalization data (TOE
                                software components) during Phase 4, Phase 5 and Phase 6.




CC Document                                            52                                                       1.8
                                                                                                         2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security objectives (ASE_OBJ)


Note 8:
The objectives OE.Lim_Block_Loader, OE.TOE_Auth, OE.Loader_Usage and OE.Process-Sec-IC for the
development and operation environment apply only at TOE products coming with activated Flash Loader
enabled for user data download. In other cases the Flash Loader is not available anymore and the user data
download is completed. Depending on the capabilities of the user software this objective may then reoccur as
subject of the composite TOE.
End of note.


5.3            Security Objectives for the Environment
Since the CIPURSE™ CL requires the presence of a common secret on both communication entities an additional
objective for the environment is generated:
Following objectives are defined here.

 OE.Resp-Appl                  Treatment of User data of the Composite TOE
                               Please refer to chapter 5.3.1 for clarification

Note 9:
The CIPURSE™ CL is a delivery option. In case the user has ordered the CIPURSE™ CL, the user is responsible to
implement the CIPURSE™ CL into his user software. In addition, the user has to generate and treat the common
secret in an appropriate way. The objective common secret is therefore similar to the OE.Resp-Appl. Anyhow,
processes and treatment is exclusively subject of the user and his logistic processes.
End of note.

Note 10:
If the user decides to use the integrity protection mode of the CIPURSE™ CL then the confidentiality of the user
data to be transferred is solely subject of the user.
End of note.

Note 11:
The CIPURSE™ CL as cryptographic functionality establishes a cryptographic secured communication channel
between two identified entities. Depending on the implementation and usage, the CIPURSE™ CL can act either
in the PICC or in the PCD role. In any case the secrets applied for establishing and usage of the secured channel
must be treated in an appropriate way by both entities PICC and PCD.
This means that it is essential on user side that the critical data for establishing this cryptographic secured
communication channel is generated and stored in an appropriate way and that integrity and confidentiality is
maintained.
These preconditions are treated in the PP [9] section 3.1 claims 67 and 68, and are the reason for not placing an
objective for the environment here.
End of note.




CC Document                                             53                                                      1.8
                                                                                                         2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security objectives (ASE_OBJ)


The table below lists the security objectives.

                 Table 10       Security Objectives for the Environment according to the PP [9]
                                                                    Treatment of User data of the Composite
 Phase 1                             OE.Resp-Appl
                                                                    TOE
                                                                    Protection during composite product
 Phase 5 – 6 optional Phase 4        OE.Process-Sec-IC
                                                                    manufacturing
                                                                    Limitation of capability and blocking the
                                     OE.Lim_Block_Loader (1)
                                                                    loader.
 Phase 5 – 6 optional Phase 4        OE.TOE_Auth (1)                Authentication to external entities
                                                                    Secure communication and usage of the
                                     OE.Loader_Usage (1)
                                                                    Loader

(1) These objectives are only valid if the TOE is delivered with active Flash Loader.


5.3.1          Clarification of “Treatment of User Data (OE.Resp-Appl)”
Regarding the cryptographic services this objective of the environment has to be clarified.
By definition cipher or plain text data and cryptographic keys are user data of the Composite TOE. The
Smartcard Embedded Software shall treat these data appropriately, use only proper secret keys (chosen from a
large key space) as input for the cryptographic function of the TOE and use keys and functions appropriately in
order to ensure the strength of cryptographic operation.
This means that keys are treated as confidential as soon as they are generated. The keys must be unique with a
very high probability, as well as cryptographically strong. For example, it must be ensured that it is beyond
practicality to derive the private key from a public key if asymmetric algorithms are used. If keys are imported
into the TOE and/or derived from other keys, quality and confidentiality must be maintained. This implies that
appropriate key management has to be realized in the environment.
Regarding the memory, software and firmware protection and the SFR and peripheral access rights handling
these objectives of the environment has to be clarified. The treatment of user data of the Composite TOE is also
required when a multi-application operating system is implemented as part of the Smartcard Embedded
Software on the TOE. In this case the multi-application operating system should not disclose security relevant
user data of one application to another application when it is processed or stored on the TOE.


5.3.2     Clarification of “Protection during Composite product Manufacturing
(OE.Process-Sec-IC)”
The protection during packaging, finishing and personalization includes also the personalization process (Flash
Loader) and the personalization data (TOE software components) during Phase 4, Phase 5 and Phase 6.




CC Document                                              54                                                      1.8
                                                                                                          2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security objectives (ASE_OBJ)


5.4            Security Objectives Rationale
The security objectives rationale of the TOE are defined and described in PP [9] section 4.4. For organizational
security policy P.Add-Functions, OE.Plat-Appl and OE.Resp-Appl the rationale is given in the following
description.

                                  Table 11      Security Objectives Rationale
         Assumption, Threat or Organizational Security Policy                   Security Objective
          A.Key-Function                                                   OE.Resp-Appl
                                                                           O.Add-Functions
                                                                           O.Ctrl_Auth_CCL
          P.Add-Functions
                                                                           O.Prot_Integrity
                                                                           O.Prot_Confidentiality
                                                                           O.TDES
          P.Crypto-Service
                                                                           O.AES
                                                                           O.Ctrl_Auth_Loader
                                                                           O.Authentication
          P.Ctrl_Loader                                                    OE.Loader_Usage
                                                                           OE.TOE_Auth
                                                                           OE.Process-Sec-IC
                                                                           O.Cap_Avail_Loader
          P.Lim_Block_Loader                                               OE.Lim_Block_Loader
                                                                           OE.Process-Sec-IC
                                                                           O.Authentication
          T.Masquerade_TOE                                                 OE.TOE_Auth
                                                                           OE.Process-Sec-IC
          T.Mem-Access                                                     O.Mem-Access
                                                                           O.Prot_TSF_Confidentiality
                                                                           O.Leak-Inherent
          T.Open_Samples__Diffusion
                                                                           O.Leak-Forced
                                                                           OE.Process-Sec-IC




CC Document                                             55                                                      1.8
                                                                                                         2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security objectives (ASE_OBJ)


 5.5           P.Add-Functions
The justification related to the security objective “Additional Specific Security Functionality (O.Add-Functions)”
is as follows: Since O.Add-Functions requires the TOE to implement exactly the same specific security
functionality as required by P.Add-Functions; the organizational security policy is covered by the objective.

Nevertheless the security objectives O.Leak-Inherent, O.Phys-Probing, O.Malfunction, O.Phys-Manipulation and
O.Leak-Forced define how to implement the specific security functionality required by P.Add-Functions. (Note
that these objectives support that the specific security functionality is provided in a secure way as expected from
P.Add-Functions.) Especially O.Leak-Inherent and O.Leak-Forced refer to the protection of confidential data
(User data of the Composite TOE or TSF data) in general. User data of the Composite TOE are also processed by
the specific security functionality required by P.Add-Functions.

The policy P.Add functions includes the function CIPURSE™ Cryptographic Library (CCL). This functionality
implements the objectives O.Ctrl_Auth_CCL, O.Prot_Integrity and O.Prot_Confidentiality. The CIPURSE™
Cryptographic Library (CCL) first prepares and establishes a secure communication channel between two
authenticated entities. The mutual authentication means covers the objective O.Ctrl_Auth_CCL. The
implemented means of session key generation and integrity protection prepares for the confidential and
integrity protected exchange of user data between the two authenti        Assets regarding the Threats
The primary assets concern the User data which includes the user data of the Composite TOE as well as program
code (Security IC Embedded Software) stored and in operation and the provided security services. These assets
have to be protected while being executed and or processed and on the other hand, when the TOE is not in
operation.
This leads to four primary assets with its related security concerns:
    / SC1 integrity of user data of the Composite TOE
     SC2 confidentiality of user data of the Composite TOE being stored in the TOE’s protected memory
        areas
     SC3 correct operation of the security services provided by the TOE for the Security IC Embedded
        Software
     SC4 continuous availability of random numbers
SC4 is an additional security service provided by this TOE which is the availability of random numbers. These
random numbers are generated either by a true random number or a deterministic random number generator or
CC Document                                               44                                                        1.8
                                                                                                             2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security Problem Definition (ASE_SPD)


by both, when a true random number is used as seed for the deterministic random number generator. Note that
the generation of random numbers is a requirement of the PP [9].
To be able to protect the listed assets the TOE shall protect its security functionality as well. Therefore critical
information about the TOE shall be protected. Critical information includes:
      logical design data, physical design data, IC Dedicated Software, and configuration data
      Initialization Data and Pre-personalization Data, specific development aids, test and characterization
        related data, material for software development support, and reticles.
The information and material produced and/or processed by the TOE Manufacturer in the TOE development and
production environment (Phases 2 up to TOE Delivery) can be grouped as follows:
      logical design data,
      physical design data,
      IC Dedicated Software, Security IC Embedded Software, Initialization Data and Pre-personalization
        Data,
      specific development aids,
      test and characterization related data,
      material for software development support, and
      reticles and products in any form
as long as they are generated, stored, or processed by the TOE Manufacturer.
For details see PP [9] section 3.1.


4.2            Organizational Security Policies
The TOE has to be protected during the first phases of their lifecycle (phases 2 up to TOE delivery which can be
after phase 3 or phase 4). Later on each variant of the TOE has to protect itself. The organizational security policy
according to PP [9] covers this aspect.

 P.Process-TOE              Identification during TOE Development and Production
                            An accurate identification must be established for the TOE. This requires that each
                            instantiation of the TOE carries this unique identification.

Due to the augmentations of PP [9] and the chosen packages additional policies are introduced and described in
the next chapter.




CC Document                                              45                                                       1.8
                                                                                                           2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security Problem Definition (ASE_SPD)


4.2.1          Augmented Organizational Security Policy
Due to the augmentations of the PP [9] and the chosen packages additional policies are introduced.
The TOE provides specific security functionality, which can be used by the Smartcard Embedded Software. In the
following specific security functionality is listed which is not derived from threats identified for the TOE’s
environment because it can only be decided in the context of the smartcard application, against which threats
the Smartcard Embedded Software will use the specific security functionality.
The IC Developer / Manufacturer must apply the policy “Additional Specific Security Functionality
(P.Add-Functions)” as specified below.

P.Add-Functions                   Additional Specific Security Functionality
                                  The TOE shall provide the following specific security functionality to the
                                  Smartcard Embedded Software:
                                      Rivest-Shamir-Adleman Cryptography (RSA)
                                      Elliptic Curve Cryptography (EC)
                                      CIPURSE™ Cryptographic Library (CCL)
                                      Cipher based Message Authentication Code (CMAC by the SCL-1)

Note 2:
The cryptographic libraries RSA, EC, SCL, CCL, and the Toolbox library as stated in chapter 1.1 are delivery
options. Therefore the TOE may come with free combinations of or even without these libraries. In the case of
coming without one or any combination of the cryptographic libraries RSA, EC, SCL, CCL, the TOE does not
provide the Additional Specific Security Functionality Rivest-Shamir-Adleman Cryptography (RSA) and/or Elliptic
Curve Cryptography (EC) and/or CIPURSE™ Cryptographic Library and/or Cipher based Message Authentication
Code (CMAC by SCL-1).
The Toolbox Library is no cryptographic library, provides no additional specific security functionality and thus the
Toolbox library is not part of the TOE Security Functionality (TSF).
End of note.

The IC Developer / Manufacturer must apply the organizational security policy “Cryptographic services of the
TOE (P.Crypto-Service)” as specified below:

 P.Crypto-Service              Cryptographic services of the TOE
                               The TOE provides secure hardware based cryptographic services for the IC
                               Embedded Software.
                                   Triple Data Encryption Standard (TDES)
                                   Advanced Encryption Standard (AES)

Note 3:
This TOE can come with both cryptographic coprocessors accessible, or with a blocked SCP or with a blocked
Crypto2304T, or with both crypto co-processors blocked. The blocking depends on the customer demands prior
to the production of the hardware. In case the SCP is blocked, no AES and DES respectively CMAC computation
supported by hardware or SCL is possible. In case the Crypto2304T is blocked, no RSA and EC computation – of
any version as stated in chapter 1.1 - supported by hardware is possible. No accessibility of the deselected
cryptographic co-processors is without impact on any other security policy of the TOE; it is exactly equivalent to
the situation where the user decides just not to use the cryptographic co-processors.
End of note.



CC Document                                             46                                                       1.8
                                                                                                          2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security Problem Definition (ASE_SPD)


The IC Developer / Manufacturer must apply the organizational security policy “Limiting and Blocking the Loader
Functionality (P.Lim_Block_Loader)” as specified below:

 P.Lim_Block_Loader             Limiting and Blocking the Loader Functionality
                                The composite manufacturer uses the Loader for loading of Security IC
                                Embedded Software, user data of the Composite Product or IC Dedicated
                                Support Software in charge of the IC Manufacturer. He limits the capability
                                and blocks the availability of the Loader in order to protect stored data from
                                disclosure and manipulation.
 P.Ctrl_Loader                  Controlled usage to Loader Functionality
                                Authorized user controls the usage of the Loader functionality in order to
                                protect stored and loaded user data from disclosure and manipulation.



4.3           Assumptions
The TOE assumptions on the operational environment are defined and described in PP [9] section 3.4.
The assumptions concern the phases where the TOE has left the chip manufacturer.
The support of cipher schemas requires an additional assumption.

 A.Process-Sec-IC                Protection during Packaging, Finishing and Personalization
                                 It is assumed that security procedures are used after delivery of the TOE by
                                 the TOE Manufacturer up to delivery to the end-consumer to maintain
                                 confidentiality and integrity of the TOE and of its manufacturing and test
                                 data (to prevent any possible copy, modification, retention, theft or
                                 unauthorized use).
 A.Resp-Appl                     Treatment of User data of the Composite TOE
                                 All User data of the Composite TOE are owned by Security IC Embedded
                                 Software. Therefore, it must be assumed that security relevant User data of
                                 the Composite TOE (especially cryptographic keys) are treated by the
                                 Security IC Embedded Software as defined for its specific application context.


4.3.1         Augmented Assumptions
The developer of the Smartcard Embedded Software must ensure the appropriate “Usage of Key-dependent
Functions (A.Key-Function)” while developing this software in Phase 1 as specified below.

 A.Key-Function               Usage of Key-dependent Functions
                              Key-dependent functions (if any) shall be implemented in the Smartcard
                              Embedded Software in a way that they are not susceptible to leakage attacks
                              (as described under T.Leak-Inherent and T.Leak-Forced).

Note that here the routines which may compromise keys when being executed are part of the Smartcard
Embedded Software. In contrast to this the threats T.Leak-Inherent and T.Leak-Forced address (i) the
cryptographic routines which are part of the TOE. For details please refer to PP [9] section 3.4.




CC Document                                            47                                                      1.8
                                                                                                        2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security Problem Definition (ASE_SPD)


4.3.2          Note regarding CIPURSE™ CL
The CIPURSE™ CL as cryptographic functionality establishes a cryptographic secured communication channel
between two identified entities. Depending on the implementation and usage, the CIPURSE™ CL can act either
in the PICC or in the PCD role. In any case the secrets applied for establishing and usage of the secured channel
must be treated in an appropriate way by both entities PICC and PCD.
This means that it is essential on user side that the critical data for establishing this cryptographic secured
communication channel is generated and stored in an appropriate way and that integrity and confidentiality is
maintained.
These preconditions are treated in the PP [9] section 3.1 claims 67 and 68, and are the reason for not placing an
assumption here.




CC Document                                             48                                                      1.8
                                                                                                         2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security objectives (ASE_OBJ)



 5             Security objectives (ASE_OBJ)
This section shows the subjects and objects where are relevant to the TOE.
A short overview is given in the following.
The user has the following standard high-level security goals related to the assets:
     SG1 maintain the integrity of user data (when being executed/processed and when being stored in the
        TOE´s memories)
     SG2 maintain the confidentiality of user data (when being executed/processed and when being stored in
        the TOE´s memories)
     SG3 maintain the correct operation of the security services provided by the TOE for the Security IC
        Embedded Software
     SG4 provision of random numbers.


5.1            Security objectives for the TOE
The security objectives of the TOE are defined and described in PP [9] section 4.1, 7.2.1, 7.3.1, 7.3.2, 7.4.1 and
7.4.2.

                             Table 8       Objectives for the TOE according to PP [9]
 O.Phys-Manipulation            Protection against Physical Manipulation
 O.Phys-Probing                 Protection against Physical Probing
 O.Malfunction                  Protection against Malfunction
 O.Leak-Inherent                Protection against Inherent Information Leakage
 O.Leak-Forced                  Protection against Forced Information Leakage
 O.Abuse-Func                   Protection against Abuse of Functionality
 O.Identification               TOE Identification
 O.RND                          Random Numbers
                                Capability and availability of the Loader
 O.Cap_Avail_Loader
                                Valid only for the TOE derivatives delivered with activated Flash Loader.
                                Authentication to external entities
 O.Authentication
                                Valid only for the TOE derivatives delivered with activated Flash Loader
                                Access control and authenticity for the Loader - valid only for the TOE
 O.Ctrl_Auth_Loader
                                derivatives delivered with activated Flash Loader
 O.TDES                         Cryptographic service Triple-DES
 O.AES                          Cryptographic service AES




CC Document                                               49                                                        1.8
                                                                                                             2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security objectives (ASE_OBJ)


Note 4:
The objectives O.Cap_Avail_Loader, O. Authentication, O.Ctrl_Auth_Loader and O.Prot_TSF_Confidentiality
apply only at TOE products coming with activated Flash Loader enabled for software or data download by the
user. In other cases the Flash Loader is not available anymore and the user software or data download is
completed. Depending on the capabilities of the user software these objectives may then reoccur as subject of
the composite TOE.
End of note.

The TOE provides “Additional Specific Security Functionality (O.Add-Functions)” as specified below.

 O.Add-Functions              Additional Specific Security Functionality
                              The TOE must provide the following specific security functionality to the
                              Smartcard Embedded Software:
                                  Rivest-Shamir-Adleman Cryptography (RSA)
                                  Elliptic Curve Cryptography (EC)
                                  CIPURSE™ Cryptography
                                  Cipher base Message authentication code (CMAC)

Note 5:
The cryptographic libraries RSA, EC, SCL, CCL and the Toolbox library are delivery options, regardless of the
version chosen. Therefore the TOE may come with free combinations of or even without these libraries. In the
case of coming without one or any combination of the cryptographic libraries RSA, EC, SCL, CCL the TOE does
not provide the Additional Specific Security Functionality Rivest-Shamir-Adleman Cryptography (RSA) and/or
Elliptic Curve Cryptography (EC) and/or CIPURSE™ Cryptographic Library and/or Cipher based Message
Authentication Code (CMAC by the SCL-1).
The Toolbox Library is no cryptographic library, provides no additional specific security functionality and thus the
Toolbox library is not part of the TOE Security Functionality (TSF).
End of note.

Note 6:
This TOE can come with both crypto co-processors accessible, or with a blocked SCP or with a blocked
Crypto2304T, or with both crypto co-processors blocked. The blocking depends on the customer demands prior
to the production of the hardware. In case the SCP is blocked, no AES and DES computation supported by
hardware is possible. In case the Crypto2304T is blocked, no RSA and EC computation – in any of the version
stated in chapter 1.1 – supported by hardware is possible. No accessibility of the deselected cryptographic co-
processors is without impact on any other security policy of the TOE; it is exactly equivalent to the situation
where the user decides just not to use the cryptographic co-processors.
End of note.

Note 7:
In case the SCP is blocked, no AES, no DES and no Cipher based Message Authentication Code (CMAC by SCL)
computation supported by hardware is possible and thus the CIPURSE™ CL and SCL usage is not possible. This is
regardless of the library version chosen.
End of note.




CC Document                                              50                                                      1.8
                                                                                                          2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security objectives (ASE_OBJ)


The TOE shall provide “Area based Memory Access Control (O.Mem-Access)” as specified below.

 O.Mem Access                Area based Memory Access Control
                             The TOE must provide the Smartcard Embedded Software with the capability to
                             define restricted access memory areas. The TOE must then enforce the
                             partitioning of such memory areas so that access of software to memory areas and
                             privilege levels is controlled as required, for example, in a multi-application
                             environment.

The additional functionality of a Loader as defined in the PP [9], section 7.3 requires to address the following
objective, as defined in the document “PP0084: Interpretation” [9.1].
The TOE shall provide “Protection of the confidentiality of the TSF (O.Prot_TSF_Confidentiality)” as specified
below:

O.Prot_TSF_Confidentiality Protection of the confidentiality of the TSF
                           The TOE must provide protection against disclosure of confidential operations of
                           the Security IC (loader, memory management unit …) through the use of a
                           dedicated code loaded on open samples.

If the CIPURSE™ CL is ordered the additional functionality address the following objectives as defined in this
document:

 O.Ctrl_Auth_CCL              Authentication of entities
                              The CIPURSE™ CL must implement mutual authentication to establish a ready to
                              use secure communication channel between two authenticated entities before
                              any other communication between the two entities is applied.

 O.Prot_Integrity             Integrity protection
                              The CIPURSE™ CL must implement integrity protection functionality for the user
                              data to be exchanged via the secure communication channel.

 O.Prot_Confidentiality Confidentiality protection
                        The CIPURSE™ CL must protect the confidentiality of the user data to be
                        exchanged via the secure communication channel if the user configures
                        accordingly.




CC Document                                              51                                                       1.8
                                                                                                           2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security objectives (ASE_OBJ)


              Table 9     Additional objectives due to TOE specific functions and augmentations
 O.Add-Functions                            Additional specific security functionality
 O.Mem-Access                               Area based Memory Access Control
 O.Prot_TSF_Confidentiality                 Protection of the confidentiality of the TSF
 O.Ctrl_Auth_CCL                            Authentication of entities
 O.Prot_Integrity                           Integrity protection
 O.Prot_Confidentiality                     Confidentiality protection


5.2            Security Objectives from PP for development and environment
The security objectives for the security IC embedded software development environment and the operational
environment are defined in PP [9] section 4.2, 4.3, 7.2.1and 7.3.

For secure use of the CIPURSE™ CL it is essential that on user side the common secret is generated and stored in
an appropriate way and that integrity and confidentiality of this user secret is maintained. These preconditions
are treated in the PP [9] section 3.1 claims 67 and 68.

The operational environment of the TOE shall provide “Limitation of capability and blocking the Loader
“OE.Lim_Block_Loader”, “External entities authentication of the TOE “OE.TOE_Auth" and “Secure
communication and usage of the Loader “OE.Loader¬Usage” as specified below:

 OE.Lim_Block_Loader            Limitation of capability and blocking the Loader
                                The Composite Product Manufacturer will protect the Loader functionality
                                against misuse, limit the capability of the Loader and terminate irreversibly
                                the Loader after intended usage of the Loader.
 OE.TOE_Auth                    Authentication to external entities
                                The operational environment shall support the authentication verification
                                mechanism and know authentication reference data of the TOE.
 OE.Loader_Usage                Secure communication and usage of the Loader
                                The authorized user must support the trusted communication with the TOE by
                                confidentiality protection and authenticity proof of the data to be loaded and
                                fulfilling the access conditions required by the Loader.
 OE.Process-Sec-IC              Protection during composite product manufacturing
                                The protection during packaging, finishing and personalization includes also
                                the personalization process (Flash Loader) and the personalization data (TOE
                                software components) during Phase 4, Phase 5 and Phase 6.




CC Document                                            52                                                       1.8
                                                                                                         2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security objectives (ASE_OBJ)


Note 8:
The objectives OE.Lim_Block_Loader, OE.TOE_Auth, OE.Loader_Usage and OE.Process-Sec-IC for the
development and operation environment apply only at TOE products coming with activated Flash Loader
enabled for user data download. In other cases the Flash Loader is not available anymore and the user data
download is completed. Depending on the capabilities of the user software this objective may then reoccur as
subject of the composite TOE.
End of note.


5.3            Security Objectives for the Environment
Since the CIPURSE™ CL requires the presence of a common secret on both communication entities an additional
objective for the environment is generated:
Following objectives are defined here.

 OE.Resp-Appl                  Treatment of User data of the Composite TOE
                               Please refer to chapter 5.3.1 for clarification

Note 9:
The CIPURSE™ CL is a delivery option. In case the user has ordered the CIPURSE™ CL, the user is responsible to
implement the CIPURSE™ CL into his user software. In addition, the user has to generate and treat the common
secret in an appropriate way. The objective common secret is therefore similar to the OE.Resp-Appl. Anyhow,
processes and treatment is exclusively subject of the user and his logistic processes.
End of note.

Note 10:
If the user decides to use the integrity protection mode of the CIPURSE™ CL then the confidentiality of the user
data to be transferred is solely subject of the user.
End of note.

Note 11:
The CIPURSE™ CL as cryptographic functionality establishes a cryptographic secured communication channel
between two identified entities. Depending on the implementation and usage, the CIPURSE™ CL can act either
in the PICC or in the PCD role. In any case the secrets applied for establishing and usage of the secured channel
must be treated in an appropriate way by both entities PICC and PCD.
This means that it is essential on user side that the critical data for establishing this cryptographic secured
communication channel is generated and stored in an appropriate way and that integrity and confidentiality is
maintained.
These preconditions are treated in the PP [9] section 3.1 claims 67 and 68, and are the reason for not placing an
objective for the environment here.
End of note.




CC Document                                             53                                                      1.8
                                                                                                         2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security objectives (ASE_OBJ)


The table below lists the security objectives.

                 Table 10       Security Objectives for the Environment according to the PP [9]
                                                                    Treatment of User data of the Composite
 Phase 1                             OE.Resp-Appl
                                                                    TOE
                                                                    Protection during composite product
 Phase 5 – 6 optional Phase 4        OE.Process-Sec-IC
                                                                    manufacturing
                                                                    Limitation of capability and blocking the
                                     OE.Lim_Block_Loader (1)
                                                                    loader.
 Phase 5 – 6 optional Phase 4        OE.TOE_Auth (1)                Authentication to external entities
                                                                    Secure communication and usage of the
                                     OE.Loader_Usage (1)
                                                                    Loader

(1) These objectives are only valid if the TOE is delivered with active Flash Loader.


5.3.1          Clarification of “Treatment of User Data (OE.Resp-Appl)”
Regarding the cryptographic services this objective of the environment has to be clarified.
By definition cipher or plain text data and cryptographic keys are user data of the Composite TOE. The
Smartcard Embedded Software shall treat these data appropriately, use only proper secret keys (chosen from a
large key space) as input for the cryptographic function of the TOE and use keys and functions appropriately in
order to ensure the strength of cryptographic operation.
This means that keys are treated as confidential as soon as they are generated. The keys must be unique with a
very high probability, as well as cryptographically strong. For example, it must be ensured that it is beyond
practicality to derive the private key from a public key if asymmetric algorithms are used. If keys are imported
into the TOE and/or derived from other keys, quality and confidentiality must be maintained. This implies that
appropriate key management has to be realized in the environment.
Regarding the memory, software and firmware protection and the SFR and peripheral access rights handling
these objectives of the environment has to be clarified. The treatment of user data of the Composite TOE is also
required when a multi-application operating system is implemented as part of the Smartcard Embedded
Software on the TOE. In this case the multi-application operating system should not disclose security relevant
user data of one application to another application when it is processed or stored on the TOE.


5.3.2     Clarification of “Protection during Composite product Manufacturing
(OE.Process-Sec-IC)”
The protection during packaging, finishing and personalization includes also the personalization process (Flash
Loader) and the personalization data (TOE software components) during Phase 4, Phase 5 and Phase 6.




CC Document                                              54                                                      1.8
                                                                                                          2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security objectives (ASE_OBJ)


5.4            Security Objectives Rationale
The security objectives rationale of the TOE are defined and described in PP [9] section 4.4. For organizational
security policy P.Add-Functions, OE.Plat-Appl and OE.Resp-Appl the rationale is given in the following
description.

                                  Table 11      Security Objectives Rationale
         Assumption, Threat or Organizational Security Policy                   Security Objective
          A.Key-Function                                                   OE.Resp-Appl
                                                                           O.Add-Functions
                                                                           O.Ctrl_Auth_CCL
          P.Add-Functions
                                                                           O.Prot_Integrity
                                                                           O.Prot_Confidentiality
                                                                           O.TDES
          P.Crypto-Service
                                                                           O.AES
                                                                           O.Ctrl_Auth_Loader
                                                                           O.Authentication
          P.Ctrl_Loader                                                    OE.Loader_Usage
                                                                           OE.TOE_Auth
                                                                           OE.Process-Sec-IC
                                                                           O.Cap_Avail_Loader
          P.Lim_Block_Loader                                               OE.Lim_Block_Loader
                                                                           OE.Process-Sec-IC
                                                                           O.Authentication
          T.Masquerade_TOE                                                 OE.TOE_Auth
                                                                           OE.Process-Sec-IC
          T.Mem-Access                                                     O.Mem-Access
                                                                           O.Prot_TSF_Confidentiality
                                                                           O.Leak-Inherent
          T.Open_Samples__Diffusion
                                                                           O.Leak-Forced
                                                                           OE.Process-Sec-IC




CC Document                                             55                                                      1.8
                                                                                                         2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security objectives (ASE_OBJ)


 5.5           P.Add-Functions
The justification related to the security objective “Additional Specific Security Functionality (O.Add-Functions)”
is as follows: Since O.Add-Functions requires the TOE to implement exactly the same specific security
functionality as required by P.Add-Functions; the organizational security policy is covered by the objective.

Nevertheless the security objectives O.Leak-Inherent, O.Phys-Probing, O.Malfunction, O.Phys-Manipulation and
O.Leak-Forced define how to implement the specific security functionality required by P.Add-Functions. (Note
that these objectives support that the specific security functionality is provided in a secure way as expected from
P.Add-Functions.) Especially O.Leak-Inherent and O.Leak-Forced refer to the protection of confidential data
(User data of the Composite TOE or TSF data) in general. User data of the Composite TOE are also processed by
the specific security functionality required by P.Add-Functions.

The policy P.Add functions includes the function CIPURSE™ Cryptographic Library (CCL). This functionality
implements the objectives O.Ctrl_Auth_CCL, O.Prot_Integrity and O.Prot_Confidentiality. The CIPURSE™
Cryptographic Library (CCL) first prepares and establishes a secure communication channel between two
authenticated entities. The mutual authentication means covers the objective O.Ctrl_Auth_CCL. The
implemented means of session key generation and integrity protection prepares for the confidential and
integrity protected exchange of user data between the two authenticated entities. Thus the objectives
O.Prot_Integrity and O.Prot_Confidentiality are covered too.

The policy P.Add functions includes the function Cipher base Message authentication code (CMAC). This
functionality is implemented by the optional software SCL and implements the option to protect the integrity of
a user data block with a message authentication code. The computing of the CMAC requires the use of either
AES or TDES, as outlined in the chapter P.Crypto-Service 5.9 and also implemented by the optional software
SCL.


 5.6           A.Key-Function
Compared to the PP [9] a further clarification has been made for the security objective “Treatment of user data
of the Composite TOE (OE.Resp-Appl)”: By definition cipher or plain text data and cryptographic keys are user
data of the Composite TOE. So, the Smartcard Embedded Software will protect such data if required and use
keys and functions appropriately in order to ensure the strength of cryptographic operation. Quality and
confidentiality must be maintained for keys that are imported and/or derived from other keys. This implies that
appropriate key management has to be realized in the environment. That is expressed by the assumption
A.Key—Function which is covered from OE.Resp–Appl. These measures make sure that the assumption
A.Resp-Appl is still covered by the security objective OE.Resp-Appl although additional functions are being
supported according to P.Add-Functions.




CC Document                                             56                                                       1.8
                                                                                                          2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security objectives (ASE_OBJ)


 5.7           T.Mem-Access
Compared to the PP [9] an enhancement regarding memory area protection has been established. The clear
definition of privilege levels for operated software establishes the clear separation of different restricted memory
areas for running the firmware – regardless of the version in use -, downloading and/or running the operating
system and to establish a clear separation between different applications. Nevertheless, it is also possible to
define a shared memory section where separated applications may exchange defined data. The privilege levels
clearly define by using a hierarchical model the access right from one level to the other. These measures ensure
that the threat T.Mem-Access is clearly covered by the security objective O.Mem-Access.


 5.8           P.Ctrl_Loader, P.Lim_Block_Loader, T.Masquerade_TOE and
               T.Open_Samples_Diffusion
The PP [9] section 7.3 considers the life cycle phases of the TOE also with the organizational policy
P.Lim_Block_Loader and P.Ctlr_Loader as the TOE must be protected against unauthorized usage and control
and against download of malicious software before, during and after the user downloads his software. This is
formalized with the objectives O.Cap_Avail_Loader, O.Authentication and O.Ctrl_Auth_Loader requiring
authentication of the TOE to external entities and a trusted communication channel. The O.Authentication
implements a mutual authentication and involves the environment therefore.
And the policies cover also the environmental objective OE.Process-Sec-IC at user premises, as it must be
regardless in which environment the Flash Loader is operated.
The implemented mutual authentication requires first to authenticate the TOE to the external user. This requires
also knowledge by the user about the sequence of the protocol, interpretation of the transferred data and how to
start the authentication of the TOE. This authentication mean counters the threat T.Masquerade_TOE as only
the genuine TOE is able to identify itself correctly to the enabled user, which covers O.Authentication.
The second step of the mutual authentications mean implements the authentication of the user to the TOE. Only
the user enabled to present the correct authentication data and knowing about the sequence, data
interpretation and signaling of the authentication to the TOE is able to proceed further on.
This enforces OE.TOE_Auth, requiring the support of the verification mechanism and known authentication
reference data by the operational environment.

It is normal business that products enabled for software download by the user are either on their way to the user
or are already stored at user premises. At both situations it cannot be excluded that an attacker could manage to
steal such products enabled for software downloads. The ability to download software on a chip without
operating system and/or application is defined as open sample.
This situation generates the threat T.Open_Samples_Diffusion which is defined as follows:
The download of analysis software could enable an attacker to characterize the product and to construct an
attack path out of the gained information.
This threat is countered by the Flash Loader by following rational:
As long as the Flash Loader is active, controlled usage to the Flash Loader functionality (P.Ctrl_Loader) is
enforced which protects the TOE from achieving the status of being an open sample. And more, even the
attacker could observe, meaning in the sense of measurements during, or induce faults during an authorized
download, the Flash Loader protects the user data of the download by confidentiality and integrity protection
means. The Flash Loader functionalities of mutual authentication, establishing a dedicated trusted
communication channel, the encryption and integrity protection means cover the objectives
O.Prot_TSF_Confidentiality, O.Leak-Inherent and O.Leak-Forced.
The policy P.Ctrl_Loader covers also the environmental objective OE.Process-Sec-IC at user premises, as it must
be regardless in which environment the Flash Loader is operated.

Note regarding the Flash Loader:


CC Document                                              57                                                      1.8
                                                                                                          2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security objectives (ASE_OBJ)


The algorithm strength of the Flash Loader has not been cryptographic-analytically evaluated by the BSI, as
Infineon has implemented a proprietary extension.
End of note.

The objective O.Ctrl_Auth_Loader Access control and authenticity for the Loader is covered by following
rational:
The identification of the communication entities of the Flash Loader requires the presence of dedicated
identification data for passing successfully the mutual authentication. This enforces the policy P.Ctrl_Loader
comprising the aspect of the mutual authentication. After successful authentication the user is enabled to
change the keys used for authentication and downloading the user data. This first user is defined as the
administrator. The TOE can then further be operated for example by a service partner who is defined as being
the Download Operator. The equal protecting means as for the Administrator apply here again but due to the
key change different roles are established. The Download Operator downloads then the encrypted user data
with the Flash Loader into the defined and accessible SOLID FLASH™ NVM area. This area is access protected by
the MMU.
The policy O.Ctrl_Auth_Loader covers also the environmental objective OE.Process-Sec-IC at user premises, as it
must be regardless in which environment the Flash Loader is operated.

This objective O.Leak-Inherent is covered with following rational:
This false download threat is countered with the mutual authentication mean as only the correct identified user
is able to download the user intended software and data. Since it is not practical for an attacker to authenticate
correctly a threatening download of attack software is countered. By that possible confidential user data already
stored on the TOE remain protected from disclosure by this method.
If the user is the attacker, or does not follow the user guidance, or bad designed user software implements
weaknesses, the user data remain protected anyway, since even after passing the mutual authentication of the
loader the download is conducted encrypted only. And even more, a different encryption is applied to store the
data in the SOLID FLASH™ NVM. Since also the number of Flash Loader trials is limited even comprehensive
side channel analysis would not leave sufficient information to conduct a successful attack.
The implemented authentication means cover also the environmental objective OE.Process-Sec-IC at user
premises, as it must be regardless in which environment the Flash Loader is operated.

This objective O.Leak-Forced is covered with following rational:
Another method to gain information is to force information leakage of confidential data processed in the TOE.
Such forcing requires malfunction or physical manipulation. Inducing errors of any kind during data processing
will be discovered by the Integrity Guard with high probability which leads to a security reset. Failures induced
during the mutual authentication or encrypted download process of the Flash Loader will also be discovered as
the perturbation of the sequences leads to fail of the process with trial counter decrement or a fail of the integrity
check of the downloaded data will occur. It would anyway not be practical to induce targeted errors as any
process managing data is protected due to the permanent and differently data encryption and integrity
protection on the TOE.
Physical static manipulation requires the presence of a worthwhile target. This is on one hand hard to identify
and would require intensive reverse engineering due to the topological means such as synthesis of the TOE and
other means. But, on the other hand, if we assume than an attacker could identify such spot, and the physical
preparation was successful too and thus it was possible to probe the targeted signal, then, even assumed the
attacker could analyze the traffic on the signal, the results would be worthless, since the signal data is encrypted
or masked. Thus, the data remains confidentiality protected even outside the TOE, since the analyst neither has
neither the encryption algorithm nor the key.
The Integrity Guard concept and encryption of memory contents are always present and cover also the
environmental objective OE.Process-Sec-IC at user premises, as it must be regardless in which environment the
Flash Loader is operated.


CC Document                                              58                                                        1.8
                                                                                                            2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security objectives (ASE_OBJ)


All requirements are fulfilled by the Flash Loader due the strong mutual authentication means enabling only the
authorized user for the download, due to the download of encrypted data only and due to the final locking
command to be applied by the user before delivery. As a consequence the operational environment objectives
OE.Lim_Block_Loader, OE.TOE_Auth and OE.Loader_Usage obligate the composite manufacturer to protect
the authentication data (e.g. keys) against misuse and limit the capability of the Loader.
In addition, the user guidance implements the obligation to permanent disable the Flash Loader prior delivery to
the end-user.

The package 1 defines the final locking of the Flash Loader prior delivery to the end-user and the usage in secure
environment. The package 2 defines that the Flash Loader can be used also in insecure environment. By claiming
both packages the user has the choice to apply the active Flash Loader either in insecure or in secure
environment and achieves by that a maximum of flexibility. Anyhow, the user is obligated to lock the Flash
Loader prior delivery to the end-user in both cases. This is an obligation implemented by the user guidance.
The Flash Loader provides the required functionality to be applied by the composite manufacturer for covering
these objectives.

The objectives O.Cap_Avail_Loader, O.Authentication, O.Loader_Usage and O.Prot_TSF_Confidentiality and
the organizational policies P.Lim_Block_Loader and P.Ctlr_Loader as discussed in the PP [9] section 7.2 and 7.3
apply only at TOE products at the life cycle phase delivery, if these products come with activated Flash Loader
enabled for software or data download by the user. In other cases the Flash Loader is not available anymore and
the user software or data download is completed. Depending on the capabilities of the user software these
objectives may then reoccur as subject of the composite TOE.

 5.9          P.Crypto-Service
The PP [9] includes the organizational security policy P.Crypto-Service Cryptographic services of the TOE in a
different extend as it formalizes the objectives O.TDES and O.AES.
For the objective O.TDES a concrete standard reference (NIST) with operational modes is given the
implementation must follow and also the cryptographic key destruction is regulated. The implementation
complies to the given security functional requirements and the objective O.TDES is met.
For the objective O.AES a concrete standard reference (NIST) with a selection of key lengths is given the
implementation must follow and also the cryptographic key destruction is regulated. The implementation
complies to the given security functional requirements and the objective O.AES is met.
For the objective O.AES a concrete standard reference with an algorithm selection is given the implementation
must follow. The implementation complies to the given security functional requirements and the objective
O.AES is met.
The justification of the additional policy and the additional assumption show that they do not contradict to the
rationale already given in the Protection Profile for the assumptions, policy and threats defined there.




CC Document                                             59                                                     1.8
                                                                                                        2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Extended Component Definition (ASE_ECD)




6             Extended Component Definition (ASE_ECD)
There are following extended components defined and described for the TOE:
     the family FCS_RNG at the class FCS Cryptographic Support
     the family FMT_LIM at the class FMT Security Management
     the family FAU_SAS at the class FAU Security Audit
     the component FDP_SDC.1 at the class FDP User Data Protection
     the component FPT_TST.2 at the class FPT Protection of the TSF
     the component FIA_API.1 at the class FIA Identification and Authentication
The extended components FCS_RNG, FMT_LIM, FAU_SAS, FDP_SDC and FIA_API are defined and described in
PP [9] section 5 and the extended component FIA_API is defined and described in PP [9] section 7.2.
The component FPT_TST.2 is defined in the following.


6.1           Component Subset TOE security testing (FPT_TST.2)
The security is strongly dependent on the correct operation of the security functions. Therefore, the TOE shall
support that particular security functions or mechanisms are tested in the operational phase (Phase 7). The tests
can be initiated by the Smartcard Embedded Software and/or by the TOE or is done automatically and
continuously.
Part 2 of the Common Criteria provides the security functional component “TSF testing (FPT_TST.1)”. The
component FPT_TST.1 provides the ability to test the TSF’s correct operation.
For the user it is important to know which security functions or mechanisms can be tested. The functional
component FPT_TST.1 does not mandate to explicitly specify the security functions being tested. In addition,
FPT_TST.1 requires verification of the integrity of TSF data and of the stored TSF executable code which might
violate the security policy. Therefore, the functional component ”Subset TOE security testing (FPT_TST.2)” of
the family TSF self-test has been newly created. This component allows that particular parts of the security
mechanisms and functions provided by the TOE are tested.

 6.1.1        Definition of FPT_TST.2
The functional component “Subset TOE security testing (FPT_TST.2)” has been newly created (Common Criteria
Part 2 extended). This component allows that particular parts of the security mechanisms and functions provided
by the TOE can be tested after TOE Delivery or are tested automatically and continuously during normal
operation transparent for the user.
This security functional component is used instead of the functional component FPT_TST.1 from Common
Criteria Part 2. For the user it is important to know which security functions or mechanisms can be tested. The
functional component FPT_TST.1 does not mandate to explicitly specify the security functions being tested. In
addition, FPT_TST.1 requires verifying the integrity of TSF data and stored TSF executable code which might
violate the security policy.
The functional component “Subset TOE testing (FPT_TST.2)” is specified as follows (Common Criteria Part 2
extended).




CC Document                                             60                                                     1.8
                                                                                                        2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Extended Component Definition (ASE_ECD)


 6.1.2        TSF self-test (FPT_TST)
Family Behavior      The Family Behavior is defined in [11] section 15.14 (442, 443).
Component
                                                         1
leveling

                      FPT_TST     TSF Self Test

                                                         2

FPT_TST.1:           The component FPT_TST.1 is defined in [11] section 15.14 (444, 445 and 446).
FPT_TST.2:           Subset TOE security testing, provides the ability to test the correct operation of
                     particular security functions or mechanisms. These tests may be performed at start-up,
                     periodically, at the request of the authorized user, or when other conditions are met. It
                     also provides the ability to verify the integrity of TSF data and executable code.
Management           The following actions could be considered for the management functions in FMT:
FPT_TST.2
                        Management of the conditions under which subset TSF self-testing occurs, such as
                              during initial start-up, regular interval or under specified conditions
                                        Management of the time of the interval appropriate.

Audit: FPT_TST.2     There are no auditable events foreseen.
FPT_TST.2            Subset TOE testing
Hierarchical to:     No other components.
Dependencies:        No dependencies.
      FPT_TST.2.1:   The TSF shall run a suite of self-tests [selection: during initial start-up, periodically
                     during normal operation, at the request of the authorized user, and/or at the
                     conditions [assignment: conditions under which self-test should occur]] to
                     demonstrate the correct operation of [assignment: functions and/or mechanisms].




CC Document                                             61                                                        1.8
                                                                                                           2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security Requirements (ASE_REQ)




7              Security Requirements (ASE_REQ)
For this section the PP [9] section 6 can be applied completely.


7.1            TOE Security Functional Requirements
The security functional requirements (SFR) for the TOE are defined and described in the PP [9] section 6.1 and in
the following description.
Following table provides an overview of the functional security requirements of the TOE, marks the source it is
taken from and whether it is a defined, refined or augmented.
The refinements are also valid for this ST.

In the following table the abbreviation PP stands for Protection Profile and CCx for the related Common Criteria
part which is indicated by the “x”.


           Table 12       Security Functional Requirements defined / refined / augmented by source
    Security Functional                                                                     Refined/Defined/
       Requirement                          Description                      Source           Augmented
 By the ACLs
 FCS_CKM.1/RSA-1            Cryptographic key generation- RSA by ACL-1     CCP2 [11]     Defined in CCP2 [11]
 FCS_CKM.1/RSA-2            Cryptographic key generation- RSA by ACL-2     CCP2 [11]     Defined in CCP2 [11]
 FCS_CKM.1/RSA-3            Cryptographic key generation- RSA by ACL-3     CCP2 [11]     Defined in CCP2 [11]
 FCS_CKM.1/EC-1             Cryptographic key generation- EC by ACL-1      CCP2 [11]     Defined in CCP2 [11]
 FCS_CKM.1/EC-2             Cryptographic key generation- EC by ACL-2      CCP2 [11]     Defined in CCP2 [11]
 FCS_CKM.1/EC-3             Cryptographic key generation- EC by ACL-3      CCP2 [11]     Defined in CCP2 [11]
 FCS_COP.1/RSA-1            Cryptographic operation – RSA by ACL-1         CCP2 [11]     Defined in CCP2 [11]
 FCS_COP.1/RSA-2            Cryptographic operation – RSA by ACL-2         CCP2 [11]     Defined in CCP2 [11]
 FCS_COP.1/RSA-3            Cryptographic operation – RSA by ACL-3         CCP2 [11]     Defined in CCP2 [11]
 FCS_COP.1/ECDSA-1          Cryptographic operation – ECDSA by ACL-1       CCP2 [11]     Defined in CCP2 [11]
 FCS_COP.1/ECDSA-2          Cryptographic operation – ECDSA by ACL-2       CCP2 [11]     Defined in CCP2 [11]
 FCS_COP.1/ECDSA-3          Cryptographic operation – ECDSA by ACL-3       CCP2 [11]     Defined in CCP2 [11]
 FCS_COP.1/ECDH-1           Cryptographic operation – ECDH by ACL-1        CCP2 [11]     Defined in CCP2 [11]
 FCS_COP.1/ECDH-2           Cryptographic operation – ECDH by ACL-2        CCP2 [11]     Defined in CCP2 [11]
 FCS_COP.1/ECDH-3           Cryptographic operation – ECDH by ACL-3        CCP2 [11]     Defined in CCP2 [11]


 By the SCLs (2)
 FCS_COP.1/TDES-SCL-        Cryptographic operation TDES by SCL-1          PP [9]        Defined in PP [9]
 1
 FCS_CKM.4/TDES-SCL-        Cryptographic key destruction TDES             PP [9]        Defined in PP [9]
 1                          by SCL-1
 FCS_COP.1/AES-SCL-1        Cryptographic operation AES by SCL-1           PP [9]        Defined in PP [9]
 FCS_CKM.4/AES-SCL-1        Cryptographic key destruction AES by SCL-1     PP [9]        Defined in PP [9]
 FCS_COP.1/CMAC-            Cryptographic operation CMAC by SCL-1          PP [9]        Defined in PP [9]
CC Document                                             62                                                     1.8
                                                                                                        2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security Requirements (ASE_REQ)


  Security Functional                                                               Refined/Defined/
     Requirement                         Description                    Source        Augmented
 SCL-1
 FCS_CKM.4/CMAC-        Cryptographic key destruction CMAC by         PP [9]      Defined in PP [9]
 SCL-1                  SCL-1
 FCS_COP.1/TDES-SCL-    Cryptographic operation TDES by SCL-2         PP [9]      Defined in PP [9]
 2
 FCS_CKM.4/TDES-SCL-    Cryptographic key destruction TDES by         PP [9]      Defined in PP [9]
 2                      SCL-2
 FCS_COP.1/AES-SCL-2    Cryptographic operation AES by SCL-2          PP [9]      Defined in PP [9]
 FCS_CKM.4/AES-SCL-2    Cryptographic key destruction AES by SCL-2    PP [9]      Defined in PP [9]


 By the CIPURSE™ CL (1)(3)
                        Cryptographic key generation – CIPURSE™       CCP2 [11]   Defined in CCP2 [11]
 FCS_CKM.1/CCL
                        CL by CCL
                        Cryptographic key destruction – CIPURSE™      CCP2 [11]   Defined in CCP2 [11]
 FCS_CKM.4/CCL
                        CL by CCL
                        Cryptographic operation CIPURSE™ CL           CCP2 [11]   Defined in CCP2 [11]
 FCS_COP.1/CCL
                        Trusted Channel by CCL


 By Hardware, Firmware and the HSLs (all versions)
 FCS_CKM.4/AES          Cryptographic key destruction – AES by SCP    PP [9]      Defined in PP [9]
 FCS_COP.1/AES          Cryptographic operation – AES by SCP          PP [9]      Defined in PP [9]
                        Cryptographic key destruction – TDES by       PP [9]      Defined in PP [9]
 FCS_CKM.4/TDES
                        SCP
 FCS_COP.1/TDES         Cryptographic operation – TDES by SCP         PP [9]      Defined in PP [9]
 FAU_SAS.1              Audit data storage                            PP [9]      Defined in PP [9]
 FCS_RNG.1/DRNG         Generation of Random Numbers – DRNG           PP [9]      Defined in PP [9]
 FCS_RNG.1/HPRG         Random number generation – HPRG               PP [9]      Defined in PP [9]
 FCS_RNG.1/KSG          Random number generation – KSG                PP [9]      Defined in PP [9]
 FCS_RNG.1/TRNG         Random number generation – TRNG               PP [9]      Defined in PP [9]
                        Subset access control                         CCP2 [11]   CCP2 [11],
 FDP_ACC.1
                                                                                  augmented
 FDP_ACC.1/Loader (3)   Subset access control – Loader                PP [9]      Refined in PP [9]
                        Security attribute based access control       CCP2 [11]   CCP2 [11],
 FDP_ACF.1
                                                                                  augmented
                        Security attribute based access control –     PP [9]      Refined in PP [9]
 FDP_ACF.1/Loader (3)
                        Loader
 FDP_IFC.1              Subset information flow control               PP [9]      Refined in PP [9]
 FDP_ITT.1              Basic internal transfer protection            PP [9]      Refined in PP [9]
 FDP_SDC.1              Stored data confidentiality                   PP [9]      Defined in PP [9]
 FDP_SDI.2 (4)          Stored data integrity monitoring and action   PP [9]      Defined in PP [9]
 FDP_UCT.1              Basic data exchange confidentiality           PP [9]      Refined in PP [9]
 FDP_UIT.1              Data exchange integrity                       PP [9]      Refined in PP [9]
CC Document                                           63                                               1.8
                                                                                                2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security Requirements (ASE_REQ)


  Security Functional                                                                    Refined/Defined/
     Requirement                           Description                     Source          Augmented
 FIA_API.1               Authentication Proof of Identity                PP [9]        Defined in PP [9]
 FMT_LIM.1               Limited capabilities                            PP [9]        Defined in PP [9]
 FMT_LIM.1/Loader (3)    Limited capabilities                            PP [9]        Defined in PP [9]
 FMT_LIM.2               Limited availability                            PP [9]        Defined in PP [9]
 FMT_LIM.2/Loader (3)    Limited availability                            PP [9]        Defined in PP [9]
                         Management of security attributes               CCP2 [11]     CCP2 [11],
 FMT_MSA.1
                                                                                       augmented
                         Static attribute initialization                 CCP2 [11]     CCP2 [11],
 FMT_MSA.3
                                                                                       augmented
                         Specification of Management functions           CCP2 [11]     CCP2 [11],
 FMT_SMF.1
                                                                                       augmented
 FPT_FLS.1 (4)           Failure with preservation of secure state       PP [9]        Refined in PP [9]
 FTP_ITC.1               Inter-TSF trusted channel – Loader              PP [9]        Refined in PP [9]
 FPT_ITT.1               Basic internal TSF data transfer protection     PP [9]        Refined in PP [9]
 FPT_PHP.3 (4)           Resistance to physical attack                   PP [9]        Refined in PP [9]
 FPT_TST.2               TOE security testing                            ST [8]        Defined in ST [8]
 FRU_FLT.2               Limited fault tolerance                         PP [9]        Refined in PP [9]


   (1) Applies in two alternative operation modes: one mode preserves integrity protected communication and
       the second preserves integrity and confidential communication. Choosing the mode is up to the user and
       his responsibility. For example, the integrity protected mode can be used at secure premises, i.e. where
       eavesdropping is no issue, and the second mode can be applied where the environment is out of control
       of the user.
   (2) These security functional requirements SFR apply only if the SCL- meaning one of the two alternatives -
       is on board of the delivered TOE products.
   (3) Note that the assignment of the in the table above selected SFRs to Flash Loader or CIPURSE™ CL do
       not implement an augmentation as the extension it is just to clarify the part of the TOE claiming the
       corresponding SFR.
   (4) All HSL versions implement tearing save behavior for the SOLID Flash™ NVM. Its features are close to
       physical SOLID Flash™ NVM behavior which is not part of the SPM. Therefore, the HSL functionality
       contributing to FPT_FLS:1, FPT_PHP.3 and FDP_SDI.2 is excluded from the SPM even though it
       contributes to the named SFRs which are listed and modelled in the ADV_SPM.1.1D definition.




CC Document                                                64                                                1.8
                                                                                                      2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security Requirements (ASE_REQ)


All assignments and selections of the security functional requirements of the TOE are done in PP [9] and in the
following description.
Notes:
      The security functional requirements valid for the ACL in all alternative versions ACL-1 to ACL-3 are
         FCS_CKM.1/EC, FCS_CKM.1/RSA, FCS_COP.1/ECDH, FCS_COP.1/ECDSA and FCS_COP.1/RSA. These
         SFRs apply only if the corresponding asymmetric cryptographic library is on bard.
      The security functional requirements FMT_LIM.1/Loader, FMT_LIM.2/Loader, FIA_API.1, FTP_ITC.1,
         FDP_UCT.1, FDP_UIT.1, FDP_ACC.1/Loader and FDP_ACF.1/Loader applying only at TOE products
         coming with activated Flash Loader enabled for user data download. In other cases the Flash Loader is
         not available anymore and the user data download is completed. Depending on the capabilities of the
         user software these security functional requirements may then reoccur as subject of the composite TOE.
      The security functional requirements FCS_COP.1/CCL, FCS_CKM.1/CCL, FCS_CKM.4/CCL apply only if
         the CCL is on board and if the operation mode confidential communication is chosen.


7.1.1          Extended Components FCS_RNG.1 and FAU_SAS.1

7.1.1.1        FCS_RNG
To define the IT security functional requirements of the TOE an additional family (FCS_RNG) of the Class FCS
(cryptographic support) is defined in the PP [9]. This family describes the functional requirements for random
number generation used for cryptographic purposes.

Please note that the national regulation are outlined in PP [9] chapter 7.5.1 and in AIS31 [13]. These regulations
apply for this TOE.

Note 12:
The functional requirements FCS_RNG.1/TRNG, FCS_RNG.1/HPRG, FCS_RNG.1/DRNG, FCS_RNG.1/KSG, are
iterations of the FCS_RNG.1 defined in the PP [9] according to “Anwendungshinweise und Interpretationen zum
Schema (AIS)” respectively “A proposal for: Functionality classes for random number generators” [13].
End of note.

Note 13:
The Physical True Random Number Generator PTRNG implements total failure test of the random source and a
continuous RNG test according to:
National Institute of Standards and Technology, Security Requirements for Cryptographic Modules, Federal
Information Processing Standards Publication (FIPS) 140-2, 2002-03-12, chapter 4.9.2.
End of note.

Together with the guidelines in [6] the hybrid PTRNG of this TOE provides random numbers conformant to
several quality metrics as defined in [13]. Depending on the user configuration the TOE provide the according
random number quality. For each addressed quality metric of [13] the definitions are made in the following
chapters.




CC Document                                              65                                                      1.8
                                                                                                          2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security Requirements (ASE_REQ)


7.1.1.1.1     True Random Number Generation, meeting AIS31 PTG.2


      FCS_RNG.1/TRNG         Random Number Generation
          Hierarchical to:   No other components
           Dependencies:     No dependencies
      FCS_RNG.1/TRNG         Random numbers generation Class PTG.2 according to [13]
      FCS_RNG.1.1/TRNG       The TSF shall provide a physical random number generator that
                             implements:
                  PTG.2.1    A total failure test detects a total failure of entropy source immediately when
                             the RNG has started. When a total failure is detected, no random numbers
                             will be output.
                  PTG.2.2    If a total failure of the entropy source occurs while the RNG is being operated,
                             the RNG prevents the output of any internal random number that depends on
                             some raw random numbers that have been generated after the total failure of
                             the entropy source.
                  PTG.2.3    The online test shall detect non-tolerable statistical defects of the raw
                             random number sequence (i) immediately when the RNG has started, and (ii)
                             while the RNG is being operated. The TSF must not output any random
                             numbers before the power-up online test has finished successfully or when a
                             defect has been detected.
                  PTG.2.4    The online test procedure shall be effective to detect non-tolerable
                             weaknesses of the random numbers soon.
                  PTG.2.5    The online test procedure checks the quality of the raw random number
                             sequence. It is triggered continuously. The online test is suitable for detecting
                             non-tolerable statistical defects of the statistical properties of the raw random
                             numbers within an acceptable period of time.
      FCS_RNG.1.2/TRNG       The TSF shall provide numbers in the format 8- or 16-bit that meet
                PTG.2.6      Test procedure A, as defined in [13] does not distinguish the internal random
                             numbers from output sequences of an ideal RNG.
                  PTG.2.7    The average Shannon entropy per internal random bit exceeds 0.997.




CC Document                                        66                                                         1.8
                                                                                                       2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security Requirements (ASE_REQ)


                          Hybrid Random Number Generation, meeting AIS31 PTG.3



  FCS_RNG.1/HPRG         Random Number Generation
      Hierarchical to:   No other components
       Dependencies:     No dependencies
  FCS_RNG.1/HPRG         Random numbers generation Class PTG.3 according to [13]
  FCS_RNG.1.1/HPRG       The TSF shall provide a hybrid physical random number generator that implements:
             PTG.3.1     A total failure test detects a total failure of entropy source immediately when the RNG
                         has started. When a total failure has been detected no random numbers will be
                         output.
              PTG.3.2    If a total failure of the entropy source occurs while the RNG is being operated, the
                         RNG prevents the output of any internal random number that depends on some raw
                         random numbers that have been generated after the total failure of the entropy
                         source.
              PTG.3.3    The online test shall detect non-tolerable statistical defects of the raw random
                         number sequence (i) immediately when the RNG has started, and (ii) while the RNG is
                         being operated. The TSF must not output any random numbers before the power-up
                         online test and the seeding of the DRG.3 post-processing algorithm have been finished
                         successfully or when a defect has been detected.
              PTG.3.4    The online test procedure shall be effective to detect non-tolerable weaknesses of the
                         random numbers soon.
              PTG.3.5    The online test procedure checks the raw random number sequence. It is triggered
                         continuously. The online test is suitable for detecting non-tolerable statistical defects
                         of the statistical properties of the raw random numbers within an acceptable period of
                         time.
                         Note:
                         Continuously means that the raw random bits are scanned continuously.
                         The algorithmic post-processing belongs to Class DRG.3 with cryptographic state
                         transition function and cryptographic output function. The output data rate of the
                         post-processing algorithm shall not exceed its input data rate.
                         End of note.
              PTG.3.6    The algorithmic post-processing algorithm belongs to Class DRG.3 with cryptographic
                         state transition function and cryptographic output function, and the output data rate
                         of the post-processing algorithm shall not exceed its input data rate.
  FCS_RNG.1.2/HPRG       The TSF shall provide numbers in the format 8- or 16-bit that meet
            PTG.3.7      Statistical test suites cannot practically distinguish the internal random numbers from
                         output sequences of an ideal RNG. The internal random numbers must pass test
                         procedure A.




CC Document                                             67                                                        1.8
                                                                                                           2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security Requirements (ASE_REQ)




Deterministic Random Number Generation (DRNG) AIS31 DRG.3

  FCS_RNG.1/DRNG          Random Number Generation
       Hierarchical to:   No other components
       Dependencies:      No dependencies
  FCS_RNG.1/DRNG          Random numbers generation Class DRG.3 according to [13]
  FCS_RNG.1.1/DRNG        The TSF shall provide a deterministic random number generator that implements:
              DRG.3.1     If initialized with a random seed using a PTRNG of class PTG.2 as random source the
                          internal state of the RNG shall have at least 100 bit of entropy.
                          Note:
                          Furthermore, the length of the internal state shall have at least 200 bit. (For the
                          DRG.3 under consideration, the internal state has 351 bit.). The seed is provided by a
                          certified PTG.2 physical TRNG with guaranteed 7,976 bit of entropy per byte.
                          End of note.
            DRG.3.2       The RNG provides forward secrecy.
            DRG.3.3       The RNG provides backward secrecy even if the current internal state is known.
  FCS_RNG.1.2/DRNG        The TSF shall provide numbers in the format 8- or 16-bit that meet
            DRG.3.4       The RNG, initialized with a random seed, where the seed has at least 100 bit of
                          entropy and is derived by a PTG.2 certified PTRNG. The RNG generates output for
                          which any consecutive 234 strings of bit length 128 are mutually different with a
                          probability that is greater than 1 – 2(-16).
              DRG.3.5     Statistical test suites cannot practically distinguish the random numbers from the
                          output sequences of an ideal RNG. The random numbers must pass test procedure A
                          and the U.S. National Institute of Standards and Technology (NIST) test suite for
                          RNGs used for cryptographic purposes [41] containing following 16 tests:
                          Frequency (Monobit) Test, Frequency Test within a Block, Runs Tests, Test for the
                          Longest-Run-of-Ones in a Block, Binary Matrix Rank Test, Discrete Fourier Transform
                          (Spectral) Test, Non-overlapping (Aperiodic) Template Matching Test, Overlapping
                          (Periodic) Template Matching Test, Maurer´s “Universal Statistical” Test, Liner
                          Complexity Test, Serial Test, Approximate Entropy Test, Cumulative Sums (Cusums)
                          Test, Random Excursions Test and Random Excursions Variant Test.




CC Document                                             68                                                       1.8
                                                                                                          2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security Requirements (ASE_REQ)


7.1.1.1.2      Deterministic Random Number Generation (DRNG) AIS31 DRG.2

This additional operation mode is named Key Stream Generation (KSG), which is a stream cipher generation. It is
conformant to DRG.2 and implements therefore forward and additional backward secrecy.


  FCS_RNG.1/KSG         Random Number Generation
     Hierarchical to:   No other components
     Dependencies:      No dependencies
  FCS_RNG.1/KSG         Random numbers generation Class DRG.2 according to [13]
  FCS_RNG.1.1/KSG       The TSF shall provide a deterministic random number generator that implements:
            DRG.2.1     If initialized with a random seed using a PTRNG of class PTG.2 as random source, the
                        applied seed shall have at least 100 bits of entropy, the internal state of the RNG shall
                        have at least the size of 200 bit – in this case the size of the internal state amounts to
                        351 bit, has the work factor for breaking the algorithm of 2127 due to the restriction on
                        the maximum amount of keystream computed from a given seed, required guess work
                        amounts to 2127 as well.
          DRG.2.2       The RNG provides forward secrecy.
          DRG.2.3       The RNG provides backward secrecy.
  FCS_RNG.1.2/KSG       The TSF shall provide numbers in the format 8- or 16-bit that meet
          DRG.2.4       The RNG, initialized with a random seed of length at least 100 bit delivered by an
                        PTRNG of the class PTG.2, generates output for which any consecutive 234 strings of the
                        length 128 bits are mutually different with probability greater than 1-2(-16).
              DRG.2.5   Statistical test suites cannot practically distinguish the random numbers from the
                        output sequences of an ideal RNG. The random numbers must pass test procedure A.
                        Note:
                        The random numbers have been shown to fulfill all statistical tests of the AIS 20/31
                        statistical tests of procedure A. The random numbers are in the format 8- or 16 Bit.
                        End of Note.




CC Document                                             69                                                        1.8
                                                                                                           2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security Requirements (ASE_REQ)


7.1.1.2        FAU_SAS
During testing at the end of Phase 3 before TOE Delivery, the TOE shall be able to store some data (for instance
about the production history or identification data of the individual die or other data to be used after delivery).
Therefore, the security functional component Audit storage (FAU_SAS.1) has been added and is described in the
PP [9].
The TOE shall meet the requirement “Audit storage (FAU_SAS.1)” as specified below, PP [9]:

 FAU_SAS.1                Audit Storage
      Hierarchical to:    No dependencies
      Dependencies:       No dependencies.
 FAU_SAS.1.1              The TSF shall provide the test process before TOE Delivery with the capability to store
                                                                            evaluation. This specifically applies to the following proprietary or non-standard algorithms, protocols
                                                                                                 and implementations:
                                                                                                       •    KoreanSEED
                                                                                                       •    AES in Counter with CBC-MAC mode (AES CCM)
                                                                                                       •    Keyed-Hash Message Authentication Code (HMAC)
                                                                                                       •    HMAC-based Key Derivation Function (HKDF). [RFC-5869]
                                                                                                       •    Elliptic Curve Direct Anonymous Attestation (ECDAA) [TPM]
                                                                                                       •    ECC based on Edwards and Montgomery curves
                                                                                                 To fend off attackers with high attack potential appropriate cryptographic algorithms with adequate key
                                                                                                 lengths must be used (references can be found in national and international documents and
                                                                                                 standards).
                                                                                                 Page: 12/13 of report number: NSCIB-CC-180212-CR2, dated 20 March 2020




                                                                                                 3 Security Target

                                                                                                 The JCOP 4 P71, Security Target for JCOP 4 P71 / SE050, Rev. 3.7, 17-03-2020 [ST] is included
                                                                                                 here by reference.
                                                                                                 Please note that for the need of publication a public version [ST-lite] has been created and verified
                                                                                                 according to [ST-SAN].



                                                                                                 4 Definitions

                                                                                                 This list of Acronyms and the glossary of terms contains elements that are not already defined by the
                                                                                                 CC or CEM:
                                                                                                 AES                  Advanced Encryption Standard
                                                                                                 CBC                  Cipher Block Chaining (a block cipher mode of operation)
                                                                                                 CBC-MAC              Cipher Block Chaining Message Authentication Code
                                                                                                 CMAC                 Chaining Message Authentication Code
                                                                                                 CRT                  Chinese Remainder Theorem
                                                                                                 DES                  Data Encryption Standard
                                                                                                 DFA                  Differential Fault Analysis
                                                                                                 ECB                  Electronic Code Book (a block cipher mode of operation)
                                                                                                 ECC (over GF)        Elliptic Curve Cryptography (over Galois Fields)
                                                                                                 ECDH                 Elliptic Curve Diffie-Hellman algorithm
                                                                                                 ECDSA                Elliptic Curve Digital Signature Algorithm
                                                                                                 IC                   Integrated Circuit
                                                                                                 ITSEF                IT Security Evaluation Facility
                                                                                                 JCAPI                Java Card Application Programming Interface
® TÜV, TUEV and TUV are registered trademarks. Any use or application requires prior approval.




                                                                                                 JCRE                 Java Card Runtime Environment
                                                                                                 JCVM                 Java Card Virtual Machine
                                                                                                 JIL                  Joint Interpretation Library
                                                                                                 MAC                  Message Authentication Code
                                                                                                 NSCIB                Netherlands scheme for certification in the area of IT security
                                                                                                 PP                   Protection Profile
                                                                                                 RNG                  Random Number Generator
                                                                                                 RSA                  Rivest-Shamir-Adleman Algorithm
                                                                                                 SHA                  Secure Hash Algorithm
                                                                                                 Page: 13/13 of report number: NSCIB-CC-180212-CR2, dated 20 March 2020




                                                                                                 5 Bibliography

                                                                                                 This section lists all referenced documentation used as source material in the compilation of this
                                                                                                 report:
                                                                                                 [CC]                 Common Criteria for Information Technology Security Evaluation, Parts I, II and III,
                                                                                                                      Version 3.1 Revision 5, April 2017.
                                                                                                 [CEM]                Common Methodology for Information Technology Security Evaluation, Version 3.1
                                                                                                                      Revision 5, April 2017.
                                                                                                 [CR-N7121]           BSI-DSZ-CC-1040-2019, NXP Smart Card Controller N7121 with IC Dedicated
                                                                                                                      Software and Crypto Library from NXP Semiconductors Germany GmbH, v1.0, 14-
                                                                                                                      06-2019, BSI
                                                                                                 [N7121-ETRfC]        ETR for Composition, NXP Secure Smart Card Controller N7121 with IC Dedicated
                                                                                                                      Software and Crypto Library (N7121) according to AIS36, 18-RPT-788 v8.0, 31
                                                                                                                      May 2019, Brightsight
                                                                                                 [N7121-ST]           NXP Secure Smart Card Controller N7121 with IC Dedicated Software and Crypto
                                                                                                                      Library Security Target, Rev. 1.5, 31 May 2019
                                                                                                 [ETR]                Evaluation Technical Report JCOP 4 P71, 19-RPT-542, Version 5.0, 19 March
                                                                                                                      2020.
                                                                                                 [ETRfC]              ETR for Composite Evaluation JCOP 4 P71, 19-RPT-177, Version 7.0, 19 March
                                                                                                                      2020.
                                                                                                 [GP]                 GlobalPlatform Card Specification, v2.3, GlobalPlatform Inc., October 2015
                                                                                                 [JCAPI]              Java Card 3 Platform, Application Programming Interface, Classic Edition, Version
                                                                                                                      3.0.5, May 2015, Published by Oracle
                                                                                                 [JCRE]               Java Card 3 Platform, Runtime Environment Specification, Classic Edition, Version
                                                                                                                      3.0.5, May 2015, Published by Oracle
                                                                                                 [JCVM]               Java Card 3 Platform, Virtual Machine Specification, Classic Edition, Version 3.0.5,
                                                                                                                      May 2015, Published by Oracle.
                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                         duct data sheet addendum   1.0
                                                                                                 Page: 10/14 of report number: NSCIB-CC-217812-CR2, dated 14 December 2020




                                                                                                               P73 Family Chip Health Mode, Application note                                1.0
                                                                                                               P73 Family Code Signature Watchdog, Application note                         1.1
                                                                                                               ARM®v7-M Architecture Reference Manual                                       ID120114
                                                                                                                                                                                            (ARM website)
                                                                                                 Table 3 Manuals common for all SN200_SE B1.1



                                                                                                   Item            Identifier                                                                 Version
                                                                                                  Manuals         SN200_SE Information on Guidance and Operation                             1.1
                                                                                                                  SN200 Services User Manual – API and Operational Guidance                  4.13
                                                                                                                  SN200 Services Addendum - Additional API and Operational Guidance          0.5
                                                                                                                  SN200x Crypto Library Information on Guidance and Operation                1.4
                                                                                                                  SN200x Crypto Library: User Manual – RNG Library                           1.1
                                                                                                                  SN200x Crypto Library: User Manual – SHA Library                           1.0
                                                                                                                  SN200x Crypto Library: User Manual – Secure SHA Library                    1.0
                                                                                                                  SN200x Crypto Library: User Manual – SHA-3 Library                         1.0
                                                                                                                  SN200x Crypto Library: User Manual – Secure SHA-3 Library                  1.0
                                                                                                                  SN200x Crypto Library: User Manual – HMAC Library                          1.0
                                                                                                                  SN200x Crypto Library: User Manual – Rsa Library (Rsa)                     1.1
                                                                                                                  SN200x Crypto Library: User Manual – RSA Key Generation Library (RsaKg)    1.0
                                                                                                                  SN200x Crypto Library: User Manual – ECC over GF(p) Library                1.0
                                                                                                                  SN200x Crypto Library: User Manual – ECDAA                                 1.0
                                                                                                                  SN200x Crypto Library: User Manual – TwdEdMontGfp Library                  1.0
                                                                                                                  SN200x Crypto Library: User Manual – eUICC Library                         1.0
                                                                                                                  SN200x Crypto Library: User Manual – Symmetric Cipher Library (SymCfg)     1.1
                                                                                                                  SN200x Crypto Library: User Manual – Utils Library                         1.0
                                                                                                                  SN200x Crypto Library: User Manual – HASH Library                          1.0
                                                                                                                  SN200x Crypto Library: Errata sheet                                        1.0


                                                                                                 Table 4 Manuals of SN200_SE B1.1 specific for C04
® TÜV, TUEV and TUV are registered trademarks. Any use or application requires prior approval.




                                                                                                 2.6      IT Product Testing
                                                                                                 Testing (depth, coverage, functional tests, independent testing): The evaluators examined the
                                                                                                 developer’s testing activities documentation and verified that the developer has met their testing
                                                                                                 responsibilities.

                                                                                                 2.6.1      Testing approach and depth
                                                                                                 The developer has performed extensive testing on functional specification, subsystem and modules
                                                                                                 (according to EAL6 requirements). The testing was largely automated using industry standard and
                                                                                                 proprietary test suites. Test scripts were extensively used to verify that the functions return the
                                                                                                 expected values.
                                                                                                 For the testing performed by the evaluators, the developer has provided samples and a test
                                                                                                 environment. The evaluators have reproduced a selection of the developer tests, as well as a small
                                                                                                 number of test cases designed by the evaluator. For the evaluator defined tests the developer
                                                                                                 delivered samples (and support in writing scripts). However, Riscure’s test environment was used for
                                                                                                 these ATE_IND tests.
                                                                                                 The underlying hardware and crypto-library test results are extendable to composite evaluations, as
                                                                                                 the underlying platform is operated according to its guidance and the composite evaluation
                                                                                                 requirements are met.
                                                                                                 Page: 11/14 of report number: NSCIB-CC-217812-CR2, dated 14 December 2020




                                                                                                 2.6.2    Independent Penetration Testing
                                                                                                 The evaluator independent penetration tests were conducted according to the following testing
                                                                                                 approach:
                                                                                                     • During evaluation of the ADV, ATE and ALC classes the evaluators hypothesized possible
                                                                                                        vulnerabilities. This resulted in a shortlist of possible vulnerabilities to be further analysed in
                                                                                                        AVA using the design knowledge gained in particular from the source code analysis in IMP.
                                                                                                        This resulted in a shortlist of potential vulnerabilities to be tested.
                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                    